CHAPTER I.
'T was a commodity lay fretting by you;
'T will bring you gain, or perish on the seas.
Taming of the Shrew
.
There
is nothing in which American Liberty, not always
as much restrained as it might be, has manifested a more
decided tendency to run riot, than in the use of names.
As for Christian names, the Heathen Mythology, the Bible,
Ancient History, and all the classics, have long since been
exhausted, and the organ of invention has been at work
with an exuberance of imagination that is really wonderful
for such a matter-of-fact people. Whence all the strange
sounds have been derived which have thus been pressed
into the service of this human nomenclature, it would
puzzle the most ingenious philologist to say. The days
of the Kates, and Dollys, and Pattys, and Bettys, have
passed away, and in their stead we hear of Lowinys,
and Orchistrys, Philenys, Alminys, Cythrys, Sarahlettys,
Amindys, Marindys, &c. &c. &c. All these last appellations
terminate properly with an a, but this unfortunate vowel,
when a final letter, being popularly pronounced like y, we
have adapted our spelling to the sound, which produces a
complete bathos to all these flights in taste.
The hero of this narrative was born fully sixty years
since, and happily before the rage for modern
appellations
,
though he just escaped being named after another
system which we cannot say we altogether admire; that
of using a family, for a christian name. This business of
names is a sort of science in itself and we do believe that
it is less understood and less attended to in this country
than in almost all others. When a Spaniard writes his
name as Juan de Castro y
[1]
[1]
Some few of our readers may require to be told that, in
Spanish
,
y, pronounced as e, is the simple conjunction and; thus
this name is de Castro
and
Muos.
Muos, we know that his father
belonged to the family of Castro and his mother to that of
Muos. The French, and Italian, and Russian woman,
&c., writes on her card Madame this or that,
born
so and
so; all which tells the whole history of her individuality.
Many French women, in signing their names, prefix those
of their own family to those of their husbands, a sensible
and simple usage that we are glad to see is beginning to
obtain among ourselves. The records on tomb-stones, too,
might be made much more clear and useful than they now
are, by stating distinctly who the party was, on both sides
of the house, or by father and mother; and each married
woman ought to be commemorated in some such fashion
as this: Here lies Jane Smith, wife of John Jones, &c.,
or, Jane, daughter of Thomas Smith and wife of John
Jones. We believe that, in some countries, a woman's
name is not properly considered to be changed by
marriage
,
but she becomes a Mrs. only in connection with the
name of her husband. Thus Jane Smith becomes Mrs.
John
Jones, but not Mrs. Jane Jones. It is on this idea
we suppose that our ancestors the Englishevery
Englishman
,
as a matter of course, being every American's
ancestor
thus
it is, we suppose, therefore, that our ancestors,
who pay so much more attention to such matters than we
do ourselves, in their table of courtesy, call the wife of
Lord John Russell, Lady
John
, and not Ladywhatever
her christian name may happen to be. We suppose,
moreover
,
it is on this principle that Mrs. General This, Mrs.
Dr. That, and Mrs. Senator T'other, are as inaccurate as
they are notoriously vulgar.
Mark Woolston came from a part of this great republic
where the names are still as simple, unpretending, and as
good Saxon English, as in the county of Kent itself. He
was born in the little town of Bristol, Bucks county,
Pennsylvania
.
This is a portion of the country that, Heaven
be praised! still retains some of the good old-fashioned
directness and simplicity. Bucks is full of Jacks, and
Bens, and Dicks, and we question if there is such a
creature
,
of native growth, in all that region, as an Ithusy, or
a Seneky, or a Dianthy, or an Antonizetty, or a Deidamy.
[2]
[2]
Absurd and forced as these strange appellations may appear,
they are all genuine. The writer has collected a long list of such
names from real life, which he may one day publishOrchistra,
Philena, and Almina are among them. To all the names ending
in a, it must be remembered that the sound of a final y is given.
The Woolstons, in particular, were a plain family, and
very unpretending in their external appearance, but of
solid and highly respectable habits around the domestic
hearth. Knowing perfectly how to spell, they never
dreamed any one would suspect them of ignorance. They
called themselves as their forefathers were called, that is
to say, Wooster, or just as Worcester is pronounced; though
a Yankee schoolmaster tried for a whole summer to
persuade
our hero, when a child, that he ought to be styled
Wool-ston. This had no effect on Mark, who went on
talking of his uncles and aunts, Josy Wooster, and
Tommy Wooster, and Peggy Wooster, precisely as
if a New England academy did not exist on earth; or as
if Webster had not actually put Johnson under his feet!
The father of Mark Woolston (or Wooster) was a
physician
,
and, for the country and age, was a well-educated
and skilful man. Mark was born in 1777, just seventy
years since; and only ten days before the surrender of
Burgoyne. A good deal of attention was paid to his
instruction
,
and fortunately for himself, his servitude under
the eastern pedagogue was of very short duration, and
Mark continued to speak the English language as his
fathers
had spoken it before him. The difference on the
score of language, between Pennsylvania and New Jersey
and Maryland, always keeping in the counties that were
not settled by Germans or Irish, and the New England
states, and
through
them, New York, is really so obvious
as to deserve a passing word. In the states first named,
taverns, for instance, are still called the Dun Cow, the
Indian
Queen, or the Anchor; whereas such a thing would
be hard to find, at this day, among the six millions of
people who dwell in the latter. We question if there be
such a thing as a coffee-house in all Philadelphia, though
we admit it with grief, the respectable town of Brotherly
Love has, in some respects, become infected with the spirit
of innovation. Thus it is that good old State House
Yard
has been changed into Independence Square.
This certainly is not as bad as the
tour de force
of the
aldermen of Manhattan when they altered Bear Market
into
Washington
Market! for it is not a prostitution of
the name of a great man, in the first place, and there is a
direct historical allusion in the new name that everybody
can understand. Still, it is to be regretted; and we hope
this will be the last thing of the sort that will ever occur,
though we confess our confidence in Philadelphia stability
and consistency is a good deal lessened, since we have
learned, by means of a late law-suit, that there are fifty or
sixty aldermen in the place; a number of those worthies
that is quite sufficient to upset the proprieties, in Athens
itself!
Dr. Woolston had a competitor in another physician,
who lived within a mile of him, and whose name was
Yardley
.
Dr. Yardley was a very respectable person, had about
the same degree of talents and knowledge as his neighbour
and rival, but was much the richest man of the two. Dr.
Yardley, however, had but one child, a daughter, whereas
Dr. Woolston, with much less of means, had sons and
daughters. Mark was the oldest of the family, and it was
probably owing to this circumstance that he was so well
educated, since the expense was not yet to be shared with
that of keeping his brothers and sisters at schools of the
same character.
In 1777 an American college was little better than a
high school. It could not be called, in strictness, a
grammar
school, inasmuch as all the sciences were glanced at,
if not studied; but, as respects the classics, more than
a grammar school it was not, nor that of a very high
order. It was a consequence of the light nature of the
studies, that mere boys graduated in those institutions.
Such was the case with Mark Woolston, who would have
taken his degree as a Bachelor of Arts, at Nassau Hall,
Princeton, had not an event occurred, in his sixteenth
Vol. I.  2
year, which produced an entire change in his plan of life,
and nipped his academical honours in the bud.
Although it is unusual for square-rigged vessels of any
size to ascend the Delaware higher than Philadelphia, the
river is, in truth, navigable for such craft almost to Trenton
Bridge. In the year 1793, when Mark Woolston was just
sixteen, a full-rigged ship actually came up, and lay at the
end of the wharf in Burlington, the little town nearly
opposite
to Bristol, where she attracted a great deal of the
attention of all the youths of the vicinity. Mark was at
home, in a vacation, and he passed half his time in and
about that ship, crossing the river in a skiff of which he
was the owner, in order to do so. From that hour young
Mark affected the sea, and all the tears of his mother and
eldest sister, the latter a pretty girl only two years his
junior
,
and the more sober advice of his father, could not
induce him to change his mind. A six weeks' vacation
was passed in the discussion of this subject, when the Doctor
yielded to his son's importunities, probably foreseeing he
should have his hands full to educate his other children,
and not unwilling to put this child, as early as possible, in
the way of supporting himself.
The commerce of America, in 1793, was already
flourishing
,
and Philadelphia was then much the most
important
place in the country. Its East India trade, in
particular
,
was very large and growing, and Dr. Woolston knew
that fortunes were rapidly made by many engaged in it.
After turning the thing well over in his mind, he
determined
to consult Mark's inclinations, and to make a sailor
of him. He had a cousin married to the sister of an East
India, or rather of a Canton ship-master, and to this person
the father applied for advice and assistance. Captain
Crutchely very willingly consented to receive Mark in his
own vessel, the Rancocus, and promised to make a man
and an officer of him.
The very day Mark first saw the ocean he was sixteen
years old. He had got his height, five feet eleven, and
was strong for his years, and active. In fact, it would not
have been easy to find a lad every way so well adapted
to his new calling, as young Mark Woolston. The
three years of his college life, if they had not made him
a Newton, or a Bacon, had done him no harm, filling his
mind with the germs of ideas that were destined
afterwards
to become extremely useful to him. The young
man was already, indeed, a sort of factotum, being clever
and handy at so many things and in so many different
ways, as early to attract the attention of the officers. Long
before the vessel reached the capes, he was at home in
her, from her truck to her keelson, and Captain Crutchely
remarked to his chief mate, the day they got to sea, that
young Mark Woolston was likely to turn up a trump.
As for Mark himself, he did not lose sight of the land,
for the first time in his life, altogether without regrets.
He had a good deal of feeling in connection with his
parents
,
and his brothers and sisters; but, as it is our aim to
conceal nothing which ought to be revealed, we must add
there was still another who filled his thoughts more than
all the rest united. This person was Bridget Yardley,
the only child of his father's most formidable professional
competitor.
The two physicians were obliged to keep up a sickly
intercourse, not intending a pun. They were too often
called in to consult together, to maintain an open war.
While the heads of their respective families occasionally
met, therefore, at the bed-side of their patients, the families
themselves had no direct communications. It is true, that
Mrs. Woolston and Mrs. Yardley were occasionally to be
seen seated at the same tea-table, taking their hyson in
company, for the recent trade with China had expelled the
bohea from most of the better parlours of the country;
nevertheless, these good ladies could not get to be cordial
with each other. They themselves had a difference on
religious points, that was almost as bitter as the differences
of opinions between their husbands on the subject of
alteratives
.
In that distant day, homopathy, and allopathy,
and hydropathy, and all the opathies, were nearly unknown;
but men could wrangle and abuse each other on medical
points, just as well and as bitterly then, as they do now.
Religion, too, quite as often failed to bear its proper fruits,
in 1793, as it proves barren in these, our own times. On
this subject of religion, we have one word to say, and that
is, simply, that it never was a meet matter for
self-gratulation
and boasting. Here we have the Americo-Anglican
church, just as it has finished a blast of trumpets, through
the medium of numberless periodicals and a thousand
letters
from its confiding if not confident clergy, in honour
of its quiet, and harmony, and superior polity, suspended
on the very brink of the precipice of separation, if not of
schism, and all because it has pleased certain
ultra-sublimated
divines in the other hemisphere, to write a parcel
of tracts that nobody understands, themselves included.
How many even of the ministers of the altar fall, at the
very moment they are beginning to fancy themselves saints,
and are ready to thank God they are not like the
publicans
!
Both Mrs. Woolston and Mrs. Yardley were what is
called `pious;' that is, each said her prayers, each went
to her particular church, and very
particular
churches
they were; each fancied she had a sufficiency of saving
faith, but neither was charitable enough to think, in a very
friendly temper, of the other. This difference of religious
opinion, added to the rival reputations of their husbands,
made these ladies anything but good neighbours, and, as
has been intimated, years had passed since either had
entered
the door of the other.
Very different was the feeling of the children. Anne
Woolston, the oldest sister of Mark, and Bridget Yardley,
were nearly of an age, and they were not only school-mates,
but fast friends. To give their mothers their due, they
did not lessen this intimacy by hints, or intimations of any
sort, but let the girls obey their own tastes, as if satisfied
it was quite sufficient for professors of religion to hate
in their own persons, without entailing the feeling on
posterity
.
Anne and Bridget consequently became warm
friends, the two sweet, pretty young things both believing,
in the simplicity of their hearts, that the very circumstance
which in truth caused the alienation, not to say the hostility
of the elder members of their respective families, viz.
professional
identity, was an additional reason why
they
should
love each other so much the more. The girls were about
two and three years the juniors of Mark, but well grown
for their time of life, and frank and affectionate as
innocence
and warm hearts could make them. Each was more
than pretty, though it was in styles so very different, as
scarcely to produce any of that other sort of rivalry, which
is so apt to occur even in the gentler sex. Anne had
bloom, and features, and fine teeth, and, a charm that is
so very common in America, a good mouth; but Bridget
had all these added to expression. Nothing could be more
soft, gentle and feminine, than Bridget Yardley's
countenance
,
in its ordinary state of rest; or more spirited,
laughing
,
buoyant or pitying than it became, as the different
passions or feelings were excited in her young bosom. As
Mark was often sent to see his sister home, in her frequent
visits to the madam's house, where the two girls held most
of their intercourse, he was naturally enough admitted into
their association. The connection commenced by Mark's
agreeing to be Bridget's brother, as well as Anne's. This
was generous, at least; for Bridget was an only child, and
it was no more than right to repair the wrongs of fortune
in this particular. The charming young thing declared
that she would rather have Mark Woolston for her brother
than any other boy in Bristol; and that it was delightful to
have the same person for a brother as Anne!
Notwithstanding
this flight in the romantic, Bridget Yardley was
as natural as it was possible for a female in a reasonably
civilized condition of society to be. There was a vast
deal of excellent, feminine self-devotion in her
temperament
,
but not a particle of the exaggerated, in either
sentiment
or feeling. True as steel in all her impulses and
opinions, in adopting Mark for a brother she merely yielded
to a strong natural sympathy, without understanding its
tendency or its origin. She would talk by the hour, with
Anne, touching
their
brother, and what they must make
him do, and where he must go with them, and in what
they could oblige him most. The real sister was less active
than her friend, in mind and body, and she listened to all
these schemes and notions with a quiet submission that
was not entirely free from wonder.
The result of all this intercourse was to awaken a feeling
between Mark and Bridget, that was far more profound
than might have been thought in breasts so young, and
which coloured their future lives. Mark first became
conscious of the strength of this feeling when he lost sight
2 *
of the Capes, and fancied the dear little Bucks county girl
he had left behind him, talking with his sister of his own
absence and risks. But Mark had too much of the true
spirit of a sailor in him, to pine, or neglect his duty; and,
long ere the ship had doubled the Cape of Good Hope, he
had become an active and handy lad aloft. When the ship
reached the China seas, he actually took his trick at the
helm.
As was usual in that day, the voyage of the Rancocus
lasted about a twelvemonth. If John Chinaman were only
one-half as active as Jonathan Restless, it might be
disposed
of in about one-fourth less time; but teas are not
transported along the canals of the Celestial Empire with
anything like the rapidity with which wheat was sent to
market over the rough roads of the Great Republic, in the
age of which we are writing.
When Mark Woolston re-appeared in Bristol, after the
arrival of the Rancocus below had been known there
about twenty-four hours, he was the envy of all the lads in
the place, and the admiration of most of the girls. There
he was, a tall, straight, active, well-made, well-grown and
decidedly handsome lad of seventeen, who had doubled
the Cape of Good Hope, seen foreign parts, and had a real
India handkerchief hanging out of each pocket of a blue
round-about of superfine cloth, besides one around his
half-open
well-formed throat, that was carelessly tied in a true
sailor knot! The questions he had to answer, and
did
answer, about whales, Chinese feet, and mountain waves!
Although Bristol lies on a navigable river, up and down
which frigates had actually been seen to pass in the
revolution
,
it was but little that its people knew of the ocean.
Most of the worthy inhabitants of the place actually fancied
that the waves of the sea were as high as mountains, though
their notions of the last were not very precise, there being
no elevations in that part of the country fit even for a
windmill
.
But Mark cared little for these interrogatories. He was
happy; happy enough, at being the object of so much
attention
;
happier still in the bosom of a family of which he
had always been the favourite and was now the pride; and
happiest of all when he half ravished a kiss from the
blushing
cheek of Bridget Yardley. Twelve months had done
a great deal for each of the young couple. If they had not
quite made a man of Mark, they had made him manly, and
his
soi-disant
sister wondered that any one could be so
much improved by a sea-faring life. As for Bridget,
herself
,
she was just bursting into young womanhood,
resentbling
the bud as its leaves of green are opening to permit
those of the deepest rose-coloured tint to be seen, before
they expand into the full-blown flower. Mark was more
than delighted, he was fascinated; and young as they were,
the month he passed at home sufficed to enable him to tell
his passion, and to obtain a half-ready, half-timid
acceptance
of the offer of his hand. All this time, the parents
of these very youthful lovers were as profoundly ignorant
of what was going on, as their children were unobservant
of the height to which professional competition had carried
hostilities between their respective parents. Doctors
Woolston and Yardley no longer met even in consultations;
or, if they did meet in the house of some patient whose
patronage was of too much value to be slighted, it was only
to dispute, and sometimes absolutely to quarrel.
At the end of one short month, however, Mark was once
more summoned to his post on board the Rancocus,
temporarily
putting an end to his delightful interviews with
Bridget. The lovers had made Anne their confidant, and
she, well-meaning girl, seeing no sufficient reason why the
son of one respectable physician should not be a suitable
match for the daughter of another respectable physician,
encouraged them in their vows of constancy, and pledges
to become man and wife at a future, but an early day.
To some persons all this may seem exceedingly improper,
as well as extremely precocious; but the truth compels us
to say, that its impropriety was by no means as obvious as
its precocity. The latter it certainly was, though Mark
had shot up early, and was a man at a time of life when
lads, in less genial climates, scarcely get tails to their coats;
but its impropriety must evidently be measured by the
habits of the state of society in which the parties were
brought up, and by the duties that had been inculcated.
In America, then, as now, but little heed was taken by
parents, more especially in what may be called the middle
classes, concerning the connections thus formed by their
children. So long as the parties were moral, bore good
characters, had nothing particular against them, and were
of something near the same social station, little else was
asked for; or, if more were actually required, it was
usually
when it was too late, and after the young people had
got themselves too deeply in love to allow ordinary
prudential
reasons to have their due force.
Mark went to sea this time, dragging after him a
lengthening chain, but, nevertheless, filled with hope.
His years forbade much despondency, and, while he
remained
as constant as if he had been a next door
neighbour
,
he was buoyant, and the life of the whole crew, after
the first week out. This voyage was not direct to Canton,
like the first; but the ship took a cargo of sugar to
Amsterdam
,
and thence went to London, where she got a
freight for Cadiz. The war of the French Revolution
was now blazing in all the heat of its first fires, and
American
bottoms were obtaining a large portion of the
carrying
trade of the world. Captain Crutchely had orders to
keep the ship in Europe, making the most of her, until a
certain sum in Spanish dollars could be collected, when
he was to fill up with provisions and water, and again
make the best of his way to Canton. In obeying these
instructions, he went from port to port; and, as a sort of
consequence of having Quaker owners, turning his
peaceful
character to great profit, thus giving Mark many
opportunities
of seeing as much of what is called the world,
as can be found in sea-ports. Great, indeed, is the
difference
between places that are merely the marts of commerce,
and those that are really political capitals of large
countries
!
No one can be aware of, or can fully appreciate
the many points of difference that, in reality, exist between
such places, who has not seen each, and that sufficiently
near to be familiar with both. Some places, of which
London is the most remarkable example, enjoy both
characters
;
and, when this occurs, the town gets to possess a
tone that is even less provincial and narrow, if possible,
than that which is to be found in a place that merely
rejoices
in a court. This it is which renders Naples,
insignificant
as its commerce comparatively is, superior to Vi
enna, and Genoa to Florence. While it would be folly to
pretend that Mark, in his situation, obtained the most
accurate
notions imaginable of all he saw and heard, in his
visits to Amsterdam, London, Cadiz, Bordeaux, Marseilles,
Leghorn, Gibraltar, and two or three other ports that might
be mentioned and to which he went, he did glean a good
deal, some of which was useful to him in after-life. He
lost no small portion of the provincial rust of home,
moreover
,
and began to understand the vast difference between
seeing the world and going to meeting and going to
mill.
[3]
[3]
This last phrase has often caused the writer to smile, when
he has heard a countryman say, with a satisfied air, as is so often
the case in this good republic, that such or such a thing here is
good enough for
me;
meaning that he questions if there be
anything
of the sort that is better anywhere else. It was uttered
many years since, by a shrewd Quaker, in West-Chester, who was
contending with a neighbour on a subject that the other
endeavoured
to defend by alluding to the extent of his own observation.
Oh, yes, Josy, answered the Friend, thee 's been to meeting
and thee 's been to mill, and thee knows all about it! America
is full of travellers who have been to meeting and who have been
to mill. This it is which makes it unnecessarily provincial.
In addition to these advantages, Mark was
transferred
from the forecastle to the cabin before the ship
sailed for Canton. The practice of near two years had
made him a very tolerable sailor, and his previous
education
made the study of navigation easy to him. In that
day there was a scarcity of officers in America, and a young
man of Mark's advantages, physical and moral, was certain
to get on rapidly, provided he only behaved well. It is
not at all surprising, therefore, that our young sailor got to
be the second-mate of the Rancocus before he had quite
completed his eighteenth year.
The voyage from London to Canton, and thence home to
Philadelphia, consumed about ten months. The Rancocus
was a fast vessel, but she could not impart her speed to the
Chinamen. It followed that Mark wanted but a few weeks
of being nineteen years old the day his ship passed Cape
May, and, what was more, he had the promise of Captain
Crutchely, of sailing with him, as his first officer, in the next
voyage. With that promise in his mind, Mark hastened
up the river to Bristol, as soon as he was clear of the vessel.
Bridget Yardley had now fairly budded, to pursue the
figure with which we commenced the description of this
blooming flower, and, if not actually expanded into perfect
womanhood, was so near it as to show beyond all question
that the promises of her childhood were to be very amply
redeemed. Mark found her in black, however; or, in
mourning for her mother. An only child, this serious loss
had thrown her more than ever in the way of Anne, the
parents on both sides winking at an association that could
do no harm, and which might prove so useful. It was
very different, however, with the young sailor. He had
not been a fortnight at home, and getting to be intimate
with the roof-tree of Doctor Yardley, before that person
saw fit to pick a quarrel with him, and to forbid him his
house. As the dispute was wholly gratuitous on the part
of the Doctor, Mark behaving with perfect propriety on the
occasion, it may be well to explain its real cause. The
fact was, that Bridget was an heiress; if not on a very
large scale, still an heiress, and, what was more,
unalterably
so in right of her mother; and the thought that a son
of his competitor, Doctor Woolston, should profit by this
fact, was utterly insupportable to him. Accordingly he
quarrelled with Mark, the instant he was apprised of the
character of his attentions, and forbade him the house.
To do Mark justice, he knew nothing of Bridget's worldly
possessions. That she was beautiful, and warm-hearted,
and frank, and sweet-tempered, and feminine, and
affectionate
,
he both saw and felt; but beyond this he neither
saw anything, nor cared about seeing anything. The
young sailor was as profoundly ignorant that Bridget was
the actual owner of certain three per cents. that brought
twelve hundred a year, as if she did not own a `copper,'
as it was the fashion of that period to say, `
cents
' being then
very little, if at all, used. Nor did he know anything of
the farm she had inherited from her mother, or of the store
in town, that brought three hundred and fifty more in rent.
It is true that some allusions were made to these matters
by Doctor Yardley, in his angry comments on the
Wool-ston
family generally, Anne always excepted, and in whose
favour he made a salvo, even in the height of his
denunciations
.
Still, Mark thought so much of that which was
really estimable and admirable in Bridget, and so little of
anything mercenary, that even after these revelations he
could not comprehend the causes of Doctor Yardley's harsh
treatment of him. During the whole scene, which was
purposely enacted in the presence of his wondering and
trembling daughter, Mark behaved perfectly well. He had
a respect for the Doctor's years, as well as for Bridget's
father, and would not retort. After waiting as long as he
conceived waiting could be of any use, he seized his hat,
and left the room with an air of resentment that Bridget
construed into the expression of an intention never to speak
to any of them again. But Mark Woolston was governed
by no such design, as the sequel will show.
CHAPTER II.
She 's not fourteen.
I 'll lay fourteen of my teeth,
And yet, to my teen be it spoken, I have but four,
She is not fourteen.
Romeo and Juliet
.
Divine
wisdom has commanded us to Honour your
father and your mother. Observant travellers affirm that
less respect is paid to parents in America, than is usual in
Christian nationswe say
Christian
nations; for many of
the heathen, the Chinese for instance, worship them, though
probably with an allegorical connection that we do not
understand. That the parental tie is more loose in this
country than in most others we believe, and there is a
reason
to be found for it in the migratory habits of the people,
and in the general looseness in all the ties that connect
men with the past. The laws on the subject of matrimony,
moreover, are so very lax, intercourse is so simple and has
so many facilities, and the young of the two sexes are left
so much to themselves, that it is no wonder children form
that connection so often without reflection and contrary to
the wishes of their friends. Still, the law of God is there,
and we are among those who believe that a neglect of its
mandates is very apt to bring its punishment, even in this
world, and we are inclined to think that much of that
which Mark and Bridget subsequently suffered, was in
consequence of acting directly in the face of the wishes
and injunctions of their parents.
The scene which had taken place under the roof of
Doctor Yardley was soon known under that of Doctor
Woolston. Although the last individual was fully aware
that Bridget was what was then esteemed rich, at Bristol,
he cared not for her money. The girl he liked well enough,
and in secret even admired her as much as he could find
it in his heart to admire anything of Doctor Yardley's; but
the indignity was one he was by no means inclined to
overlook
,
and, in his turn, he forbade all intercourse between
the girls. These two bitter pills, thus administered by the
village doctors to their respective patients, made the young
people very miserable. Bridget loved Anne almost as
much as she loved Mark, and she began to pine and alter
in her appearance, in a way to alarm her father. In order
to divert her mind, he sent her to town, to the care of an
aunt, altogether forgetting that Mark's ship lay at the
wharves of Philadelphia, and that he could not have sent
his daughter to any place, out of Bristol, where the young
man would be so likely to find her. This danger the good
doctor entirely overlooked, or, if he thought of it at all, he
must have fancied that his sister would keep a sharp eye
on the movements of the young sailor, and forbid him
her
house, too.
Everything turned out as the Doctor ought to have
expected
.
When Mark joined his ship, of which he was now
the first officer, he sought Bridget and found her. The
aunt, however, administered to him the second potion of
the same dose that her brother had originally dealt out,
and gave him to understand that his presence in Front
street was not desired. This irritated both the young
people, Bridget being far less disposed to submit to her
aunt than to her father, and they met clandestinely in the
streets. A week or two of this intercourse brought
matters
to a crisis, and Bridget consented to a private
marriage
.
The idea of again going to sea, leaving his
betrothed
entirely in the hands of those who disliked him for
his father's sake, was intolerable to Mark, and it made him
so miserable, that the tenderness of the deeply enamoured
girl could not withstand his appeals. They agreed to get
married, but to keep their union a secret until Mark should
become of age, when it was hoped he would be in a
condition
,
in every point of view, openly to claim his wife.
A thing of this sort, once decided on, is easily enough
put in execution in America. Among Mark's college
friends was one who was a few years older than himself,
and who had entered the ministry. This young man was
then acting as a sort of missionary among the seamen of
the port, and he had fallen in the way of the young lover
the very first day of his return to his ship. It was an easy
matter to work on the good nature of this easy-minded
man, who, on hearing of the ill treatment offered to his
friend, was willing enough to perform the ceremony.
Everything being previously arranged, Mark and Bridget
were married, early one morning, during the time the latter
was out, in company with a female friend of about her own
age, to take what her aunt believed was her customary
walk before breakfast. Philadelphia, in 1796, was not the
town it is to-day. It then lay, almost entirely, on the
shores of the Delaware, those of the Schuylkill being
completely
in the country. What was more, the best quarters
were still near the river, and the distance between the
Rancocusmeaning Mark's ship, and not the creek of
that nameand the house of Bridget's aunt, was but
trifling
.
The ceremony took place in the cabin of the vessel
just named, which, now that the captain was ashore in his
own house, Mark had all to himself, no second-mate having
been shipped, and which was by no means an inappropriate
place for the nuptials of a pair like that which our young
people turned out to be, in the end.
The Rancocus, though not a large, was a very fine,
Philadelphia-built ship, then the best vessels of the
country
.
She was of a little less than four hundred tons in
measurement, but she had a very neat and commodious
poop-cabin. Captain Crutchely had a thrifty wife, who
had contributed her full share to render her husband
comfortable
,
Vol. I.  3
and Bridget thought that the room in which she
was united to Mark was one of the prettiest she had ever
seen. The reader, however, is not to imagine it a cabin
ornamented with marble columns, rose-wood, and the
maples
,
as so often happens now-a-days. No such
extravagance
was dreamed of fifty years ago; but, as far as
judicious
arrangements, neat joiner's work, and appropriate
furniture went, the cabin of the Rancocus was a very
respectable
little room. The circumstance that it was on
deck, contributed largely to its appearance and comfort,
sunken cabins, or those below decks, being necessarily
much circumscribed in small ships, in consequence of
being placed in a part of the vessel that is contracted in
its dimensions under water, in order to help their sailing
qualities.
The witnesses of the union of our hero and heroine were
the female friend of Bridget named, the officiating
clergyman
,
and one seaman who had sailed with the bridegroom
in all his voyages, and who was now retained on board the
vessel as a ship-keeper, intending to go out in her again,
as soon as she should be ready for sea. The name of this
mariner was Betts, or Bob Betts as he was commonly
called; and as he acts a conspicuous part in the events to
be recorded, it may be well to say a word or two more of
his history and character. Bob Betts was a Jerseyman;
or, as he would have pronounced the word himself, a
Jarseyman
in
the American meaning of the word, however,
and not in the English. Bob was born in Cape May
county, and in the
State
of New Jersey, United States of
America. At the period of which we are now writing, he
must have been about five-and-thirty, and seemingly a
confirmed
bachelor. The windows of Bob's father's house
looked out upon the Atlantic Ocean, and he snuffed sea
air from the hour of his birth. At eight years of age he
was placed, as cabin-boy, on board a coaster; and from
that time down to the moment when he witnessed the
marriage
ceremony between Mark and Bridget, he had been a
sailor. Throughout the whole war of the revolution Bob
had served in the navy, in some vessel or other, and with
great good luck, never having been made a prisoner of
war. In connection with this circumstance was one of
the besetting weaknesses of his character. As often
happens
to men of no very great breadth of views, Bob had a
notion that that which he had so successfully escaped, viz.
captivity, other men too might have escaped had they been
equally as clever. Thus it was that he had an ill-concealed,
or only half-concealed contempt for such seamen as suffered
themselves, at any time or under any circumstances, to fall
into the enemies' hands. On all other subjects Bob was
not only rational, but a very discreet and shrewd fellow,
though on that he was often harsh, and sometimes absurd.
But the best men have their weakness, and this was Bob
Bett's.
Captain Crutchely had picked up Bob, just after the
peace of 1783, and had kept him with him ever since. It
was to Bob that he had committed the instruction of Mark,
when the latter first joined the ship, and from Bob the
youth had got his earliest notions of seamanship. In his
calling Bob was full of resources, and, as often happens
with the American sailor, he was even handy at a great
many other things, and particularly so with whatever
related
to practical mechanics. Then he was of vast
physical
force, standing six feet two, in his stockings, and was
round-built and solid. Bob had one sterling qualityhe
was as fast a friend as ever existed. In this respect he
was a model of fidelity, never seeing a fault in those he
loved, or a good quality in those he disliked. His
attachment
to Mark was signal, and he looked on the promotion
of the young man much as he would have regarded
preferment
that befel himself. In the last voyage he had told
the people in the forecastle That young Mark Woolston
would make a thorough sea-dog in time, and now he had
got to be
Mr.
Woolston, he expected great things of him.
The happiest day of my life will be that on which I can
ship in a craft commanded by
Captain
Mark Woolston.
I teached him, myself, how to break the first sea-biscuit he
ever tasted, and next day he could do it as well as any on
us! You see how handy and quick he is about a vessel's
decks, shipmates; a ra'al rouser at a weather earin'well,
when he first come aboard here, and that was little more
than two years ago, the smell of tar would almost make
him swound away. The latter assertion was one of Bob's
embellishments, for Mark was never either lackadaisical
or very delicate. The young man cordially returned Bob's
regard, and the two were sincere friends without any
phrases on the subject.
Bob Betts was the only male witness of the marriage
between Mark Woolston and Bridget Yardley, with the
exception of the officiating clergyman; as Mary Bromley
was the only female. Duplicate certificates, however, were
given to the young couple, Mark placing his in his
writing-desk
,
and Bridget hers in the bosom of her dress.
Five minutes after the ceremony was ended, the whole
party separated, the girls returning to their respective
residences
,
and the clergyman going his way, leaving the
mate and the ship-keeper together on the vessel's deck.
The latter did not speak, so long as he saw the
bridegroom's
eyes fastened on the light form of the bride, as the
latter went swiftly up the retired wharf where the ship was
lying, on her way to Front street, accompanied by her
young friend. But, no sooner had Bridget turned a
corner
,
and Bob saw that the attraction was no longer in view,
than he thought it becoming to put in a word.
A trim-built and light-sailing craft, Mr. Woolston,
he said, turning over the quid in his mouth; one of these
days she 'll make a noble vessel to command.
She is my captain, and ever will be, Bob, returned
Mark. But you 'll be silent concerning what has
passed.
Ay, ay, sir. It is not my business to keep a log for
all the women in the country to chatter about, like so many
monkeys that have found a bag of nuts. But what was
the meaning of the parson's saying, `with all my worldly
goods I thee endow'does that make you any richer, or
any poorer, sir?
Neither, answered Mark, smiling. It leaves me
just where I was, Bob, and where I am likely to be for
some time to come, I fear.
And has the young woman nothing herself, sir?
Sometimes
a body picks up a comfortable chest-full with these
sort of things, as they tell me, sir.
I believe Bridget is as poor as I am myself, Bob, and
that is saying all that can be said on such a point.
However
,
l 've secured her now, and two years hence I 'll claim
her, if she has not a second gown to wear. I dare say the
old man will be for turning her adrift with as little as
possible
.
All this was a proof of Mark's entire disinterestedness.
He did not know that his young bride had quite thirty
thousand dollars in reversion, or in one sense in possession,
although she could derive no benefit from it until she was
of age, or married, and past her eighteenth year. This
fact her husband did not learn for several days after his
marriage, when his bride communicated it to him, with a
proposal that he should quit the sea and remain with her
for life. Mark was very much in love, but this scheme
scarce afforded him the satisfaction that one might have
expected. He was attached to his profession, and scarce
relished the thought of being dependent altogether on his
wife for the means of subsistence. The struggle between
love and pride was great, but Mark, at length, yielded to
Bridget's blandishments, tenderness and tears. They could
only meet at the house of Mary Bromley, the bride's-maid,
but then the interviews between them were as frequent as
Mark's duty would allow. The result was that Bridget
prevailed, and the young husband went up to Bristol and
candidly related all that had passed, thus revealing, in less
than a week, a secret which it was intended should remain
hid for at least two years.
Doctor Woolston was sorely displeased, at first; but the
event had that about it which would be apt to console a
parent. Bridget was not only young, and affectionate, and
beautiful, and truthful; but, according to the standard of
Bristol, she was rich. There was consolation in all this,
notwithstanding professional rivalry and personal dislikes.
We are not quite certain that he did not feel a slight
gratification
at the thought of his son's enjoying the fortune
which his rival had received from his wife, and which, but
for the will of the grandfather, would have been enjoyed
by that rival himself. Nevertheless, the good Doctor did
his duty in the premises. He communicated the news of
the marriage to Doctor Yardley in a very civilly-worded
note, which left a fair opening for a settlement of all
difficulties
,
had the latter been so pleased. The latter did not
3 *
so please, however, but exploded in a terrible burst of
passion
,
which almost carried him off in a fit of apoplexy.
Escaping all physical dangers, in the end, Doctor
Yardley
went immediately to Philadelphia, and brought his
daughter home. Both Mark and Bridget now felt that
they had offended against one of the simplest commands
of God. They had
not
honoured their father and their
mother, and even thus early came the consciousness of
their offence. It was in Mark's power, however, to go and
claim his wife, and remove her to his father's house,
notwithstanding
his minority and that of Bridget. In this last
respect, the law offered no obstacle; but the discretion of
Doctor Woolston did. This gentleman, through the agency
of a common friend, had an interview with his competitor,
and they talked the matter over in a tolerably composed
and reasonable temper. Both the parents, as medical men,
agreed that it would be better that the young couple should
not live together for two or three years, the very tender
age of Bridget, in particular, rendering this humane, as
well as discreet. Nothing was said of the fortune, which
mollified Doctor Yardley a good deal, since he would be
left to manage it, or at least to receive the income so long
as no legal claimant interfered with his control. Elderly
gentlemen submit very easily to this sort of influence.
Then, Doctor Woolston was exceedingly polite, and spoke
to his rival of a difficult case in his own practice, as if
indirectly
to ask an opinion of his competitor. All this
contributed
to render the interview more amicable than had
been hoped, and the parties separated, if not friends, at
least with an understanding on the subject of future
proceedings
.
It was decided that Mark should continue in the
Rancocus
for another voyage. It was known the ship was to
proceed to some of the islands of the Pacific, in quest of
a cargo of sandal-wood and bche-l-mar, for the Chinese
market, and that her next absence from home would be
longer, even, than her last. By the time the vessel
returned
,
Mark would be of age, and fit to command a ship
himself, should it be thought expedient for him to continue
in his profession. During the period the vessel still
remained
in port, Mark was to pay occasional visits to his
wife, though not to live with her; but the young couple
might correspond by letter, as often as they pleased. Such
was an outline of the treaty made between the high
contracting
parties.
In making these arrangements, Doctor Yardley was
partly influenced by a real paternal interest in the welfare
of his daughter, who he thought altogether too young to
enter on the duties and cares of the married life. Below
the surface, however, existed an indefinite hope that
something
might yet occur to prevent the consummation of this
most unfortunate union, as he deemed the marriage to be,
and thus enable him to get rid of the hateful connection
altogether. How this was to happen, the worthy doctor
certainly did not know. This was because he lived in
1796, instead of in 1847. Now-a-days, nothing is easier
than to separate a man from his wife, unless it be to obtain
civic honours for a murderer. Doctor Yardley, at the
present moment, would have coolly gone to work to get
up a lamentable tale about his daughter's fortune, and
youth, and her not knowing her own mind when she
married
,
and a ship's cabin, and a few other embellishments
of that sort, when the worthy and benevolent statesmen
who compose the different legislatures of this vast Union
would have been ready to break their necks, in order to
pass a bill of divorce. Had there been a child or two, it
would have made no great difference, for means would
have been devised to give the custody of them to the
mother
.
This would have been done, quite likely, for the
first five years of the lives of the dear little things, because
the children would naturally require a mother's care; and
afterwards, because the precocious darlings, at the mature
age of seven, would declare, in open court, that they really
loved `ma' more than they did `pa!' To write a little
plainly on a very important subject, we are of opinion that
a new name ought to be adopted for the form of
government
which is so fast creeping into this country. New
things require new names; and, were Solomon now living,
we will venture to predict two things of him, viz. he would
change his mind on the subject of novelties, and he would
never go to congress. As for the new name, we would
respectfully suggest that of Gossipian, in lieu of that of
Republican, gossip fast becoming the lever that moves
everything in the land. The newspapers, true to their
instincts of consulting the ruling tastes, deal much more
in gossip than they deal in reason; the courts admit it as
evidence; the juries receive it as fact, as well as the law;
and as for the legislatures, let a piteous tale but circulate
freely in the lobbies, and bearded men, like Juliet when a
child, as described by her nurse, will stint and cry, ay!
In a word, principles and proof are in much less esteem
than assertions and numbers, backed with enough of which,
anything may be made to appear as legal, or even
constitutional
.
But neither of our doctors entered into all these matters.
It was enough for them that the affair of the marriage was
disposed of, for a time at least, and things were permitted
to drop into their ancient channels. The intercourse
between
Bridget and Anne was renewed, just as if nothing
had happened, and Mark's letters to his virgin bride were
numerous, and filled with passion. The ship was `taking
in,' and he could only leave her late on Saturday afternoons,
but each Sunday he contrived to pass in Bristol. On such
occasions he saw his charming wife at church, and he
walked with her in the fields, along with Anne and a
facoured
admirer of hers, of an afternoon, returning to town
in season to be at his post on the opening of the hatches,
of a Monday morning.
In less than a month after the premature marriage
between
Mark Woolston and Bridget Yardley, the Rancocus
cleared for the Pacific and Canton. The bridegroom
found one day to pass in Bristol, and Doctor Yardley so
far pitied his daughter's distress, as to consent that the
two girls should go to town, under his own care, and see
the young man off. This concession was received with
the deepest gratitude, and made the young people
momentarily
very happy. The doctor even consented to visit the
ship, which Captain Crutchely, laughing, called St. Mark's
chapel, in consequence of the religious rite which had
been performed on board her. Mrs. Crutchely was there,
on the occasion of this visit, attending to her husband's
comforts, by fitting curtains to his berth, and looking after
matters in general in the cabin; and divers jokes were
ventured by the honest ship-master, in making his
comments
on, and in giving his opinion of the handy-work of
his own consort. He made Bridget blush more than once,
though her enduring tenderness in behalf of Mark induced
her to sit out all the captain's wit, rather than shorten a
visit so precious, one moment.
The final parting was an hour of bitter sorrow. Even
Mark's young heart, manly, and much disposed to do his
duty as he was, was near breaking; while Bridget almost
dissolved in tears. They could not but think how long
that separation was to last, though they did not anticipate
by what great and mysterious events it was to be prolonged.
It was enough for them that they were to live asunder two
whole years; and two whole years appear like an age, to
those who have not yet lived their four lustrums. But the
final moment must and did arrive, and the young people
were compelled to tear themselves asunder, though the
parting was like that of soul and body. The bride hung
on the bridegroom's neck, as the tendril clings to its
support
,
until removed by gentle violence.
Bridget did not give up her hold upon Mark so long as
even his vessel remained in sight. She went with Anne,
in a carriage, as low as the Point, and saw the Rancocus
pass swiftly down the river, on this its fourth voyage,
bearing
those in her who as little dreamed of their fate, as the
unconscious woods and metals, themselves, of which the
ship was constructed. Mark felt his heart beat, when he
saw a woman's handkerchief waving to him from the shore,
and a fresh burst of tenderness nearly unmanned him,
when, by the aid of the glass, he recognised the sweet
countenance and fairy figure of Bridget. Ten minutes
later, distance and interposing objects separated that young
couple for many a weary day!
A few days at sea restored the equanimity of Mark's
feelings, while the poignant grief of Bridget did not fail to
receive the solace which time brings to sorrows of every
degree and nature. They thought of each other often, and
tenderly; but, the pain of parting over, they both began
to look forward to the joys of meeting, with the buoyancy
and illusions that hope is so apt to impart to the bosoms
of the young and inexperienced. Little did either dream
of what was to occur before their eyes were to be again
gladdened with the sight of their respective forms.
Mark found in his state-roomfor, in the Rancocus,
the cabin was fitted with four neat little state-rooms, one
for the captain, and two for the mates, with a fourth for
the supercargomany proofs of Bridget's love and care.
Mrs. Crutchely, herself, though so much longer experienced,
had scarcely looked after the captain's comfort with more
judgment, and certainly not with greater solicitude, than
this youthful bride had expended on her bridegroom's
room. In that day, artists were not very numerous in
America, nor is it very probable that Doctor Yardley would
have permitted his daughter to take so decided a step as
to sit for her miniature for Mark's possession; but she had
managed to get her profile cut, and to have it framed, and
the mate discovered it placed carefully among his effects,
when only a week out. From this profile Mark derived
the greatest consolation. It was a good one, and Bridget
happened to have a face that would tell in that sort of
thing, so that the husband had no difficulty in recognising
the wife, in this little image. There it was, with the very
pretty slight turn of the head to one side, that in Bridget
was both natural and graceful. Mark spent hours in gazing
at and in admiring this inanimate shadow of his bride,
which never failed to recall to him all her grace, and
nature
,
and tenderness and love, though it could not convey
any direct expression of her animation and spirit.
It is said ships have no Sundays. The meaning of this
is merely that a vessel must perform her work, week-days
and sabbaths, day and night, in fair or foul. The
Rancocus
formed no exception to the rule, and on she travelled,
having a road before her that it would require months ere
the end of it could be found. It is not our intention to
dwell on the details of this long voyage, for two reasons.
One is the fact that most voyages to the southern extremity
of the American continent are marked by the same
incidents
;
and the other is, that we have much other matter
to relate, that must be given with great attention to
minuti
,
and which we think will have much more interest
with the reader.
Captain Crutchely touched at Rio for supplies, as is
customary; and, after passing a week in that most
delightful
of all havens, went his way. The passage round the
Horn was remarkable neither way. It could not be called
a very boisterous one, neither was the weather unusually
mild. Ships do double this cape, occasionally, under their
top-gallant-sails, and we have heard of one vessel that did
not furl her royals for several days, while off that
formidable
head-land; but these cases form the exception and not
the rule. The Rancocus was under close-reefed topsails
for the better part of a fortnight, in beating to the
southward
and westward, it blowing very fresh the whole time;
and she might have been twice as long struggling with the
south-westerly gales, but for the fortunate circumstance of
the winds veering so far to the southward as to permit her
to lay her course, when she made a great run to the
westward
.
When the wind again hauled, as haul it was almost
certain to do, Captain Crutchely believed himself in a
meridian
that would admit of his running with an easy
bowline
,
on the larboard tack. No one but a sailor can
understand
the effect of checking the weather-braces, if it be
only for a few feet, and of getting a weather-leach to stand
without `swigging out' on its bowline. It has much the
same influence on the progress of a ship, that an eloquent
speech has on the practice of an advocate, a great cure or
a skilful operation on that of a medical man, or a lucky
hit in trade on the fortunes of the young merchant. Away
all go alike, if not absolutely with flowing sheets, easily,
swiftly, and with less of labour than was their wont. Thus
did it now prove with the good ship Rancocus. Instead
of struggling hard with the seas to get three knots ahead,
she now made her six, and kept all, or nearly all, she
made. When she saw the land again, it was found there
was very little to spare, but that little sufficed. The vessel
passed to windward of everything, and went on her way
rejoicing, like any other that had been successful in a hard
and severe struggle. A fortnight later, the ship touched
at Valparaiso.
The voyage of the Rancocus may now be said to have
commenced in earnest. Hitherto she had done little but
make her way across the endless waste of waters; but
now she had the real business before her to execute. A
considerable amount of freight, which had been brought
on account of the Spanish government, was discharged,
and the vessel filled up her water. Certain supplies of food
that was deemed useful in cases of scurvy, were obtained,
and after a delay of less than a fortnight, the ship once
more put to sea.
In the year 1796 the Pacific Ocean was by no means as
familiar to navigators as it is to-day. Cooke had made his
celebrated voyages less than twenty years before, and the
accounts of them were then before the world; but even
Cooke left a great deal to be ascertained, more especially
in the way of details. The first inventor, or discoverer of
anything, usually gains a great name, though it is those
who come after him that turn his labours to account. Did
we know no more of America to-day than was known to
Columbus, our knowledge would be very limited, and the
benefits of his vast enterprise still in their infancy.
Compared with its extent, perhaps, and keeping in view
its ordinary weather, the Pacific can hardly be considered
a dangerous sea; but he who will cast his eyes over its
chart, will at once ascertain how much more numerous are
its groups, islands, rocks, shoals and reefs, than those of
the Atlantic. Still, the mariners unhesitatingly steered out
into its vast waters, and none with less reluctance and
fewer doubts than those of America.
For nearly two months did Captain Crutchely, after
quitting Valparaiso, hold his way into the depths of that
mighty sea, in search of the islands he had been directed
to find. Sandal-wood was his aim, a branch of commerce,
by the way, which ought never to be pursued by any
Christian
man, or Christian nation, if what we hear of its uses
in China be true. There, it is said to be burned as incense
before idols, and no higher offence can be committed by
any human being than to be principal, or accessary, in any
manner or way, to the substitution of any created thing for
the ever-living God. In after-life Mark Woolston often
thought of this, when reflection succeeded to action, and
when he came to muse on the causes which may have led
to his being the subject of the wonderful events that
occurred
in connection with his own fortunes. We have
now reached a part of our narrative, however, when it
becomes
necessary to go into details, which we shall defer to
the commencement of a new chapter.
CHAPTER III.
God of the dark and heavy deep!
The waves lie sleeping on the sands,
Till the fierce trumpet of the storm
Hath summon'd up their thundering bands;
Then the white sails are dashed like foam,
Or hurry trembling o'er the seas,
Till calmed by thee, the sinking gale
Serenely breathes, Depart in peace.
Peabody
.
The
day that preceded the night of which we are about
to speak, was misty, with the wind fresh at
east-south-east
.
The Rancocus was running off, south-west, and
consequently
was going with the wind free. Captain
Crutchely
had one failing, and it was a very bad one for a
ship-master
;
he would drink rather too much grog, at his dinner.
At all other times he might have been called a sober man;
but, at dinner, he would gulp down three or four glasses
of rum and water. In that day rum was much used in
America, far more than brandy; and every dinner-table,
that had the smallest pretension to be above that of the
mere labouring man, had at least a bottle of one of these
liquors on it. Wine was not commonly seen at the
cabin-table
;
or, if seen, it was in those vessels that had recently
been in the vine-growing countries, and on special
occasions
.
Captain Crutchely was fond of the pleasures of the
table in another sense. His eating was on a level with his
drinking; and for pigs, and poultry, and vegetables that
would keep at sea, his ship was always a little
remarkable
.
On the day in question, it happened to be the birthday
of Mrs. Crutchely, and the captain had drunk even a little
more than common. Now, when a man is in the habit of
drinking rather more than is good for him, an addition of
a little more than common is very apt to upset him. Such,
in sober truth, was the case with the commander of the
Vol. I.  4
Rancocus, when he left the dinner-table, at the time to
which there is particular allusion. Mark, himself, was
perfectly sober. The taste of rum was unpleasant to him,
nor did his young blood and buoyant spirits crave its effects.
If he touched it at all, it was in very small quantities, and
greatly diluted with water. He saw the present condition
of his superior, therefore, with regret; and this so much
the more, from the circumstance that an unpleasant report
was prevailing in the ship, that white water had been seen
ahead, during a clear moment, by a man who had just
come from aloft. This report the mate repeated to the
captain, accompanying it with a suggestion that it might
be well to shorten sail, round-to, and sound. But Captain
Crutchely treated the report with no respect, swearing
that the men were always fancying they were going ashore
on coral, and that the voyage would last for ever, did he
comply with all their conceits of this nature.
Unfortunately
,
the second-mate was an old sea-dog, who owed his
present inferior condition to his being a great deal addicted
to the practice in which his captain indulged only a little,
and he had been sharing largely in the hospitality of the
cabin that afternoon, it being his watch below. This man
supported the captain in his contempt for the rumours and
notions of the crew, and between them Mark found
himself
silenced.
Our young officer felt very uneasy at the account of the
sailor who had reported white water ahead, for he was one
of the best men in the ship, and altogether unlikely to say
that which was not true. It being now six o'clock in the
evening, and the second-mate having taken charge of the
watch, Mark went up into the fore-top-gallant cross-trees
himself, in order to get the best look ahead that he could
before the night set in. It wanted but half an hour, or so,
of sunset, when the young man took his station in the
cross-trees, the royal not being set. At first, he could
discern nothing ahead, at a distance greater than a mile,
on account of the mist; but, just as the sun went below
the waters it lighted up to the westward, and Mark then
plainly saw what he was perfectly satisfied must be
breakers
,
extending for several miles directly across the vessel's
track!
Such a discovery required decision, and the young man
shouted out
Breakers ahead!
This cry, coming from his first officer, startled even
Captain Crutchely, who was recovering a little from the
effect of his potations, though it was still treated with
contempt
by the second-mate, who had never forgiven one as
young as Mark, for getting a berth that he fancied due to
his own greater age and experience. He laughed openly
at this second report of breakers, at a point in the ocean
where the chart laid down a clear sea; but the captain
knew that the charts could only tell him what was known
at the time they were made, and he felt disposed to treat
his first officer, young as he was, with more respect than
the second-mate. All hands were called in consequence,
and sail was shortened. Mark came down to assist in this
duty, while Captain Crutchely himself went aloft to look
out for the breakers. They passed each other in the top,
the latter desiring his mate to bring the ship by the wind,
on the larboard tack, or with her head to the southward,
as soon as he had the sail sufficiently reduced to do so with
safety.
For a few minutes after he reached the deck, Mark was
fully employed in executing his orders. Sail was shortened
with great rapidity, the men working with zeal and alarm,
for they believed their messmate when the captain had not.
Although the vessel was under top-mast studding-sails when
the command to take in the canvas was given, it was not
long before Mark had her under her three topsails, and
these with two reefs in them, and the ship on an easy
bowline, with her head to the southward. When all this
was done the young man felt a good deal of relief, for the
danger he had seen was ahead, and this change of course
brought it nearly abeam. It is true, the breakers were
still to leeward, and insomuch most dangerously situated;
but the wind did not blow strong enough to prevent the
ship from weathering them, provided time was taken by
the forelock. The Rancocus was a good, weatherly ship,
nor was there sufficient sea on to make it at all difficult
for her to claw off a lee shore. Desperate indeed is the
situation of the vessel that has rocks or sands under her
lee, with the gale blowing in her teeth, and heavy seas
sending her bodily, and surely, however slowly, on the
very breakers she is struggling to avoid! Captain
Crutchely
had not been aloft five minutes before he hailed the
deck, and ordered Mark to send Bob Betts up to the
cross-trees
.
Bob had the reputation of being the brightest
look-out
in the vessel, and was usually employed when land
was about to be approached, or a sail was expected to be
made. He went up the fore-rigging like a squirrel, and
was soon at the captain's side, both looking anxiously to
leeward. A few minutes after the ship had hauled by the
wind, both came down, stopping in the top, however, to
take one more look to leeward.
The second-mate stood waiting the further descent of
the captain, with a sort of leering look of contempt on his
hard, well-dyed features, which seemed to anticipate that
it would soon be known that Mark's white water had lost
its colour, and become blue water once more. But
Captain
Crutchely did not go as far as this, when he got down.
He admitted that he had seen nothing that he could very
decidedly say was breakers, but that, once or twice, when
it lighted up a little, there had been a gleaming along the
western horizon which a good deal puzzled him. It might
be white water, or it might be only the last rays of the
setting sun tipping the combs of the regular seas. Bob
Betts, too, was as much at fault as his captain, and a
sarcastic
remark or two of Hillson, the second-mate, were
fast bringing Mark's breakers into discredit.
Jest look at the chart, Captain Crutchely, put in
Hillsona regular Tower Hill chart as ever was made,
and you 'll see there
can
be no white water hereabouts.
If a man is to shorten sail and haul his wind, at every dead
whale he falls in with, in these seas, his owners will have
the balance on the wrong side of the book at the end of
the v'y'ge!
This told hard against Mark, and considerably in
Hillson's
favour.
And could
you
see nothing of breakers ahead, Bob?
demanded Mark, with an emphasis on the `
you
' which
pretty plainly implied that the young man was not so much
surprised that the captain had not seen them.
Not a bit of it, Mr. Woolston, answered Bob,
hitching
up his trowsers, and I 'd a pretty good look ahead,
too.
This made still more against Mark, and Captain
Crutchely
sent for the chart. Over this map he and the
second-mate
pondered with a sort of muzzy sagacity, when they
came to the conclusion that a clear sea
must
prevail around
them, in all directions, for a distance exceeding a thousand
miles. A great deal is determined in any case of a
dilemma
,
when it is decided that this or that fact
must
be so.
Captain Crutchely would not have arrived at this positive
conclusion so easily, had not his reasoning powers been so
much stimulated by his repeated draughts of rum and
water, that afternoon; all taken, as he said and believed,
not so much out of love for the beverage itself, as out of
love for Mrs. John Crutchely. Nevertheless, our captain
was accustomed to take care of a ship, and he was not yet
in a condition to forget all his duties, in circumstances so
critical. As Mark solemnly and steadily repeated his own
belief that there were breakers ahead, he so far yielded to
the opinions of his youthful chief-mate as to order the
deep-sea
up, and to prepare to sound.
This operation of casting the deep-sea lead is not done
in a moment, but, on board a merchant vessel, usually
occupies from a quarter of an hour to twenty minutes.
The ship must first be hove-to, and her way ought to be
as near lost as possible before the cast is made. Then the
getting along of the line, the stationing of the men, and
the sounding and hauling in again, occupy a good many
minutes. By the time it was all over, on this occasion, it
was getting to be night. The misty, drizzling weather
threatened to make the darkness intense, and Mark felt
more and more impressed with the danger in which the
ship was placed.
The cast of the lead produced no other result than the
certainty that bottom was not to be found with four
hundred
fathoms of line out. No one, however, not even the
muzzy Hillson, attached much importance to this fact,
inasmuch
as it was known that the coral reefs often rise like
perpendicular walls, in the ocean, having no bottom to be
found within a cable's-length of them. Then Mark did
4 *
not believe the ship to be within three leagues of the
breakers he had seen, for they had seemed, both to him
and to the seaman who had first reported them, to be
several leagues distant. One on an elevation like that of
the top-gallant cross-trees, could see a long way, and the
white water had appeared to Mark to be on the very verge
of the western horizon, even as seen from his lofty
look-out
.
After a further consultation with his officers, during
which Hillson had not spared his hits at his less
experienced
superior, Captain Crutchely came to a decision,
which might be termed semi-prudent. There is nothing
that a seaman more dislikes than to be suspected of
extranervousness
on the subject of doubtful dangers of this sort.
Seen and acknowledged, he has no scruples about doing
his best to avoid them; but so long as there is an
uncertainty
connected with their existence at all, that miserable
feeling of vanity which renders us all so desirous to be
more than nature ever intended us for, inclines most men
to appear indifferent even while they dread. The wisest
thing Captain Crutchely could have done, placed in the
circumstances in which he now found himself, would have
been to stand off and on, under easy canvas, until the
return
of light, when he might have gone ahead on his course
with some confidence, and a great deal more of safety.
But there would have been an air of concession to the
power of an unknown danger that conflicted with his pride,
in such a course, and the old and well-tried ship-master
did not like to give the `uncertain' this advantage over
him. He decided therefore to stand on, with his topsails
reefed, keeping bright look-outs ahead, and having his
courses in the brails, ready for getting the tacks down to
claw off to windward, should it prove to be necessary.
With this plan Mark was compelled to comply, there being
no appeal from the decrees of the autocrat of the
quarter-deck
.
As soon as the decision of Captain Crutchely was made,
the helm was put up, and the ship kept off to her course.
It was true, that under double-reefed topsails, and jib,
which was all the canvas set, there was not half the danger
there would have been under their former sail; and, when
Mark took charge of the watch, as he did soon after, or at
eight o'clock, he was in hopes, by means of vigilance, still
to escape the danger. The darkness, which was getting
to be very intense, was now the greatest and most
immediate
source of his apprehensions. Could he only get a
glimpse of the sea a cable's-length ahead, he would have
felt vast relief; but even that small favour was denied him.
By the time the captain and second-mate had turned in,
which each did after going below and taking a stiff glass
of rum and water in his turn, it was so dark our young
mate could not discern the combing of the waves a hundred
yards from the ship, in any direction. This obscurity was
owing to the drizzle that filled the atmosphere, as well as
to the clouds that covered the canopy above that lone and
wandering ship.
As for Mark, he took his station between the
knight-heads
,
where he remained most of the watch, nearly
straining
the eyes out of his head, in the effort to penetrate the
gloom, and listening acutely to ascertain if he might not
catch some warning roar of the breakers, that he felt so
intimately persuaded must be getting nearer and nearer at
each instant. As midnight approached, came the thought
of Hillson's taking his place, drowsy and thick-headed as
he knew he must be at that hour. At length Mark
actually
fancied he heard the dreaded sounds; the warning,
however, was not ahead, but well on his starboard beam.
This he thought an ample justification for departing from
his instructions, and he instantly issued an order to put
the helm hard a-starboard, so as to bring the vessel up to
the wind, on the contrary tack. Unfortunately, as the
result proved, it now became his imperative duty to report
to Captain Crutchely what he had done. For a minute
or two the young man thought of keeping silence, to stand
on his present course, to omit calling the second-mate, and
to say nothing about what he had done, keeping the deck
himself until light should return. But reflection induced
him to shrink from the execution of this plan, which would
have involved him in a serious misunderstanding with both
his brother officers, who could not fail to hear all that had
occurred in the night, and who must certainly know, each
in his respective sphere, that they themselves had been
slighted. With a slow step, therefore, and a heavy heart,
Mark went into the cabin to make his report, and to give
the second-mate the customary call.
It was not an easy matter to awaken either of those,
who slept under the influence of potations as deep as the
night-caps taken by Captain Crutchely and Mr. Hillson.
The latter, in particular, was like a man in a state of
lethargy
,
and Mark had half a mind to leave him, and make
his condition an excuse for not having persisted in the
call. But he succeeded in arousing the captain, who soon
found the means to bring the second-mate to a state of
semi-consciousness.
Well, sir, cried the captain, as soon as fairly awake
himself, what now?
I think I heard breakers abeam, sir, and I have hauled
up to the southward.
A grunt succeeded, which Mark scarce knew how to
interpret. It might mean dissatisfaction, or it might mean
surprise. As the captain, however, was thoroughly awake,
and was making his preparations to come out on deck, he
thought that he had done all that duty required, and he
returned to his own post. The after-part of the ship was
now the best situation for watching, and Mark went up on
the poop, in order to see and hear the better. No lower
sail being in the way, he could look ahead almost as well
from that position as if he were forward; and as for
hearing
,
it was much the best place of the two, in consequence
of there being no wash of the sea directly beneath him, as
was the case when stationed between the knight-heads.
To this post he soon summoned Bob Betts, who belonged
to his watch, and with whom he had ever kept up as great
an intimacy as the difference in their stations would allow.
Bob, your ears are almost as good as your eyes, said
Mark; have you heard nothing of breakers?
I have, Mr. Woolston, and now own I did see
something
that may have been white water, this arternoon, while
aloft; but the captain and second-mate seemed so awarse
to believing in sich a thing, out here in the open Pacific,
that I got to be awarse, too.
It was a great fault in a look-out not to let what he
had seen be known, said Mark, gravely.
I own it, sir; I own how wrong I was, and have been
sorry for it ever since. But it 's going right in the wind's
eye, Mr. Woolston, to go ag'in captain and dickey!
But, you now think you have
heard
breakerswhere
away?
Astarn first; then ahead; and, just as you called me
up on the poop, sir, I fancied they sounded off here, on the
weather bow.
Are you serious, Bob?
As I ever was in my life, Mr. Mark. This oversight
of the arternoon has made me somewhat conscientious, if
I can be conscientious, and my sight and hearing are now
both wide awake. It 's my opinion, sir, that the ship is in
the
midst
of breakers at this instant, and that we may go
on 'em at any moment!
The devil it is! exclaimed Captain Crutchely, who
now appeared on the poop, and who caught the last part
of Bob Betts's speech. Well, for my part, I hear nothing
out of the way, and I will swear the keenest-sighted man
on earth can see nothing.
These words were scarcely out of the captain's mouth,
and had been backed by a senseless, mocking laugh from
Hillson, who was still muzzy, and quite as much asleep as
awake, when the deep and near roar of breakers was most
unequivocally heard. It came from to windward, too, and
abeam! This was proof that the ship was actually among
the breakers when Mark hauled up, and that she was now
passing a danger to leeward, that she must have previously
gone by, in running down on her course. The captain,
without waiting to consult with his cool and clear-headed
young mate, now shouted for all hands to be called, and
to stand by to ware ship. These orders came out so
fast, and in so peremptory a manner, that remonstrance
was out of the question, and Mark set himself at work to
obey them, in good earnest.
He
would have tacked in
preference to waring, and it would have been much wiser
to do so; but it was clearly expedient to get the ship on
the other tack, and he lent all his present exertions to the
attainment of that object. Waring is much easier done
than tacking, certainly; when it does not blow too fresh,
and there is not a dangerous sea on, no nautical manuvre
can be more readily effected, though room is absolutely
necessary to its success. This room was now wanting.
Just as the ship had got dead before the wind, and was
flying away to leeward, short as was the sail she was under,
the atmosphere seemed to be suddenly filled with a strange
light, the sea became white all around them, and a roar
of tumbling waters arose, that resembled the sound of a
small cataract. The ship was evidently in the midst of
breakers, and the next moment she struck!
The intense darkness of the night added to the horrors
of that awful moment. Nevertheless, the effect was to
arouse all that there was of manliness and seamanship in
Captain Crutchely, who from that instant appeared to be
himself again. His orders were issued coolly, clearly and
promptly, and they were obeyed as experienced mariners
will work at an instant like that. The sails were all clewed
up, and the heaviest of them were furled. Hillson was
ordered to clear away an anchor, while Mark was
attending
to the canvas. In the mean time, the captain watched
the movements of the ship. He had dropped a lead
alongside
,
and by that he ascertained that they were still beating
ahead. The thumps were not very hard, and the white
water was soon left astern, none having washed on deck.
All this was so much proof that the place on which they
had struck must have had nearly water enough to float the
vessel, a fact that the lead itself corroborated. Fifteen
feet aft was all the Rancocus wanted, in her actual trim,
and the lead showed a good three fathoms, at times. It
was when the ship settled in the troughs of the sea that she
felt the bottom. Satisfied that his vessel was likely to beat
over the present difficulty, Captain Crutchely now gave
all his attention to getting her anchored as near the reef
and to leeward of it, as possible. The instant she went
clear, a result he now expected every moment, he was
determined
to drop one of his bower anchors, and wait for
daylight, before he took any further steps to extricate
himself
from the danger by which he was surrounded.
On the forecastle, the work went on badly, and thither
Captain Crutchely proceeded. The second-mate scarce
knew what he was about, and the captain took charge of
the duty himself. At the same time he issued an order to
Mark to get up tackles, and to clear away the launch,
preparatory
to getting that boat into the water. Hillson had
bent the cable wrong, and much of the work had to be
done over again. As soon as men get excited, as is apt
to be the case when they find serious blunders made at
critical moments, they are not always discreet. The
precise
manner in which Captain Crutchely met with the
melancholy fate that befel him, was never known. It is
certain that he jumped down on the anchor-stock, the
anchor being a cock-bill, and that he ordered Mr. Hillson
off of it. While thus employed, and at an instant when
the cable was pronounced bent, and the men were in the
act of getting inboard, the ship made a heavy roll, breakers
again appeared all around her, the white foam rising nearly
to the level of her rails. The captain was seen no more.
There is little doubt that he was washed from the
anchor-stock
,
and carried away to leeward, in the midst of the
darkness of that midnight hour.
Mark was soon apprised of the change that had occurred,
and of the heavy responsibility that now rested on his young
shoulders. A feeling of horror and of regret came over
him, at first; but understanding the necessity of
self-command
,
he aroused himself, at once, to his duty, and gave
his orders coolly and with judgment. The first step was
to endeavour to save the captain. The jolly-boat was
lowered
,
and six men got in it, and passed ahead of the ship,
with this benevolent design. Mark stood on the bowsprit,
and saw them shoot past the bows of the vessel, and then,
almost immediately, become lost to view in the gloomy
darkness
of the terrible scene. The men never re-appeared, a
common and an unknown fate thus sweeping away Captain
Crutchely and six of his best men, and all, as it might be,
in a single instant of time!
Notwithstanding these sudden and alarming losses, the
work went on. Hillson seemed suddenly to become
conscious
of the necessity of exertion, and by giving his utmost
attention to hoisting out the launch, that boat was got
safely into the water. By this time the ship had beaten
so far over the reef, as scarcely to touch at all, and Mark
had everything ready for letting go his anchors, the instant
he had reason to believe she was in water deep enough to
float her. The thumps grew lighter and lighter, and the
lead-line showed a considerable drift; so much so, indeed,
as to require its being hauled in and cast anew every
minute
.
Under all the circumstances, Mark expected each
instant, to find himself in four fathoms' water, and he
intended
to let go the anchor the moment he was assured of
that fact. In the mean time, he ordered the carpenter to
sound the pumps. This was done, and the ship was
reported
with only the customary quantity of water in the
well. As yet her bottom was not injured, materially at
least.
While Mark stood with the lead-line in his hand,
anxiously
watching the drift of the vessel and the depth of
water, Hillson was employed in placing provisions in the
launch. There was a small amount of specie in the cabin,
and this, too, was transferred to the launch; everything
of that sort being done without Mark's knowledge, and by
the second-mate's orders. The former was on the forecastle,
waiting the proper moment to anchor; while all of the
after-part of the ship was at the mercy of the second-mate,
and a gang of the people, whom that officer had gathered
around him.
At length Mark found, to his great delight, that there
were four good fathoms of water under the ship's bows,
though she still hung abaft. He ascertained this fact by
means of Bob Betts, which true-hearted tar stood by him,
with a lantern, by swinging which low enough, the marks
were seen on the lead-line. Foot by foot the ship now
surged ahead, the seas being so much reduced in size and
power, by the manner in which they had been broken to
windward, as not to lift the vessel more than an inch or two
at a time. After waiting patiently a quarter of an hour,
Mark believed that the proper time had come, and he gave
the order to `let run.' The seaman stationed at the stopper
obeyed, and down went the anchor. It happened,
opportunely
enough, that the anchor was thus dropped, just as
the keel cleared the bottom, and the cable being secured
at a short range, after forging ahead far enough to tighten
the latter, the vessel tended. In swinging to her anchor,
a roller came down upon her, however; one that had crossed
the reef without breaking, and broke on board her. Mark
afterwards believed that the rush and weight of this sea,
which did no serious harm, frightened the men into the
launch, where Hillson was already in person, and that the
boat either struck adrift under the power of the roller, or
that the painter was imprudently cast off in the confusion
of the moment. He had got in as far as the windlass
himself
,
when the sea came aboard; and, as soon as he
recovered
his sight after the ducking he received, he caught a
dim view of the launch, driving off to leeward, on the top
of a wave. Hailing was useless, and he stood gazing at
the helpless boat until it became lost, like everything else
that was a hundred yards from the ship, in the gloom of
night. Even then Mark was by no means conscious of
the extent of the calamity that had befallen him. It was
only when he had visited cabin, steerage and forecastle,
and called the crew over by name, that he reached the
grave fact that there was no one left on board the
Rancocus
but Bob Betts and himself!
As Mark did not know what land was to be found to
leeward, he naturally enough hoped and expected that the
people in both boats might reach the shore, and be
recovered
in the morning; but he had little expectation of ever
seeing Captain Crutchely again. The circumstances,
however, afforded him little time to reflect on these things,
and he gave his whole attention, for the moment, to the
preservation of the ship. Fortunately, the anchor held,
and, as the wind, which had never blown very heavily,
sensibly began to lessen, Mark was sanguine in the belief
it would continue to hold. Captain Crutchely had taken
the precaution to have the cable bitted at a short range,
with a view to keep it, as much as possible, off the bottom;
coral being known to cut the hempen cables that were
altogether
in use, in that day, almost as readily as axes. In
consequence of this bit of foresight, the Rancocus lay at a
distance of less than forty fathoms from her anchor, which
Mark knew had been dropped in four fathoms' water. He
now sounded abreast of the main-mast, and ascertained
that the ship itself was in nine fathoms. This was
cheering
intelligence, and when Bob Betts heard it, he gave it
as his opinion that all might yet go well with them, could
they only recover the six men who had gone to leeward in
Vol. I.  5
the jolly-boat. The launch had carried off nine of their
crew, which, previously to this night, had consisted of
nineteen, all told. This suggestion relieved Mark's mind
of a load of care, and he lent himself to the measures
necessary
to the continued safety of the vessel, with renewed
animation and vigour.
The pump-well was once more sounded, and found to
be nearly empty. Owing to the nature of the bottom on
which they had struck, the lightness of the thumps, or the
strength of the ship herself, it was clear that the vessel
had thus far escaped without any material injury. For
this advantage Mark was deeply grateful, and could he
only recover four or five of the people, and find his way
out into open water, he might hope to live again to see
America, and to be re-united to his youthful and charming
bride.
The weather continued to grow more and more
moderate
,
and some time before the day returned the clouds
broke away, the drizzle ceased, and a permanent change
was to be expected. Mark now found new ground for
apprehensions, even in these favourable circumstances.
He supposed that the ship must feel the influence of the
tides, so near the land, and was afraid she might tail the
other way, and thus be brought again over the reef. In
order to obviate this difficulty, he and Bob set to work to
get another cable bent, and another anchor clear for letting
go. As all our readers may not be familiar with ships, it
may be well to say that vessels, as soon as they quit a coast
on a long voyage, unbend their cables and send them all
below, out of the way, while, at the same time, they stow
their anchors, as it is called; that is to say, get them from
under the cat-heads, from which they are usually
suspended
when ready to let go, and where they are
necessarily
altogether on the outside of the vessel, to positions
more inboard, where they are safer from the force of the
waves, and better secured. As all the anchors of the
Rancocus
had been thus stowed, until Captain Crutchely got
the one that was down, off the gunwale, and all the cables
below, Mark and Bob had labour enough before them to
occupy several hours, in the job thus undertaken.
CHAPTER IV.
Deep in the wave is a coral grove,
Where the purple mullet and gold fish rove,
Where the sea-flower spreads its leaves of blue,
That never are wet with falling dew,
But in bright and changeful beauty shine,
Far down in the green and grassy brine.
Percival
.
Our
young mate, and his sole assistant, Bob Betts, had
set about their work on the stream-cable and anchor, the
lightest and most manageable of all the ground-tackle in
the vessel. Both were strong and active, and both were
expert in the use of blocks, purchases, and handspikes;
but the day was seen lighting the eastern sky, and the
anchor
was barely off the gunwale, and ready to be stoppered.
In the meanwhile the ship still tended in the right
direction
,
the wind had moderated to a mere royal-breeze, and
the sea had so far gone down as nearly to leave the vessel
without motion. As soon as perfectly convinced of the
existence of this favourable state of things, and of its being
likely to last, Mark ceased to work, in order to wait for
day, telling Bob to discontinue his exertions also. It was
fully time, for both of those vigorous and strong-handed
men were thoroughly fatigued with the toil of that eventful
morning.
The reader may easily imagine with what impatience
our two mariners waited the slow return of light. Each
minute seemed an hour, and it appeared to them as if the
night was to last for ever. But the earth performed its
usual revolution, and by degrees sufficient light was
obtained
to enable Mark and Bob to examine the state of
things around them. In order to do this the better, each
went into a top, looking abroad from those elevations on
the face of the ocean, the different points of the reef, and
all that was then and there to be seen. Mark went up
forward, while Bob ascended into the main-top. The
distance
between them was so small, that there was no
difficulty
in conversing, which they continued to do, as was
natural enough to men in their situation.
The first look that each of our mariners bestowed, after
he was in his top, was to leeward, which being to the
westward, was of course yet in the darkest point of the
horizon. They expected to obtain a sight of at least one
island, and that quite near to them, if not of a group. But
no land appeared! It is true, that it was still too dark to
be certain of a fact of this sort, though Mark felt quite
assured that if land was finally seen, it must be of no great
extent, and quite low. He called to Bob, to ascertain what
he
thought of appearances to leeward, his reputation as a
look-out being so great.
Wait a few minutes, sir, till we get a bit more day,
answered his companion. There is a look on the water,
about a league off here on the larboard quarter, that seems
as if something would come out of it. But, one thing can
be seen plain enough, Mr. Mark, and that 's the breakers.
There 's a precious line on 'em, and that too one within
another, as makes it wonderful how we ever got through
'em as well as we did!
This was true enough, the light on the ocean to
windward
being now sufficient to enable the men to see, in that
direction, to a considerable distance. It was that solemn
hour in the morning when objects first grow distinct, ere
they are touched with the direct rays from the sun, and
when everything appears as if coming to us fresh and
renovated
from the hands of the Creator. The sea had so far
gone down as to render the breakers much less
formidable
to the eye, than when it was blowing more heavily;
but this very circumstance made it impossible to mistake
their positions. In the actual state of the ocean, it was
certain that wherever water broke, there must be rocks or
shoals beneath; whereas, in a blow, the combing of an
ordinary sea might be mistaken for the white water of
some hidden danger. Many of the rocks, however, lay so
low, that the heavy, sluggish rollers that came undulating
along, scarce did more than show faint, feathery lines of
white, to indicate the character of the places across which
they were passing. Such was now the case with the reef
over which the ship had beaten, the position of which could
hardly have been ascertained, or its danger discovered, at
the distance of half a mile. Others again were of a very
different character, the water still tumbling about them like
so many little cataracts. This variety was owing to the
greater depth at which some of the rocks lay than others.
As to the number of the reefs, and the difficulty in
getting
through them, Bob was right enough. It often
happens
that there is an inner and an outer reef to the islands
of the Pacific, particularly to those of coral formation; but
Mark began to doubt whether there was any coral at all
in the place where the Rancocus lay, in consequence of
the entire want of regularity in the position of these very
breakers. They were visible in all directions; not in
continuous
lines, but in detached parts; one lying within
another, as Bob had expressed it, until the eye could not
reach their outer limits. How the ship had got so
completely
involved within their dangerous embraces, without
going to pieces on a dozen of the reefs, was to him matter
of wonder; though it sometimes happens at sea, that
dangers
are thus safely passed in darkness and fog, that no
man would be bold enough to encounter in broad daylight,
and with a full consciousness of their hazards. Such then
had been the sort of miracleby which the Rancocus had
escaped; though it was no more easy to see how she was
to be got out of her present position, than it was to see
how she had got into it. Bob was the first to make a
remark
on this particular part of the subject.
It will need a reg'lar branch here, Mr. Mark, to carry
the old Rancocus clear of all them breakers to sea again,
he cried. Our Delaware banks is just so many fools to
'em, sir!
It is a most serious position for a vessel to be in, Bob,
answered Mark, sighingnor do I see how we
are
ever
to get clear of it, even should we get back men enough to
handle the ship.
I 'm quite of your mind, sir, answered Bob, taking
out his tobacco-box, and helping himself to a quid. Nor
would I be at all surprised should there turn out to be a
bit of land to leeward, if you and I was to Robinson Crusoe
it for the rest of our days. My good mother was always
5 *
most awarse to my following the seas on account of that
very danger; most especially from a fear of the savages
from the islands round about.
We will look for our boats, Mark gravely replied, the
image of Bridget, just at that instant, appearing before his
mind with a painful distinctness.
Both now turned their eyes again to leeward, the first
direct rays of the sun beginning to illumine the surface of
the ocean in that quarter. Something like a misty cloud
had been settled on the water, rather less than a league
from the ship, in the western board, and had hitherto
prevented
a close examination in that part of the horizon.
The power of the sun, however, almost instantly dispersed
it, and then, for the first time, Bob fancied he did discover
something like land. Mark, however, could not make it
out, until he had gone up into the cross-trees, when he,
too, got a glimpse of what, under all the circumstances,
he did not doubt was either a portion of the reef that rose
above the water, or was what might be termed a low,
straggling island. Its distance from the ship, they
estimated
at rather more than two leagues.
Both Mark and Bob remained aloft near an hour longer,
or until they had got the best possible view of which their
position would allow, of everything around the ship. Bob
went down, and took a glass up to his officer, Mark
sweeping
the whole horizon with it, in the anxious wish to make
out something cheering in connection with the boats. The
drift of these unfortunate craft must have been towards the
land, and that he examined with the utmost care. Aided
by the glass, and his elevation, he got a tolerable view of
the spot, which certainly promised as little in the way of
supplies as any other bit of naked reef he had ever seen.
The distance, however, was so great as to prevent his
obtaining
any certain information on that point. One thing,
however, he did ascertain, as he feared, with considerable
accuracy. After passing the glass along the whole of that
naked rock, he could see nothing on it in motion. Of
birds there were a good many, more indeed than from the
extent of the visible reef he might have expected; but no
signs of man could be discovered. As the ocean, in all
directions, was swept by the glass, and this single fragment
of a reef, which was less than a mile in length, was the
only thing that even resembled land, the melancholy
conviction
began to force itself on Mark and Bob, that all
their shipmates had perished! They might have perished
in one of several ways; as the naked reef did not lie
precisely
to leeward of the ship, the boats may have driven
by it, in the deep darkness of the past night, and gone far
away out of sight of the spot where they had left the vessel,
long ere the return of day. There was just the possibility
that the spars of the ship might be seen by the wanderers,
if they were still living, and the faint hope of their
regaining
the vessel, in the course of the day, by means of their
oars. It was, however, more probable that the boats had
capsized in some of the numerous fragments of breakers,
that were visible even in the present calm condition of the
ocean, and that all in them had been drowned. The best
swimmer must have hopelessly perished, in such a
situation
,
and in such a night, unless carried by a providential
interference to the naked rock to leeward. That no one
was living on that reef, the glass pretty plainly proved.
Mark and Bob Betts descended to the deck, after
passing
a long time aloft making their observations. Both
were pretty well assured that their situation was almost
desperate, though each was too resolute, and too thoroughly
inbued with the spirit of a seaman, to give up while there
was the smallest shadow of hope. As it was now getting
past the usual breakfast hour, some cold meat was got out,
and, for the first time since Mark had been transferred to
the cabin, they sat down on the windlass and ate the meal
together. A little, however, satisfied men in their
situation
;
Bob Betts fairly owning that he had no appetite,
though so notorious at the ship's beef and a biscuit, as to
be often the subject of his messmates' jokes. That
morning
even he could eat but little, though both felt it to be a
duty they owed to themselves to take enough to sustain
nature. It was while these two forlorn and desolate
mariners
sat there on the windlass, picking, as it might be,
morsel by morsel, that they first entered into a full and
frank communication with each other, touching the
realities
of their present situation. After a good deal had
passed between them, Mark suddenly asked
Do you think it possible, Bob, for us two to take care
of the ship, should we even manage to get her into deep
water again?
Well, that is not so soon answered, Mr. Woolston,
returned Bob. We 're both on us stout, and healthy, and
of good courage, Mr. Mark; but 't would be a desperate
long way for two hands to carry a wessel of four hundred
tons, to take the old 'Cocus from this here anchorage, all
the way to the coast of America; and short of the coast
there 's no ra'al hope for us.
However
, sir,
that
is a
subject
that need give us no consarn.
I do not see that, Bob; we shall have to do it, unless
we fall in with something at sea, could we only once get
the vessel out from among these reefs.
Ay, ay, sircould we get her out from among these
reefs, indeed! There 's the rub, Mr. Woolston; but I
fear 't will never be `rub and
go
.'
You think, then, we are too fairly in for it, ever to get
the ship clear?
Such is just my notion, Mr. Woolston, on that subject,
and I 've no wish to keep it a secret. In my judgment,
was poor Captain Crutchely alive and back at his post, and
all hands just as they was this time twenty-four hours since,
and the ship where she is now, that
here
she would have
to stay. Nothing short of kedging can ever take the
wessel
clear of the reefs to windward on us, and man-of-war
kedging could hardly do it, then.
I am sorry to hear you say this, answered Mark,
gloomily, though I feared as much myself.
Men is men, sir, and you can get no more out on 'em
than is in 'em. I looked well at these reefs, sir, when
aloft, and they 're what I call as hopeless affairs as ever I
laid eyes on. If they lay in any sort of way, a body might
have some little chance of getting through 'em, but they
don't lay, no how. 'T would be `luff' and `keep her
away' every half minute or so, should we attempt to beat
up among 'em; and who is there aboard here to brace up,
and haul aft, and ease off, and to swing yards sich as
our'n?
I was not altogether without the hope, Bob, of getting
the ship into clear water; though I have thought it would
be done with difficulty. I am still of opinion we had better
try it, for the alternative is a very serious matter.
I don't exactly understand what you mean by
attorneytives
,
Mr. Mark; though it 's little harm, or little good
that any attorney can do the old 'Cocus, now! But, as
for getting this craft through them reefs, to windward, and
into clear water, it surpasses the power of man. Did you
just notice the tide-ripples, Mr. Mark, when you was up
in the cross-trees?
I saw them, Bob, and am fully aware of the difficulty
of running as large a vessel as this among them, even with
a full crew. But what will become of us, unless we get
the ship into open water?
Sure enough, sir. I see no other hope for us, Mr.
Mark, but to Robinson Crusoe it awhile, until our times
come; or, till the Lord, in his marcy, shall see fit to have
us picked up.
Robinson Crusoe it! repeated Mark, smiling at the
quaintness of Bob's expression, which the well-meaning
fellow uttered in all simplicity, and in perfect good faith
where are we to find even an uninhabited island, on
which to dwell after the mode of Robinson Crusoe?
There 's a bit of a reef to leeward, where I dare say a
man might pick up a living, arter a fashion, answered
Bob, coolly; then, here is the ship.
And how long would a hempen cable hold the ship in
a place like this, where every time the vessel lifts to a sea,
the clench is chafing on a rock? No, no, Bobthe ship
cannot long remain where she is, depend on
that
. We
must try and pass down to leeward, if we cannot beat the
ship through the dangers to windward.
Harkee, Mr. Mark; I thought this matter over in my
mind, while we was aloft, and this is my idee as to what
is best to be done, for a start. There 's the dingui on the
poop, in as good order as ever a boat was. She will easily
carry two on us, and, on a pinch, she might carry half a
dozen. Now, my notion is to get the dingui into the
water, to put a breaker and some grub in her, and to pull
down to that bit of a reef, and have a survey of it. I 'll
take the sculls going down, and you can keep heaving the
lead, by way of finding out if there be sich a thing as a
channel in that direction. If the ship is ever to be moved
by us two, it must be by going to leeward, and not by
attempting
to turn up ag'in wind and tide among them 'ere
rocks, out here to the eastward. No, sir; let us take the
dingui, and surwey the reef, and look for our shipmates;
a'ter which we can best tell what to undertake, with some
little hope of succeeding. The weather seems settled, and
the sooner we are off the better.
This proposal struck Mark's young mind as plausible,
as well as discreet. To recover even a single man would
be a great advantage, and he had lingering hopes that some
of the people might yet be found on the reef. Then Bob's
idea about getting the ship through the shoal water, by
passing to leeward, in preference to making the attempt
against the wind, was a sound one; and, on a little
reflection
,
he was well enough disposed to acquiesce in it.
Accordingly
,
when they quitted the windlass, they both set
about putting this project in execution.
The dingui was no great matter of a boat, and they had
not much difficulty in getting it into the water. First by
slinging, it was swayed high enough to clear the rail, when
Bob bore it over the side, and Mark lowered away. It
was found to be tight, Captain Crutchely having kept it
half full of water ever since they got into the Pacific, and
in other respects it was in good order. It was even
provided
with a little sail, which did very well before the
wind. While Bob saw to provisioning the boat, and filling
its breakers with fresh water, Mark attended to another
piece of duty that he conceived to be of the last
importance
.
The Rancocus carried several guns, an armament
prepared to repel the savages of the sandal-wood islands,
and these guns were all mounted and in their places.
There were two old-fashioned sixes, and eight twelve-pound
carronades. The first made smart reports when properly
loaded. Our young mate now got the keys of the
magazine
,
opened it, and brought forth three cartridges, with
which he loaded three of the guns. These guns he fired,
with short intervals between them, in hopes that the reports
would be carried to the ears of some of the missing people,
and encourage them to make every effort to return. The
roar of artillery sounded strangely enough in the midst of
that vast solitude; and Bob Betts, who had often been in
action, declared that he was much affected by it. As no
immediate result was expected from the firing of these
guns, Mark had no sooner discharged them, than he joined
Betts, who by this time had everything ready, and prepared
to quit the ship. Before he did this, however, he made an
anxious and careful survey of the weather, it being
all-important
to be certain no change in this respect was likely
to occur in his absence. All the omens were favourable,
and Bob reporting for the third time that everything was
ready, the young man went over the side, and descended,
with a reluctance he could not conceal, into the boat.
Certainly, it was no trifling matter for men in the situation
of our two mariners, to leave their vessel all alone, to be
absent for a large portion of the day. It was to be done,
however; though it was done reluctantly, and not without
many misgivings, in spite of the favourable signs in the
atmosphere.
When Mark had taken his seat in the dingui, Bob let go
his hold of the ship, and set the sail. The breeze was
light, and fair to go, though it was by no means so certain
how it would serve them on the return. Previously to
quitting the ship, Mark had taken a good look at the
breakers to leeward, in order to have some general notion
of the course best to steer, and he commenced his little
voyage, but entirely without a plan for his own
government
.
The breakers were quite as numerous to leeward
as to windward, but the fact of there being so many of
them made smooth water between them. A boat, or a ship,
that was once fairly a league or so within the broken lines
of rocks, was like a vessel embayed, the rollers of the open
ocean expending their force on the outer reefs, and coming
in much reduced in size and power. Still the uneasy
ocean, even in its state of rest, is formidable at the points
where its waters meet with rocks, or sands, and the
breakers
that did exist, even as much embayed as was the dingui,
were serious matters for so small a boat to encounter. It
was necessary, consequently, to steer clear of them, lest
they should capsize, or fill, this, the only craft of the sort
that now belonged to the vessel, the loss of which would
be a most serious matter indeed.
The dingui slided away from the ship with a very easy
movement. There was just about as much wind as so
small a craft needed, and Bob soon began to sound, Mark
preferring to steer. It was, however, by no means easy to
sound in so low a boat, while in such swift motion; and
Bob was compelled to give it up. As they should be
obliged to return with the oars, Mark observed that then
he would feel his way back to the ship. Nevertheless, the
few casts of the lead that did succeed, satisfied our
mariners
that there was much more than water enough for the
Rancocus, between the reefs.
On
them, doubtless it would
turn out to be different.
Mark met with more difficulty than he had anticipated
in keeping the dingui out of the breakers. So very smooth
was the sort of bay he was ina bay by means of the reefs
to windward, though no rock in that direction rose above
the surface of the seaso very smooth, then, was the sort
of bay he was in, that the water did not break, in many
places, except at long intervals; and then only when a
roller heavier than common found its way in from the
outer ocean. As a consequence, the breakers that did
suddenly show themselves from a cause like this, were the
heaviest of all, and the little dingui would have fared badly
had it been caught on a reef, at the precise moment when
such a sea tumbled over in foam. This accident was very
near occurring once or twice, but it was escaped, more by
providential interference than by any care or skill in the
adventurers.
It is very easy to imagine the intense interest with which
our two mariners drew near to the visible reef. Their
observations from the cross-trees of the ship, had told them
this was all the land anywhere very near them, and if they
did not find their lost shipmates here, they ought not to
expect to find them at all. Then this reef, or island, was
of vast importance in other points of view. It might
become
their future home; perhaps for years, possibly for
life. The appearances of the sunken reefs, over and among
which he had just passed, had greatly shaken Mark's hope
of ever getting the ship from among them, and he even
doubted the possibility of bringing her down, before the
wind, to the place where he was then going. All these
considerations, which began to press more and more
painfully
on his mind, each foot as he advanced, served to
increase
the intensity of the interest with which he noted
every appearance on, or about, the reef, or island, that he
was now approaching. Bob had less feeling on the
subject
.
He had less imagination, and foresaw consequences
and effects less vividly than his officer, and was more
accustomed
to the vicissitudes of a seaman's life. Then he
had left no virgin bride at home, to look for his return;
and had moreover made up his mind that it was the will
of Providence that he and Mark were to `Robinson Crusoe
it' awhile on `that bit of a reef.' Whether they should
ever be rescued from so desolate a place, was a point on
which he had not yet begun to ponder.
The appearances were anything but encouraging, as the
dingui drew nearer and nearer to the naked part of the reef.
The opinions formed of this place, by the examination made
from the cross-trees, turned out to be tolerably accurate,
in several particulars. It was just about a mile in length,
while its breadth varied from half a mile to less than an
eighth of a mile. On its shores, the rock along most of
the reef rose but a very few feet above the surface of the
water, though at its eastern, or the weather extremity, it
might have been of more than twice the usual height; its
length lay nearly east and west. In the centre of this
island, however, there was a singular formation of the rock,
which appeared to rise to an elevation of something like
sixty or eighty feet, making a sort of a regular circular
mound of that height, which occupied no small part of the
widest portion of the island. Nothing like tree, shrub, or
grass, was visible, as the boat drew near enough to render
such things apparent. Of aquatic birds there were a good
many; though even they did not appear in the numbers
that are sometimes seen in the vicinity of uninhabited
islands. About certain large naked rocks, at no great
distance
however from the principal reef, they were hovering
in thousands.
At length the little dingui glided in quite near to the
island. Mark was at first surprised to find so little surf
beating against even its weather side, but this was
accounted
for by the great number of the reefs that lay for
Vol. I.  6
miles without it; and, particularly, by the fact that one
line of rock stretched directly across this weather end,
distant from it only two cables' lengths, forming a pretty
little sheet of perfectly smooth water between it and the
island. Of course, to do this, the line of reef just
mentioned
must come very near the surface; as in fact was the
case, the rock rising so high as to be two or three feet out
of water on the ebb, though usually submerged on the flood.
The boat was obliged to pass round one end of this
last-named
reef, where there was deep water, and then to haul
its wind a little in order to reach the shore.
It would be difficult to describe the sensations with
which Mark first landed. In approaching the place, both
he and Bob had strained their eyes in the hope of seeing
some proof that their shipmates had been there; but no
discovery rewarded their search. Nothing was seen, on
or about the island, to furnish the smallest evidence that
either of the boats had touched it. Mark found that he
was treading on naked rock when he had landed, though
the surface was tolerably smooth. The rock itself was of
a sort to which he was unaccustomed: and he began to
suspect
,
what in truth turned out on further investigation to
be the fact, that instead of being on a reef of coral, he was
on one of purely volcanic origin. The utter nakedness of
the rock both surprised and grieved him. On the reefs, in
every direction, considerable quantities of sea-weed had
lodged, temporarily at least; but none of it appeared to
have found its way to this particular place. Nakedness
and dreariness were the two words which best described
the island; the only interruption to its solitude and
desolation
being occasioned by the birds, which now came
screaming and flying above the heads of the intruders,
showing both by their boldness and their cries, that they
were totally unacquainted with men.
The mound, in the centre of the reef, was an object too
conspicuous to escape attention, and our adventurers
approached
it at once, with the expectation of getting a better
look-out from its summit, than that they had on the lower
level of the surface of the ordinary reef. Thither then
they proceeded, accompanied by a large flight of the birds
Neither Mark nor Bob, however, had neglected to turn
his eyes towards the now distant ship, which was
apparently
riding at its anchor, in exactly the condition in
which it had been left, half an hour before. In that
quarter
all seemed right, and Mark led the way to the mount,
with active and eager steps.
On reaching the foot of this singular elevation, our
adventurers
found it would not be so easy a matter as they
had fancied, to ascend it. Unlike the rest of the reef
which they had yet seen, it appeared to be composed of a
crumbling rock, and this so smooth and perpendicular as to
render it extremely difficult to get up. A place was found
at length, however, and by lending each other a hand,
Mark and Bob finally got on the summit. Here a surprise
was ready for them, that drew an exclamation from each,
the instant the sight broke upon him. Instead of finding
an elevated bit of table-rock, as had been expected, a
circular
cavity existed within, that Mark at once recognised
to be the extinct crater of a volcano! After the first
astonishment
was over, Mark made a close examination of
the place.
The mound, or barrier of lava and scori that composed
the outer wall of this crater, was almost mathematically
circular. Its inner precipice was in most places absolutely
perpendicular, though overhanging in a few; there being
but two or three spots where an active man could descend
in safety. The area within might contain a hundred acres,
while the wall preserved a very even height of about sixty
feet, falling a little below this at the leeward side, where
there existed one narrow hole, or passage, on a level with
the bottom of the crater; a sort of gateway, by which to
enter and quit the cavity. This passage had no doubt
been formed by the exit of lava, which centuries ago had
doubtless broken through at this point, and contributed to
form the visible reef beyond. The height of this hole was
some twenty feet, having an arch above it, and its width
may have been thirty. When Mark got to it, which he
did by descending the wall of the crater, not without risk
to his neck, he found the surface of the crater very even
and unbroken, with the exception of its having a slight
descent from its eastern to its western side; or from the
side opposite to the outlet, or gateway, to the gateway
itself. This inclination Mark fancied was owing to the
circumstance that the water of the ocean had formerly
entered
at the hole, in uncommonly high tides and tempests,
and washed the ashes which had once formed the bottom
of the crater, towards the remote parts of the plain. These
ashes had been converted by time into a soft, or friable
rock, composing a stone that is called tufa. If there had
ever been a cone in the crater, as was probably the case,
it had totally disappeared under the action of time and the
wear of the seasons. Rock, however, the bed of the crater
could scarcely be yet considered, though it had a crust
which bore the weight of a man very readily, in nearly
every part of it. Once or twice Mark broke through, as
one would fall through rotten ice, when he found his shoes
covered with a light dust that much resembled ashes. In
other places he broke this crust on purpose, always finding
beneath it a considerable depth of ashes, mingled with
some shells, and a few small stones.
That the water sometimes flowed into this crater was
evident by a considerable deposit of salt, which marked
the limits of the latest of these floods. This salt had
probably
prevented vegetation. The water, however, never
could have entered from the sea, had not the lava which
originally made the outlet left a sort of channel that was
lower than the surface of the outer rocks. It might be
nearer to the real character of the phenomenon were we
to say, that the lava which had broken through the barrier
at this point, and tumbled into the sea, had not quite filled
the channel which it rather found than formed, when it
ceased to flow. Cooling in that form, an irregular crevice
was left, through which the element no doubt still
occasionally
entered, when the adjacent ocean got a sufficient
elevation. Mark observed that, from some cause or other,
the birds avoided the crater. It really seemed to him that
their instincts warned them of the dangers that had once
environed the place, and that, to use the language of
sailors
,
they gave it a wide berth, in consequence.
Whatever
may have been the cause, such was the fact; few even
flying over it, though they were to be seen in hundreds, in
the air all round it.
CHAPTER V.
The king's son have I landed by himself;
Whom I left cooling of the air with sighs
In an odd angle of the isle, and sitting,
His arms in this sad knot.
Tempest
.
Having
completed this first examination of the crater,
Mark and Bob next picked their way again to the summit
of its wall, and took their seats directly over the arch.
Here they enjoyed as good a look-out as the little island
afforded, not only of its own surface, but of the
surrounding
ocean. Mark now began to comprehend the character
of the singular geological formation, into the midst of
which the Rancocus had been led, as it might almost be
by the hand of Providence itself. He was at that moment
seated on the topmost pinnacle of a submarine mountain
of volcanic origin  submarine as to all its elevations,
heights and spaces, with the exception of the crater where
he had just taken his stand, and the little bit of visible and
venerable lava, by which it was surrounded. It is true
that this lava rose very near the surface of the ocean, in
fifty places that he could see at no great distance, forming
the numberless breakers that characterized the place; but,
with the exception of Mark's Reef, as Bob named the
principal island on the spot, two or three detached islets
within a cable's-length of it, and a few little more remote,
the particular haunts of birds, no other land was visible,
far or near.
As Mark sat there, on that rock of concrete ashes, he
speculated on the probable extent of the shoals and reefs
by which he was surrounded. Judging by what he then
saw, and recalling the particulars of the examination made
from the cross-trees of the ship, he supposed that the
dangers
and difficulties of the navigation must extend, in an
east and west direction, at least twelve marine leagues;
6 *
while, in a north and south, the distance seemed to be a
little, and a very little less. There was necessarily a good
deal of conjecture in this estimate of the extent of the
volcanic
mountain which composed these extensive shoals;
but, from what he saw, from the distance the ship was
known to have run amid the dangers before she brought
up, her present anchorage, the position of the island, and
all the other materials before him to make his calculation
on, Mark believed himself rather to have lessened than to
have exaggerated the extent of these shoals. Had the
throes of the earth, which produced this submerged rock,
been a little more powerful, a beautiful and fertile island,
of very respectable dimensions, would probably have been
formed in its place.
From the time of reaching the reef, which is now to
bear his name in all future time, our young seaman had
begun to admit the bitter possibility of being compelled to
pass the remainder of his days on it. How long he and
his companion could find the means of subsistence in a
place so barren, was merely matter of conjecture; but so
long as Providence should furnish these means, was it
highly probable that solitary and little-favoured spot was
to be their home. It is unnecessary to state with what
bitter regrets the young bridegroom admitted this painful
idea; but Mark was too manly and resolute to abandon
himself to despair, even at such a moment. He kept his
sorrows pent up in the repository of his own bosom, and
endeavoured to imitate the calm exterior of his companion.
As for Bob, he was a good deal of a philosopher by nature;
and, having made up his mind that they were doomed to
`Robinson Crusoe it,' for a few years at least, he was
already
turning over in his thoughts the means of doing so to
the best advantage. Under such circumstances, and with
such feelings, it is not at all surprising that their present
situation and their future prospects soon became the
subject
of discourse, between these two solitary seamen.
We are fairly in for it, Mr. Mark, said Bob, and
differ from Robinson only in the fact that there are two of
us; whereas he was obliged to set up for himself, and by
himself, until he fell in with Friday!
I wish I could say
that
was the only difference in our
conditions, Betts, but it is very far from being so. In the
first place he had an island, while we have little more than
a reef; he had soil, while we have naked rock; he had
fresh water, and we have none; he had trees, while we
have not even a spear of grass. All these circumstances
make out a case most desperately against us.
You speak truth, sir; yet is there light ahead. We
have a ship, sound and tight as the day she sailed; while
Robinson lost his craft under his feet. As long as there
is a plank afloat, a true salt never gives up.
Ay, Bob, I feel that, as strongly as you can yourself;
nor do I mean to give up, so long as there is reason to
think God has not entirely deserted us. But that ship is
of no use, in the way of returning to our friends and home;
or, of no use as a ship. The power of man could scarcely
extricate her from the reefs around her.
It 's a bloody bad berth, said Bob, squirting the saliva
of his tobacco half-way down the wall of the crater, that
I must allow. Howsomever, the ship will be of use in a
great many ways, Mr. Mark, if we can keep her afloat,
even where she is. The water that 's in her will last us
two a twelvemonth, if we are a little particular about it;
and when the rainy season sets in, as the rainy season will
be sure to do in this latitude, we can fill up for a fresh
start. Then the ship will be a house for us to live in, and
a capital good house, too. You can live aft, sir, and I 'll
take my swing in the forecastle, just as if nothing had
happened.
No, no, Bob; there is an end of all such distinctions
now. Misery, like the grave, brings all upon a level.
You and I commenced as messmates, and we are likely to
end as messmates. There is a use to which the ship may
be put, however, that you have not mentioned, and to
which we must look forward as our best hope for this world.
She may be broken up by us, and we may succeed in
building a craft large enough to navigate these mild seas,
and yet small enough to be taken through, or over the
reefs. In
that
way, favoured by Divine Providence, we
may live to see our friends again.
Courage, Mr. Mark, courage, sir. I know it must be
hard on the feelin's of a married man, like yourself, that
has left a perfect pictur' behind him, to believe he is never
to return to his home again. But I don't believe that such
is to be our fate. I never heard of such an end to a Crusoe
party. Even Robinson, himself, got off at last, and had a
desperate hard journey of it, after he hauled his land-tacks
aboard. I like that idee of the new craft 'specially well,
and will lend a hand to help you through with it with all
my heart. I 'm not much of a carpenter, it 's true; nor do
I suppose you are anything wonderful with the broad-axe
and adze; but two willing and stout men, who has got
their lives to save, can turn their hands to almost anything.
For my part, sir, since I
was
to be wrecked and to
Robinson
it awhile, I 'm gratefully thankful that I 've got you for
a companion, that 's all!
Mark smiled at this oblique compliment, but he felt well
assured that Bob meant all for the best. After a short
pause, he resumed the discourse by saying
I have been thinking, Bob, of the possibility of getting
the ship safely down as far as this island. Could we but
place her to leeward of that last reef off the weather end
of the island, she might lie there years, or until she fell to
pieces by decay. If we are to attempt building a decked
boat, or anything large enough to ride out a gale in, we
shall want more room than the ship's decks to set it up in.
Besides, we could never get a craft of those dimensions
off the ship's decks, and must, of necessity, build it in
some place where it may be launched. Our dingui would
never do to be moving backward and forward, so great a
distance, for it will carry little more than ourselves. All
things considered, therefore, I am of opinion we can do
nothing better to begin with, than to try to get the ship
down here, where we have room, and may carry out our
plans to some advantage.
Bob assented at once to this scheme, and suggested one
or two ideas in approbation of it, that were new even to
Mark. Thus, it was evident to both, that if the ship
herself
were ever to get clear of the reef, it must be by passing
out to leeward; and by bringing her down to the island so
much would be gained on the indispensable course. Thus,
added Bob, she might be securely moored in the little bay
to windward of the island; and, in the course of time it
was possible that by a thorough examination of the
channels
to the westward, and by the use of buoys, a passage
might be found, after all, that would carry them out to sea.
Mark had little hope of ever getting the Rancocus
extricated
from the maze of rocks into which she had so blindly
entered, and where she probably never could have come
but by driving over some of them; but he saw many
advantages
in this plan of removing the ship, that increased
in number and magnitude the more he thought on the
subject. Security to the fresh water was one great object
to be attained. Should it come on to blow, and the ship
drift down upon the rocks to leeward of her, she would
probably go to pieces in an hour or two, when not only all
the other ample stores that she contained, but every drop
of sweet water at the command of the two seamen, would
inevitably be lost. So important did it appear to Mark to
make sure of a portion of this great essential, at least, that
he would have proposed towing down to the reef, or island,
a few casks, had the dingui been heavy enough to render
such a project practicable. After talking over these several
points still more at large, Mark and Bob descended from
the summit of the crater, made half of its circuit, and
returned
to their boat.
As the day continued calm, Mark was in no hurry, but
passed half an hour in sounding the little bay that was
formed by the sunken rocks that lay off the eastern, or
weather end of the Crater Reef, as, in a spirit of humility,
he insisted on calling that which everybody else now calls
Mark's Reef. Here he not only found abundance of water
for all he wanted, but to his surprise he also found a sandy
bottom, formed no doubt by the particles washed from the
surrounding rocks under the never-ceasing abrasion of the
waves. On the submerged reef there were only a few inches
of water, and our mariners saw clearly that it was possible
to secure the ship in this basin, in a very effectual manner,
could they only have a sufficiency of good weather in which
to do it.
After surveying the basin, itself, with sufficient care,
Bob pulled the dingui back towards the ship, Mark
sounding
as they proceeded. But two difficulties were found
between the points that it was so desirable to bring in
communication with each other. One of these difficulties
consisted in a passage between two lines of reef, that ran
nearly parallel for a quarter of a mile, and which were
only half a cable's-length asunder. There was abundance
of water between these reefs, but the difficulty was in the
course, and in the narrowness of the passage. Mark
passed through the latter four several times, sounding it,
as it might be, foot by foot, and examining the bottom with
the eye; for, in that pellucid water, with the sun near the
zenith, it was possible to see two or three fathoms down,
and nowhere did he find any other obstacle than this just
mentioned. Nor was any buoy necessary, the water
breaking
over the southern end of the outer, and over the
northern
end of the inner ledge, and nowhere else near by, thus
distinctly noting the very two points where it would be
necessary to alter the course.
The second obstacle was much more serious than that
just described. It was a reef with a good deal of water
over most of it; so much, indeed, that the sea did not
break unless in heavy gales, but not enough to carry a
ship like the Rancocus over, except in one, and that a very
contracted pass, of less than a hundred feet in width.
This channel it would be indispensably necessary to buoy,
since a variation from the true course of only a few fathoms
would infallibly produce the loss of the ship. All the rest
of the distance was easily enough made by a vessel
standing
down, by simply taking care not to run into visible
breakers.
Mark and Bob did not get back to the Rancocus until
near three o'clock. They found everything as they had
left it, and the pigs, poultry and goat, glad enough to see
them, and beginning to want their victuals and drink.
The two first are to be found on board of every ship, but
the last is not quite so usual. Captain Crutchely had
brought one along to supply milk for his tea, a beverage
that, oddly enough, stood second only to grog in his favour.
After Bob had attended to the wants of the brute animals,
he and Mark again sat down on the windlass to make
another cold repast on broken meatas yet, they had not
the hearts to cook anything. As soon as this homely meal
was taken Mark placed a couple of buoys in the dingui,
with the pig-iron that was necessary to anchor them, and
proceeded to the spot on the reef, where it was proposed
to place them.
Our mariners were quite an hour in searching for the
channel, and near another in anchoring the buoys in a way
to render the passage perfectly safe. As soon as this was
done, Bob pulled back to the ship, which was less than a
mile distant, as fast as he could, for there was every
appearance
of a change of weather. The moment was one,
now, that demanded great coolness and decision. Not
more than an hour of day remained, and the question was
whether to attempt to move the ship that night, when the
channel and its marks were all fresh in the minds of the
two seamen, and before the foul weather came, or to trust
to the cable that was down to ride out any blow that might
happen. Mark, young as he was, thought justly on most
professional subjects. He knew that heavy rollers would
come in across the reef where the vessel then lay, and was
fearful that the cable would chafe and part, should it come
on to blow hard for four-and-twenty hours continually.
These rollers, he also knew by the observation of that day,
were completely broken and dispersed on the rocks, before
they got down to the island, and he believed the chances
of safety much greater by moving the ship at once, than
by trying the fortune of another night out where she then
lay. Bob submitted to this decision precisely as if Mark
was still his officer, and no sooner got his orders than he
sprang from sail to sail, and rope to rope, like a cat playing
among the branches of some tree. In that day, spensers
were unknown, staysails doing their duty. Thus Bob
loosed the jib, main-topmast and mizen-staysails, and saw
the spanker clear for setting. While he was thus busied,
Mark was looking to the stopper and shank-painter of the
sheet-anchor, which had been got ready to let go, before
Captain Crutchely was lost. He even succeeded in
getting
that heavy piece of metal a cock-bill, without calling
on Bob for assistance.
It was indeed time for them to be in a hurry; for the
wind began to come in puffs, the sun was sinking into a
bank of clouds, and all along the horizon to windward the
sky looked dark and menacing. Once Mark changed his
mind, determining to hold on, and let go the sheet-anchor
where he was, should it become necessary; but a lull
tempted him to proceed. Bob shouted out that all was
ready, and Mark lifted the axe with which he was armed,
and struck a heavy blow on the cable. That settled the
matter; an entire strand was separated, and three or four
more blows released the ship from her anchor. Mark now
sprang to the jib-halliards, assisting Bob to hoist the sail.
This was no sooner done than he went aft to the wheel,
where he arrived in time to help the ship to fall off. The
spanker was next got out as well as two men could do it
in a hurry, and then Bob went forward to tend the
jib-sheet
,
and to look out for the buoys.
It was indispensable in such a navigation to make no
mistake, and Mark enjoined the utmost vigilance on his
friend. Twenty times did he hail to inquire if the buoys
were to be seen, and at last he was gratified by an answer
in the affirmative.
Keep her away, Mr. Markkeep her away, you may,
sir; we are well to windward of the channel. Ay, that 'll
do, Mr. Woolstonthat 's your beauty, sir. Can't you get
a sight of them b'ys yourself, sir?
Not just yet, Bob, and so much the greater need that
you should look out the sharper. Give the ship plenty of
room, and I 'll let her run down for the passage, square for
the channel.
Bob now ran aft, telling the mate he had better go on
the forecastle himself and conn the ship through the
passage
,
which was a place he did not like. Mark was vexed
that the change should be made just at that critical instant,
but bounding forward, he was between the knight-heads
in half a minute, looking out for the buoys. At first, he
could not see them; and then he most felt the imprudence
of Bob's quitting his post in such a critical instant. In
another minute, however, he found one; and presently the
other came in sight, fearfully close, as it now appeared to
our young mariner, to its neighbour. The position of the
ship, nevertheless, was sufficiently to windward, leaving
plenty of room to keep off in. As soon as the ship was far
enough ahead, Mark called out to Bob to put his helm
hard up. This was done, and away the Rancocus went,
Mark watching her with the utmost vigilance, lest she
should sheer a little too much to the one side or to the
other. He hardly breathed as the vessel glided down upon
these two black sentinels, and, for an instant, he fancied
the wind or the current had interfered with their positions.
It was now too late, however, to attempt any change, and
Mark saw the ship surging onward on the swells of the
ocean, which made their way thus far within the reefs,
with a greater intensity of anxiety than he had ever before
experienced in his life. Away went the ship, and each
time she settled in the water, our young man expected to
hear her keel grating on the bottom, but it did not touch.
Presently the buoys were on her quarters, and then Mark
knew that the danger of this one spot was passed!
The next step was to find the southern end of the outer
ledge that formed the succeeding passage. This was not
done until the ship was close aboard of it. A change had
come over the spot within the last few hours, in
consequence
of the increase of wind, the water breaking all
along the ledge, instead of on its end only; but Mark
cared not for this, once certain he had found that end.
He was now half-way between his former anchorage and
the crater, and he could distinguish the latter quite plainly.
But sail was necessary to carry the ship safely through the
channel ahead, and Mark called to Bob to lash the helm
a-midships after luffing up to his course, and to spring to
the main-topmast staysail halliards, and help him hoist the
sail. This was soon done, and the new sail was got up,
and the sheet hauled aft. Next followed the mizen
staysail
,
which was spread in the same manner. Bob then
flew to the wheel, and Mark to his knight-heads again.
Contrary to Mark's apprehensions, he saw that the ship
was luffing up close to the weather ledge, leaving little
danger of her going on to it. As soon as met by the helm,
however, she fell off, and Mark no longer had any doubt
of weathering the northern end of the inner ledge of this
passage. The wind coming in fresher puffs, this was soon
done, when the ship was kept dead away for the crater.
There was the northern end of the reef, which formed the
inner basin of all, to double, when that which remained to
do was merely to range far enough within the reef to get
Vol. I.  7
a cover, and to drop the anchor. In order to do this with
success, Mark now commenced hauling down the jib. By
the time he had that sail well in, the ship was off the end
of the sunken reef, when Bob put his helm a-starboard and
rounded it. Down came the main-topmast staysail, and
Mark jumped on the forecastle, while he called out to Bob
to lash the helm a-lee. In an instant Bob was at the young
man's side, and both waited for the ship to luff into the
wind, and to forge as near as possible to the reef. This
was successfully done also, and Mark let go the stopper
within twenty feet of the wall of the sunken reef, just as
the ship began to drive astern. The canvas was rolled up
and secured, the cable payed out, until the ship lay just
mid-channel between the island and the sea-wall without,
and the whole secured. Then Bob took off his tarpaulin
and gave three cheers, while Mark walked aft, silently
returning thanks to God for the complete success of this
important movement.
Important most truly was this change. Not only was
the ship anchored, with her heaviest anchor down, and
her best cable out, in good holding ground, and in a basin
where very little swell ever penetrated, and that entering
laterally and diminished in force; but there she was within
a hundred and fifty feet of the island, at all times accessible
by means of the dingui, a boat that it would not do to trust
in the water at all outside when it blew in the least fresh.
In short, it was scarcely possible to have a vessel in a safer
berth, so long as her spars and hull were exposed to the
gales of the ocean, or one that was more convenient to
those who used the island. By getting down her spars and
other hamper, the power of the winds would be much
lessened, though Mark felt little apprehension of the winds
at that season of the year, so long as the sea could not
make a long rake against the vessel. He believed the ship
safe for the present, and felt the hope of still finding a
passage
,
through the reef to leeward, reviving in his breast.
Well might Mark and Bob rejoice in the great feat they
had just performed. That night it blew so heavily as to
leave little doubt that the ship never could have been kept
at her anchor, outside; and had she struck adrift in the
darkness, nothing could have saved them from almost
immediate
destruction. The rollers came down in
tremendous
billows, breaking and roaring on all sides of the island,
rendering the sea white with their foam, even at midnight;
but, on reaching the massive, natural wall that protected
the Rancocus, they dashed themselves into spray against
it, wetting the vessel from her truck down, but doing her
no injury. Mark remained on deck until past twelve
o'clock, when finding that the gale was already breaking,
he turned in and slept soundly until morning. As for Bob,
he had taken his watch below early in the evening, and
there he remained undisturbed until the appearance of
day, when he turned out of his own accord.
Mark took another look at the sea, reefs and islands,
from the main-topmast cross-trees of the ship, as she lay
in her new berth. Of course, the range of his vision was
somewhat altered by this change of position, and especially
did he see a greater distance to the westward, or towards
the lee side of the reefs. Nothing encouraging was made
out, however; the young man rather inclining more to the
opinion than he had ever done before, that the vessel could
not be extricated from the rocks which surrounded her.
With this conviction strongly renewed, he descended to
the deck, to share in the breakfast Bob had set about
preparing
,
the moment he quitted his cat-tails; for Bob
insisted
on sleeping in the forecastle, though Mark had
pressed him to take one of the cabin state-rooms. This
time the meal, which included some very respectable ship's
coffee, was taken on the cabin-table, the day being
cloudless
,
and the sun's rays possessing a power that made it
unpleasant to sit long anywhere out of a shade. While
the meal was taken, another conversation was held
touching
their situation.
By the manner in which it blew last night, Mark
observed
,
I doubt if we should have had this comfortable
cabin to eat in this morning, and these good articles to
consume, had we left the ship outside until morning.
I look upon it as a good job well done, Mr. Mark,
answered Bob. I must own I had no great hopes of our
ever getting here, but was willing to try it; for them rollers
didn't mind half-a-dozen reefs, but came tumbling in over
them, in a way to threaten the old 'Cocus with being
ground into powder. For my part, sir, I thank God, from
the bottom of my heart, that we are here.
You have reason to do so, Bob; and while we may
both regret the misfortune that has befallen us, we had
need remember how much better off we are than our
shipmates
,
poor fellows!or how much better we are off than
many a poor mariner who loses his vessel altogether.
Yes, the saving of the ship is a great thing for us.
We can hardly call this a shipwreck, Mr. Mark, though
we have been ashore once; it is more like being docked,
than anything else!
I have heard, before, of vessels being carried over
reefs, and bars of rivers, into berths they could not quit,
answered Mark. But, reflect a moment, Bob, how much
better our condition is, than if we had been washed down
on this naked reef, with only such articles to comfort us,
as could be picked up along shore from the wreck!
I 'm glad to hear you talk in this rational way, Mr.
Mark; for it 's a sign you do not give up, or take things
too deeply to heart. I was afeard that you might be
thinking
too much of Miss Bridget, and make yourself more
unhappy than is necessary for a man who has things so
comfortable around him.
The separation from my wife causes me much pain,
Betts, but I trust in God. It has been in his pleasure to
place us in this extraordinary situation, and I hope that
something good will come of it.
That's the right sentiments, sironly keep such
feelings
uppermost, and we shall do right down well. Why,
we have water, in plenty, until after the rainy season shall
be along, when we can catch a fresh supply. Then, there
is beef and pork enough betwixt decks to last you and me
five or six years; and bread and flour in good quantities,
to say nothing of lots of small stores, both forward and aft.
The ship is well found, and, as you say, we might live
a long time, years certainly, on the food she contains
There is, however, one thing to be dreaded, and to provide
against which shall be my first care. We are now fifty
days on salted provisions, and fifty more will give us both
the scurvy.
The Lord in his mercy protect me from that disease!
exclaimed Bob. I had it once, in an old v'y'ge round
the Horn, and have no wish to try it ag'in. But there
must be fish in plenty among these rocks, Mr. Mark, and
we have a good stock of bread. By dropping the beef and
pork, for a few days at a time, might we not get shut of
the danger?
Fish will help us, and turtle would be a great resource,
could we meet with any of
that
. But, man requires mixed
food, meats and vegetables, to keep him healthy; and
nothing
is so good for the scurvy as the last. The worst of
our situation is a want of soil, to grow any vegetables in.
I did not see so much as a rush, or the coarsest sea-plant,
when we were on the island yesterday. If we had soil,
there is seed in plenty on board, and this climate would
bring forward vegetation at a rapid rate.
Ay, ay, sir, and I'll tell you what I've got in the way
of seeds, myself. You may remember the delicious musk
and water-melons we fell in with last v'y'ge, in the east.
Well, sir, I saved some of the seed, thinking to give it to
my brother, who is a Jarsey farmer, you know, sir; and,
sailor-like, I forgot it altogether, when in port. If a fellow
could get but a bit of earth to put them melon-seeds in,
we might be eating our fruit like gentlemen, two months
hence, or three months, at the latest.
That is a good thought, Betts, and we will turn it over
in our minds. If such a thing is to be done at all, the
sooner it is done the better, that the melons may be getting
ahead while we are busy with the other matters. This is
just the season to put seed into the ground, and I think
we might make soil enough to sustain a few hills of melons.
If I remember right, too, there are some of the sweet
potatoes
left.
Bob assented, and during the rest of the meal they did
nothing but pursue this plan of endeavouring to obtain
half-a-dozen or a dozen hills of melons. As Mark felt all
the importance of doing everything that lay in his power
to ward off the scurvy, and knew that time was not to be
lost, he determined that the very first thing he would now
attend to, would be to get all the seed into as much ground
as he could contrive to make. Accordingly, as soon as
the breakfast was ended, Mark went to collect his seeds,
7 *
while Bob set the breakfast things aside, after properly
cleaning them.
There were four shoats on board, which had been kept
in the launch, until that boat was put into the water, the
night the Rancocus ran upon the rocks. Since that time
they had been left to run about the decks, producing a
good deal of dirt, and some confusion. These shoats Bob
now caught, and dropped into the bay, knowing that their
instinct would induce them to swim for the nearest land.
All this turned out as was expected, and the pigs were
soon seen on the island, snuffing around on the rocks, and
trying to root. A small quantity of the excrement of these
animals still lay on the deck, where it had been placed
when the launch was cleaned for service, no one thinking
at such a moment of cleaning the decks. It had been
washed by the sea that came aboard quite across the deck,
but still formed a pile, and most of it was preserved. This
manure Mark was about to put in a half-barrel, in order
to carry it ashore, for the purpose of converting it into
soil, when Bob suddenly put an end to what he was about,
by telling him that he knew where a manure worth two of
that was to be found. An explanation was asked and
given. Bob, who had been several voyages on the western
coast of America, told Mark that the Peruvians and
Chilians
made great use of the dung of aquatic birds, as a
manure, and which they found on the rocks that lined their
coast. Now two or three rocks lay near the reef, that
were covered with this deposit, the birds still hovering
about them, and he proposed to take the dingui, and go
in quest of a little of that fertilizing manure. A very little,
he said, would suffice, the Spaniards using it in small
quantities, but applying it at different stages in the growth
of the plant. It is scarcely necessary to say that Bob had
fallen on a knowledge of the use of the article which is
now so extensively known under the name of guano, in the
course of his wanderings, and was enabled to communicate
the fact to his companion. Mark knew that Betts was a
man of severe truth, and he was so much the more disposed
to listen to his suggestion. While our young mate was
getting the boat ready, therefore, Bob collected his tools,
provided himself with a bucket, passed the half-barrel, into
which Mark had thrown the sweepings of the decks, into
the dingui, and descended himself and took the sculls.
The two then proceeded to Bob's rock, where, amid the
screams of a thousand sea-birds, the honest fellow filled his
bucket with as good guano as was ever found on the coast
of Peru.
While the boat was at the rock, Mark saw that the pigs
had run round to the western end of the island, snuffing at
everything that came in their way, and trying in vain to
root wherever one of them could insert his nose. As a
hog is a particularly sagacious animal, Mark kept his eyes
on them while Bob was picking out his guano, in the faint
hope that they might discover fresh water, by means of
their instinct. In this way he saw them enter the gate
way of the crater, pigs being pretty certain to run their
noses into any such place as that.
On landing, Mark took a part of the tools and the bucket
of guano, while Bob shouldered the remainder, and they
went up to the hole, and entered the crater together,
having
landed as near to the gate-way as they could get, with
that object. To Mark's great delight he found that the
pigs were now actually rooting with some success, so far
as stirring the surface was concerned, though getting
absolutely
nothing for their pains. There were spots on the
plain of the crater, however, where it was possible, by
breaking a sort of crust, to get down into coarse ashes that
were not entirely without some of the essentials of soil.
Exposure to the air and water, with mixing up with
sea-weed
and such other waste materials as he could collect,
the young man fancied would enable him to obtain a
sufficiency
of earthy substances to sustain the growth of plants.
While on the summit of the crater-wall, he had seen two
or three places where it had struck him sweet-potatoes and
beans might be made to grow, and he determined to ascend
to those spots, and make his essay there, as being the most
removed from the inroads of the pigs. Could he only
succeed
in obtaining two or three hundred melons, he felt
that a great deal would be done in providing the means of
checking any disposition to scurvy that might appear in
Bob or himself. In this thoughtful manner did one so
young look ahead, and make provision for the future.
CHAPTER VI.
that done, partake
The season, prime for sweetest scents and airs;
Then commune how that day they best may ply
Their growing work; for much their work outgrew
The hands dispatch of two gard'ning so wide.
Milton
.
Our
two mariners had come ashore well provided with
the means of carrying out their plans. The Rancocus
was far better provided with tools suited to the uses of the
land, than was common for ships, her voyage contemplating
a long stay among the islands she was to visit. Thus, axes
and picks were not wanting, Captain Crutchely having had
an eye to the possible necessity of fortifying himself against
savages. Mark now ascended the crater-wall with a pick
on his shoulder, and a part of a coil of ratlin-stuff around
his neck. As he went up, he used the pick to make steps,
and did so much in that way, in the course of ten minutes,
as greatly to facilitate the ascent and descent at the
particular
place he had selected. Once on the summit, he
found a part of the rock that overhung its base, and dropped
one end of his line into the crater. To this Bob attached
the bucket, which Mark hauled up and emptied. In this
manner everything was transferred to the top of the
crater-wall
that was needed there, when Bob went down to the
dingui to roll up the half-barrel of sweepings that had been
brought from the ship.
Mark next looked about for the places which had seemed
to him, on his previous visit, to have most of the character
of soil. He found a plenty of these spots, mostly in
detached
cavities of no great extent, where the crust had not
yet formed; or, having once formed, had been disturbed
by the action of the elements. These places he first picked
to pieces with his pick; then he stirred them well up with
a hoe, scattering a little guano in the heaps, according to
the directions of Betts. When this was done, he sent
down the bucket, and hauled up the sweepings of the deck,
which Bob had ready for him, below. Nor was this all
Bob had done, during the hour Mark was at work, in the
sun, on the summit of the crater. He had found a large
deposit of sea-weed, on a rock near the island, and had
made two or three trips with the dingui, back and forth,
to transfer some of it to the crater. After all his toil and
trouble, the worthy fellow did not get more than a
hogshead
full of this new material, but Mark thought it well
worth while to haul it up, and to endeavour to mix it with
his compost. This was done by making it up in bundles,
as one would roll up hay, of a size that the young man
could manage.
Bob now joined his friend on the crater-wall, and
assisted
in carrying the sea-weed to the places prepared to
receive it, when both of the mariners next set about mixing
it up with the other ingredients of the intended soil. After
working for another hour in this manner, they were of
opinion that they might make the experiment of putting in
the seed. Melons, of both sorts, and of the very best
quality, were now put into the ground, as were also beans,
peas, and Indian-corn, or maize. A few cucumber-seeds,
and some onions were also tried, Captain Crutchely having
brought with him a considerable quantity of the common
garden seeds, as a benefit conferred on the natives of the
islands he intended to visit, and through them on future
navigators. This care proceeded from his owners, who
were what is called `Friends,' and who somewhat oddly
blended benevolence with the practices of worldly gain.
Mark certainly knew very little of gardening, but Bob
could turn his hand to almost anything. Several mistakes
were made, notwithstanding, more particularly in the use
of the seed, with which they were not particularly
acquainted
.
Mark's Reef lay just within the tropics, it is
true (in 21 south latitude), but the constant sea-breeze
rendered its climate much cooler than would otherwise
have been the case. Thus the peas, and beans, and even
the onions, did better, perhaps, on the top of the crater,
than they would have done in it; but the ochre, egg-plants,
melons, and two or three other seeds that they used, would
probably have succeeded better had they been placed in
the warmest spots which could be found. In one respect
Mark made a good gardener. He knew that moisture was
indispensable to the growth of most plants, and had taken
care to put all his seeds into cavities, where the rain that
fell (and he had no reason to suppose that the dry season
had yet set in) would not run off and be wasted. On this
point he manifested a good deal of judgment, using his
hoe in a way to avoid equally the danger of having too
much or too little water.
It was dinner-time before Mark and Betts were ready
to quit the `Summit,' as they now began to term the only
height in their solitary domains. Bob had foreseen the
necessity of a shade, and had thrown an old royal into the
boat. With this, and two or three light spars, he contrived
to make a sort of canopy, down in the crater, beneath
which he and Mark dined, and took their siestas. While
resting on a spare studding-sail that had also been brought
along, the mariners talked over what they had done, and
what it might be best to undertake next.
Thus far Mark had been working under a species of
excitement, that was probably natural enough to his
situation
,
but which wanted the coolness and discretion that are
necessary to render our efforts the most profitable to
ourselves
,
or to others. Now, that the feverish feeling which
set him at work so early to make a provision against wants
which, at the worst, were merely problematical, had
subsided
,
Mark began to see that there remained many things
to do, which were of even more pressing necessity than
anything yet done. Among the first of these there was
the perfect security of the ship. So long as she rode at a
single anchor, she could not be considered as absolutely
safe; for a shift of wind would cause her to swing against
the `sea-wall,' as he called the natural breakwater outside
of her, where, if not absolutely wrecked, she might receive
material damage. Prudence required, therefore, that the
ship should be moored, as well as anchored.
Nevertheless
,
there was a good deal of truth in what Mark had said
touching the plants growing while he and Bob were busy
at other matters; and this thought, of itself, formed a
sufficient
justification for what he had just done, much as it
had been done under present excitement. As they lay
under the shade of the royal, our mariners discussed these
matters, and matured some plans for the future.
At two o'clock Mark and Bob resumed their work.
The latter suggested the necessity of getting food and
water ashore for the pigs, as an act that humanity
imperiously
demanded of them; not humanity in the sense of
feeling for our kind, but in the sense in which we all ought
to feel for animal suffering, whether endured by man or
beast. Mark assented as to the food, but was of opinion
a thunder shower was about to pass over the reef. The
weather certainly did wear this aspect, and Bob was
content
to wait the result, in order to save himself unnecessary
trouble. As for the pigs, they were still in the crater
rooting, as it might be for life or death, though nothing
edible had as yet rewarded them for their toil. Perhaps
they found it pleasant to be thrusting their noses into
something
that resembled soil, after so long a confinement to
the planks of a ship. Seeing them at work in this
manner
,
suggested to Mark to try another experiment, which
certainly looked far enough ahead, as if he had no great
hopes of getting off the island for years to come. Among
the seeds of Captain Crutchely were those of oranges,
lemons, limes, shaddocks, figs, and grapes; all plants well
enough suited to the place, if there were only soil to
nourish
them. Now, one of the hogs had been rooting, as
best he might, just under the wall, on the northern side of
the crater, making a long row of little hillocks, of earthy
ashes, at unequal distances it is true, but well enough
disposed
for the nature of the different fruits, could they only
be got to grow. Along this irregular row of hillocks did
Mark bury his seeds, willing to try an experiment which
might possibly benefit some other human being, if it never
did any good to himself. When this was done, he and
Betts left the crater, driving the hogs out before them.
Having made his plantation, Mark felt a natural desire
to preserve it. He got the royal, therefore, and succeeded
in fastening it up as a substitute for a gate, in their natural
gate-way. Had the pigs met with any success in rooting,
it is not probable this slight obstacle would have prevented
their finding their way, again, into the cavity of the crater;
but, as it was, it proved all-sufficient, and the sail was
permitted
to hang before the hole, until a more secure gate
was suspended in its stead.
The appearances of the thunder-shower were so much
increased by this time, that our mariners hastened back to
the ship in order to escape a ducking. They had hardly
got on board before the gust came, a good deal of water
falling, though not in the torrents in which one sometimes
sees it stream down within the tropics. In an hour it was
all over, the sun coming out bright and scorching, after
the passage of the gust. One thing occurred, however,
which at first caused both of the seamen a good deal of
uneasiness, and again showed them the necessity there was
for mooring the ship. The wind shifted from the ordinary
direction of the trades, during the squall, to a current of
air that was nearly at right angles to the customary course.
This caused the ship to swing, and brought her so near the
sea-wall, that once or twice her side actually rubbed against
it. Mark was aware, by his previous sounding, that this
wall rather impended over its base, being a part of an old
crater, beyond a question, and that there was little danger
of the vessel's hitting the bottom, or taking harm in any
other way than by friction against the upper part; but this
friction might become too rude, and finally endanger the
safety of the vessel.
As soon as the weather became fine, however, the trades
returned, and the ship swung round to her old berth. Bob
now suggested the expediency of carrying out their
heaviest
kedge ashore, of planting it in the rocks, and of
running
out to it two or three parts of a hawser, to which a
line of planks might be lashed, and thus give them the
means of entering and quitting the ship, without having
recourse to the dingui. Mark approved of this plan, and,
it requiring a raft to carry ashore the kedge, the dingui
being so light they were afraid to trust it, it was decided
to commence that work in the morning. For the rest of
the present day nothing further was done, beyond light
and necessary jobs, and continuing the examination of the
island. Mark was curious to look at the effect of the
shower, both in reference to his plantations, and to the
quantity of fresh water that might have lodged on the reef.
It was determined, therefore, to pass an hour or two ashore
before the night shut in again.
Previously to quitting the ship, Bob spoke of the poultry.
There were but six hens, a cock, and five ducks, left.
They were all as low in flesh and spirits, as it was usual
to find birds that have been at sea fifty days, and the honest
tar proposed turning them all adrift on the reef, to make
their own living in the best way they could. Now and
then a little food might be put in their way, but let them
have a chance for their lives. Mark assented at once, and
the coops were opened. Each fowl was carried to the
taffrail
,
and tossed into the air, when it flew down upon the
reef, a distance of a couple of hundred feet, almost as a
matter of course. Glad enough were the poor things to
be thus liberated. To Mark's surprise, no sooner did they
reach the reef, than to work they went, and commenced
picking up something with the greatest avidity, as if let
loose in the best supplied poultry-yard. Confident there
was nothing for even a hen to glean on the rocks when he
left there, the young man could not account for this, until
turning his eyes inboard, he saw the ducks doing the same
thing on deck. Examining the food of these last-mentioned
animals, he found there were a great number of minute
mucilaginous particles on the deck, which no doubt had
descended with the late rain, and which all the birds, as
well as the hogs, seemed eager to devour. Here, then,
was a supply, though a short-lived one, of a manna suited
to those creatures, which might render them happy for a
few hours, at least. Bob caught the ducks, and tossed
them overboard, when they floundered about and enjoyed
themselves in a way that communicated a certain pleasure
even to the desolate and shipwrecked men who had set
them at liberty. Nothing with life now remained in the
ship but the goat, and Mark thought it best not to turn
her ashore until they had greater facilities for getting the
necessary food to her than the dingui afforded. As she
was not likely to breed, there was no great use in keeping
this animal at all, to say nothing of the means of feeding
her, for any length of time; but Mark was unwilling to
take her life, since Providence had brought them all to
that place in company. Then he thought she might be a
Vol. I.  8
pretty object leaping about the cliffs of the crater, giving
the island a more lively and inhabited appearance, though
he foresaw she might prove very destructive to his
plantations
,
did his vegetables grow. As there was time enough
to decide on her final fate, it was finally settled she should
be put ashore, and have a comfortable fortnight, even
though condemned to die at the end of that brief period.
On landing, every hole in the face of the cliff was found
filled with fresh water. Betts was of opinion that the
water-casks might all be filled with the water which was
thus collected, the fluid having seemingly all flowed into
these receptacles, while little had gone into the sea. This
was encouraging for the future, at any rate; the want of
water, previously to this shower, appearing to Mark to be
a more probable occurrence than the want of food. The
sea might furnish the last, on an emergency, while it could
do nothing with the first. But the manner in which the
ducks were enjoying themselves, in these fresh pools, can
scarcely be imagined! As Mark stood looking at them, a
doubt first suggested itself to his mind concerning the
propriety
of men's doing anything that ran counter to their
instincts, with any of the creatures of God. Pet-birds in
cages, birds that were created to fly, had always been
disagreeable
to him; nor did he conceive it to be any answer
to say that they were born in cages, and had never known
liberty. They were created with an instinct for flight,
and intense must be their longings to indulge in the power
which nature had bestowed on them. In the cage in which
he now found himself, though he could run, walk, leap,
swim, or do aught that nature designed him to do, in the
way of mere animal exploits, young Mark felt how bitter
were the privations he was condemned to suffer.
The rain had certainly done no harm, as yet, to the
planting. All the hills were entire, as Mark and Bob had
left them, though well saturated with water. In a few,
there might be even too much of the element, perhaps, but
Mark observed that a tropical sun would soon remove that
objection. His great apprehension was that he had
commenced
his gardening too late, and that the dry weather
might set in too soon for the good of his vegetables; if any
of them, indeed, ever came up at all. Here was one good
soaking secured, at all events; and, knowing the power
of a tropical sun, Mark was of opinion that the fate of the
great experiment he had tried would soon be known. Could
he succeed in producing vegetation among the
dbris
of
the crater, he and Bob might find the means of subsistence
during their natural lives; but, should that resource fail
them, all their hopes would depend on being able to effect
their escape in a craft of their own construction. In no
case, however, but that of the direst necessity, did Mark
contemplate the abandonment of his plan for getting back
to the inhabited world, his country, and his bride!
That night our mariners had a sounder sleep than they
had yet been blest with since the loss of their shipmates,
and the accident to the vessel itself. The two following
days they passed in securing the ship. Bob actually made
a very respectable catamaran, or raft, out of the spare
spars, sawing the topmasts and lower yards in two, for that
purpose, and fastening them together with ingenuity and
strength, by means of lashings. But Mark hit upon an
expedient for getting the two kedges ashore, that prevented
the necessity of having recourse to the raft on that
occasion
.
These kedges lay on the poop, where they were
habitually kept, and two men had no great difficulty in
getting them over the stern, suspended by stoppers. Now
Mark had ascertained that the rock of the Reef rose like
a wall, being volcanic, like all the rest of the formation,
and that the ship could float almost anywhere alongside of
it. Aided by the rake of the stern of an old-fashioned
Philadelphia-built ship, nothing was easier than to veer
upon the cable, let the vessel drop in to the island, until
the kedges actually hung over the rocks, and then lower
the last down. All this was done, and the raft was
reserved
for other purposes. Notwithstanding the facility
with which the kedges were got ashore, it took Mark and
Bob quite half a day to plant them in the rock precisely
where they were wanted. When this was accomplished,
however, it was so effectually done as to render the hold
even greater than that of the sheet-anchor. The stocks
were not used at all, but the kedges were laid flat on the
rock, quite near to each other, and in such a manner that
the flukes were buried in crevices of the lava, giving a
most secure hold, while the shanks came out through
natural grooves, leading straight towards the ship. Six
parts of a hawser were bent to the kedges, three to each, and
these parts were held at equal distances by pieces of spars
ingeniously placed between them, the whole being kept in
its place by regular stretchers that were lashed along the
hawsers at distances of ten feet, giving all the parts of the
ropes the same level. Before these stretchers were
secured
,
the ship was hove ahead by her cable, and the
several parts of the hawser brought to an equal strain.
This left the vessel about a hundred feet from the island,
a convenient, and if the anchor held, a
safe
position; though
Mark felt little fear of losing the ship against rocks that
were so perpendicular and smooth. On the stretchers
planks were next laid and lashed, thus making a clear
passage
between the vessel and the shore, that might be used
at all times, without recourse to the dingui; besides
mooring
the ship head and stern, thereby keeping her always
in the same place, and in the same position.
The business of securing the ship occupied nearly two
days, and was not got through with until about the middle
of the afternoon of the second day. It was Saturday, and
Mark had determined to make a good beginning, and keep
all their Sabbaths, in future, as holy times, set apart for the
special service of the Creator. He had been born and
educated an Episcopalian, but Bob claimed to be a Quaker,
and what was more he was a little stiff in some of his
notions
on the opinion of his sect. The part of New Jersey
in which Betts was born, had many persons of this
religious
persuasion, and he was not only born, but, in one
sense, educated in their midst; though the early age at
which he went to sea had very much unsettled his
practice
,
much the most material part of the tenets of these
good persons. When the two knocked off work, Saturday
afternoon, therefore, it was with an understanding that the
next day was to be one of rest in the sense of Christians,
and, from that time henceforth, that the Sabbath was to
be kept as a holy day. Mark had ever been inclined to
soberness of thought on such subjects. His early
engagement
to Bridget had kept him from falling into the ways
of most mariners, and, time and again, had a future state
of being been the subject of discourse between him and
his betrothed. As the seasons of adversity are those in
which men are the most apt to bethink them of their duties
to God, it is not at all surprising that one of this
disposition
,
thus situated, felt renewed demands on his gratitude
and repentance.
While Mark, in this frame of mind, went rambling
around his narrow domains, Bob got the dingui, and
proceeded
with his fishing-tackle towards some of the naked
rocks, that lifted their caps above the surface of the sea,
in a north-westerly direction from the crater. Of these
naked rocks there were near twenty, all within a mile of
the crater, and the largest of them not containing more
than six or eight acres of dry surface. Some were less
than a hundred feet in diameter. The great extent and
irregular formation of the reefs all around the island, kept
the water smooth, for some distance, on all sides of it; and
it was only when the rollers were sent in by heavy gales,
that the dingui could not move about, in this its proper
sphere, in safety.
Betts was very fond of fishing, and could pass whole
days, at a time, in that quiet amusement, provided he had
a sufficient supply of tobacco. Indeed, one of the greatest
consolations this man possessed, under the present
misfortune
,
was the ample store of this weed which was to be
found in the ship. Every man on board the Rancocus,
Mark alone excepted, made use of tobacco; and, for so
long a voyage, the provision laid in had been very
abundant
.
On this occasion, Bob enjoyed his two favourite
occupations to satiety, masticating the weed while he
fished.
With Mark it was very different. He was fond of his
fowling-piece, but of little use was that weapon in his
present
situation. Of all the birds that frequented the
adjacent
rocks, not one was of a sort that would be eaten,
unless
in cases of famine. As he walked over the island,
that afternoon, his companion was the goat, which had
been driven ashore on the new gangway, and was enjoying
its liberty almost as much as the ducks. As the animal
frisked about him, accompanying him everywhere in his
walks. Mark was reminded of the goats of Crusoe, and his
8 *
mind naturally adverted to the different accounts of
shipwrecks
of which he had read, and to a comparison between
his own condition and those of other mariners who had been
obliged to make their homes, for a time, on otherwise
uninhabited
islands.
In this comparison, Mark saw that many things made
greatly against him, on the one hand; while, on the other,
there were many others for which he had every reason to
be profoundly grateful. In the first place, this island was,
as yet, totally without vegetation of every kind. It had
neither plant, shrub, nor tree. In this he suffered a great
privation, and it even remained to be proved by actual
experiment, whether he was master of what might be
considered
the elements of soil. It occurred to him that
something like vegetation must have shown itself, in or
about the crater, did its
dbris
contain the fertilizing
principle
,
Mark not being sufficiently versed in the new science
of chemical agriculture, to understand that the admixtures
of certain elements might bring to life forces that then
were dormant. Then the Reef had no water. This was
a very, very great privation, the most serious of all, and
might prove to be a terrible calamity. It is true that, just
at that moment, there was a shower every day, and
sometimes
two or three of them; but it was then spring, and
there could be little reason to doubt that droughts would
come in the hot and dry season. As a last objection, the
Reef had no great extent, and no variety, the eye taking
it all in at a glance, while the crater was its sole relief
against the dullest monotony. Nor was there a bit of wood,
or fuel of any sort to cook with, after the supply now in
the ship should be exhausted. Such were the leading
disadvantages
of the situation in which our mariners were
placed, as compared with those into which most other
shipwrecked seamen had been thrown.
The advantages, on the other hand, Mark, in humble
gratitude to God, admitted to be very great. In the first
place, the ship and all she contained was preserved, giving
them a dwelling, clothes, food and water, as well as fuel,
for a long time to come; possibly, aided by what might be
gleaned on even that naked reef, sufficient to meet all their
wants for the duration of a human life. The cargo of the
Rancocus was of no great extent, and of little value in a
civilized country; but Mark knew that it included many
articles that would be of vast service where he was. The
beads and coarse trinkets with which it had been intended
to trade with the savages, were of no use whatever, it is
true; but the ship's owners were pains-taking and
thoughtful
Quakers, as has been already intimated, who blended
with great shrewdness in the management of their worldly
affairs, a certain regard to benevolence in general, and a
desire to benefit their species. On this principle, they had
caused a portion of their cargo to be made up, sending, in
addition to all the ruder and commoner tools, that could
be used by a people without domestic animals, a small
supply of rugs, coarse clothes, coarse earthen-ware, and a
hundred similar things, that would be very serviceable to
any who knew how to use them. Most of the seeds came
from these thoughtful merchants.
If fresh water were absolutely wanting on the reef, it
rained a good deal; in the rainy season it must rain for a
few weeks almost incessantly, and the numerous cavities
in the ancient lava, formed natural cisterns of great
capacity
.
By taking the precaution of filling up the
water-casks
of the ship, periodically, there was little danger of
suffering for the want of this great requisite. It is true,
the sweet, cool, grateful draught, that was to be got from
the gushing spring, must be forgotten; but rain-water
collected
in clean rock, and preserved in well-sweetened
casks, was very tolerable drinking for seamen. Captain
Crutchely, moreover, had a filterer for the cabin, and
through it all the water used there was habitually passed.
In striking the balance between the advantages and
disadvantages
of his own situation, as compared with that of
other shipwrecked mariners, Mark confessed that he had
quite as much reason to be grateful as to repine. The
last he was resolved not to do, if possible; and he pursued
his walk in a more calm and resigned mood than he had
been in since the ship entered among the shoals.
Mark, naturally enough, cast his eyes around him, and
asked himself the question what was to be done with the
domestic animals they had now all landed. The hogs
might, or might not be of the greatest importance to them,
as their residence on the island was or was not protracted,
and as they found the means of feeding them. There was
still food enough in the ship to keep these creatures for
some months, and food that had been especially laid in for
that purpose; but that food would serve equally well for
the fowls, and our young man was of opinion, that eggs
would be of more importance to himself and Betts, than
hog's flesh. Then there was the goat; she would soon
cease to be of any use at all, and green food was not to be
had for her. A little hay, however, remained; and Mark
was fully determined that Kitty, as the playful little thing
was called, should live at least as long as that lasted. She
was fortunate in being content with a nourishment that no
other animal wanted.
Mark could see absolutely nothing on the rocks for a
bird to live on, yet were the fowls constantly picking up
something. They probably found insects that escaped his
sight; while it was certain that the ducks were revelling
in the pools of fresh water, of which there might, at that
moment, have been a hundred on the reef. As all these
creatures were, as yet, regularly fed from the supplies in
the ship, each seemed to be filled with the joy of existence;
and Mark, as he walked among them, felt how profound
ought to be his own gratitude, since he was still in a state
of being which admitted of a consciousness of happiness
so much beyond anything that was known to the inferior
animals of creation. He had his mind, with all its stores
gathered from study and observation, his love for God, and
his hopes of a blessed future, ever at command. Even his
love for Bridget had its sweets, as well as its sorrows. It
was grateful to think of her tenderness to himself, her
beauty, her constancy, of which he would not for a moment
doubt, and of all the innocent and delightful converse they
had had during a courtship that occupied so much of their
brief lives.
Just as the sun was setting, Bob returned from his
fishing
excursion. To Mark's surprise, he saw that the dingui
floated almost with her gunwale-to, and he hastened down
to meet his friend, who came ashore in a little bay, quite
near the gate-way, and in which the rock did not rise as
much like a wall as it did on most of the exterior of the
reef. Bob had caught about a dozen fish, some of which
were of considerable size, though all were of either species
or varieties that were unknown to them both. Selecting
two of the most promising-looking, for their own use, he
threw the others on the rocks, where the pigs and poultry
might give them a trial. Nor was it long before these
creatures were hard at work on them, disregarding the
scales and fins. At first the hens were a little delicate,
probably from having found animal food enough for their
present wants in the insects; but, long before the game
was demolished, they had come in for their full share.
This experiment satisfied the mariners that there would be
no difficulty in furnishing plenty of food for all their stock,
and for any length of time, Kitty excepted. It is true, the
pork and the poultry would be somewhat fishy; but that
would be a novelty, and should it prove disagreeable on
tasting it, a little clean feeding, at the proper moment,
would correct the flavour.
But the principal cargo of the dingui was not the dozen
fish mentioned. Bob had nearly filled the boat with a sort
of vegetable loam, that he had found lodged in the cavity
of one of the largest rocks, and which, from the signs
around the place, he supposed to have been formed by
deposits
of sea-weed. By an accident of nature, this cavity
in the rock received a current, which carried large
quantities
of floating weed
into
it, while every storm probably
had added to its stores since the mass had risen above the
common level of the sea, by throwing fresh materials on
to the pile, by means of the waves, nothing quitting it.
Bob reported that there were no signs of vegetation around
the rock, which circumstance, however, was easily enough
accounted for by the salt water that was incessantly
moistening
the surface, and which, while it took with it the
principle of future, was certain to destroy all present,
vegetable
life; or, all but that which belongs exclusively to
aquatic plants.
How much of this muck do you suppose is to be found
on your rock, Bob? asked Mark, after he had examined
the dingui's cargo, by sight, taste, and smell. It is
surprisingly
like a rich earth, if it be not actually so.
Lord bless you, Mr. Mark, there is enough on't to fill
the old 'Cocus, ag'in and ag'in. How deep it is, I don't
pretend to know; but it 's a good hundred paces across it,
and the spot is as round as that there chimbly, that you
call a cr'ature.
If that be the case, we will try our hands at it next
week, and see what can be done with an importation. I
do not give up the blessed hope of the boat, Bobthat you
will always bear in mindbut it is best to keep an eye on
the means of living, should it please God to prevent our
getting to sea again.
To sea, Mr. Mark, neither you nor I, nor any mortal
man will ever get, in the old 'Cocus ag'in, as I know by
the looks of things outside of us. 'T will never do to plant
in my patch, however, for the salt water must wash it
whenever it blows; though a very little work, too, might
keep it out, when I come to think on it. Sparrowgrass
would grow there, as it is, desperately well; and Friend
Abraham White had both seeds and roots put up for the
use of the savages, if a body only know'd whereabouts to
look for them, among the lot of rubbish of that sort, that
he sent aboard.
All the seeds and roots are in two or three boxes, in
the steerage, answered Mark. I 'll just step up to the
crater and bring a shovel, to throw this loam out of the
boat with, while you can clean the fish and cook the
supper
.
A little fresh food, after so much salt, will be both
pleasant and good for us.
Bob assented, and each went his way. Mark threw the
loam into a wheelbarrow, of which Friend Abraham had
put no less than three in the ship, as presents to the savages,
and he wheeled it, at two or three loads, into the crater,
where he threw it down in a pile, intending to make a
compost heap of all the materials of the sort he could lay
his hands on.
As for Bob he cleaned both fish, taking them on board
the ship to do so. He put the largest and coarsest into
the coppers, after cutting it up, mixing with it onions,
pork, and ship's bread, intending to start a fire beneath it
early in the morning, and cook a sort of chowder. The
other he fried, Mark and he making a most grateful meal
on it, that evening.
CHAPTER VII.
Be thou at peace!Th' all-seeing eye,
Pervading earth, and air, and sky,
The searching glance which none may flee,
Is still, in mercy, turn'd on thee.
Mrs. Hemans
.
The
Sabbath ever dawns on the piously-inclined, with
hope and a devout gratitude to the Creator for all his
mercies
.
This is more apt to be the case in genial seasons,
and rural abodes, perhaps, than amidst the haunts of men,
and when the thoughts are diverted from the proper
channels
by the presence of persons around us. Still greater
is the influence of absolute solitude, and that increased by
the knowledge of a direct and visible dependence on the
Providence of God, for the means of even prolonging
existence
.
In the world, men lose sight of this dependence,
fancying themselves and their powers of more account
than the truth would warrant, and even forgetting whence
these very boasted powers are derived; but man, when
alone, and in critical circumstances, is made to feel that
he is not sufficient for his own wants, and turns with
humility
and hope to the divine hand that upholds him.
With feelings of this character, did Mark and Betts keep
their first Sabbath on the reef. The former read the
morning service, from beginning to end, while the latter
sat by, an attentive listener. The only proof given of any
difference in religious faith between our mariners, was of
so singular a nature as to merit notice. Notwithstanding
Bob's early familiarity with Mark, his greater age, and the
sort of community of feeling and interest created by their
common misfortune, the former had not ceased to treat the
last with the respect due to his office. This deference
never deserted him, and he had not once since the ship
was embayed, entered the cabin without pulling off his hat.
As soon as church commenced, however, Bob resumed his
tarpaulin, as a sort of sign of his own orthodoxy in the
faith of his fathers; making it a point to do as they had
done in meeting, and slightly concerned lest his companion
might fall into the error of supposing he was a man likely
to be converted. Mark also observed that, in the course
of that Sabbath, Bob used the pronouns `thee' and `thou,'
on two or three occasions, sounding oddly enough in the
mouth of the old salt.
Well did both our mariners prove the efficacy of the
divine provision of a day of rest, in a spiritual sense, on
the occasion of this their first Sabbath on the reef. Mark
felt far more resigned to his fate than he could have
believed
possible, while Betts declared that he should be
absolutely happy, had he only a better boat than the dingui;
not that the dingui was at all a bad craft of its kind, but
it wanted size. After the religious services, for which
both our mariners had shaved and dressed, they took a
walk together, on the reef, conversing of their situation
and future proceedings. Bob then told Mark, for the first
time, that, in his opinion, there was the frame and the
other materials of a pinnace, or a large boat, somewhere
in the hold, which it was intended to put together, when
the ship reached the islands, as a convenience for cruising
about among them to trade with the savages, and to
transport
sandal-wood. The mate had never heard of this boat,
but acknowledged that a part of the hold had been stowed
while he was up at Bristol, and it might have been taken
in then. Bob confessed that he had never seen it, though
he had worked in the stevedore's gang; but was confident
he had heard Friend Abraham White and Captain
Crutchely
talking of its dimensions and uses. According to his
recollection it was to be a boat considerably larger than
the launch, and to be fitted with masts and sails, and to
have a half-deck. Mark listened to all this patiently,
though he firmly believed that the honest fellow was
deceiving
himself the whole time. Such a craft could scarcely
be in the ship, and he not hear of it, if he did not actually
see it; though he thought it possible that the captain and
owners may have had some such plan in contemplation,
and conversed together on it, in Betts's presence. As
there were plenty of tools on board, however, by using
stuff of one sort or another, that was to be found in the
ship, Mark had strong hopes of their being able, between
them, to construct, in the course of timethough he
believed
a long time might be necessarya craft of some
sort, that should be of sufficient stability to withstand the
billows of that ordinarily mild sea, and enable them to
return
to their homes and friends. In conversing of things
of this sort, in religious observances, and in speculating
on the probable fate of their shipmates, did our mariners
pass this holy day. Bob was sensibly impressed with the
pause in their ordinary pursuits, and lent himself to the
proper feelings of the occasion with a zeal and simplicity
that gave Mark great satisfaction; for, hitherto, while
aware that his friend was as honest a fellow as ever lived,
in the common acceptation of such a phrase, he had not
supposed him in the least susceptible of religious
impressions
.
But the world had suddenly lost its hold on Betts,
the barrier offered by the vast waters of the Pacific, being
almost as impassable, in his actual circumstances, as that
of the grave; and the human heart turns to God in its
direst distress, as to the only being who can administer
relief. It is when men are prosperous that they vainly
imagine they are sufficient for their own wants, and are
most apt to neglect the hand that alone can give durable
support.
The following morning our mariners resumed their more
worldly duties with renewed powers. While the kettle
was boiling for their tea, they rolled ashore a couple of
empty water-casks, and filled them with fresh water, at one
of the largest natural reservoirs on the reef; it having
rained hard in the night. After breakfast, Mark walked
round to examine his piles of loam, in the crater, while
Bob pulled away in the dingui, to catch a few fish, and to
get a new cargo of the earth; it being the intention of
Mark to join him at the next trip, with the raft, which
required
some little arranging, however, previously to its
being used for such a purpose. The rain of the past night
had thoroughly washed the pile of earth, and, on tasting
it, Mark was convinced that much of the salt it contained
had been carried off. This encouraged him to persevere
in his gardening projects. As yet, the spring had only
Vol. I.  9
just commenced, and he was in hopes of being able to
prepare one bed, at least, in time to obtain useful vegetables
from it.
The Rancocus had a great many planks and boards in
her hold, a part of the ample provision made by her
owners
for the peculiar voyage on which she had been sent.
Of real cargo, indeed, she had very little, the commerce
between the civilized man and the savage being ordinarily
on those great principles of Free Trade, of which so much
is said of late years, while so little is understood, and which
usually give the lion's share of the profit to them who need
it least. With some of these planks, Mark made a staging
for his raft. By the time he was ready, Bob returned with
a load of loam, and, on the next outward voyage, the raft
was taken as well as the dingui. Mark had fitted pins and
grummets, by which the raft was rowed, he and Bob
impelling
it, when light, very easily at the rate of two miles
in the hour.
Mark found Bett's deposit of decayed vegetable matter
even larger and more accessible than he had hoped for.
A hundred loads might be got without even using a
wheelbarrow
;
and to all appearances there was enough of it to
give a heavy dressing to many acres, possibly to the whole
area of the crater. The first thing the young man did was
to choose a suitable place, dig it well up, mixing a
sufficiency
of guano with it, agreeably to Betts's directions,
and then to put in some of his asparagus roots. After this
he scattered a quantity of the seed, raking the ground well
after sowing. By the time this was done, Bob had both
dingui and raft loaded, when they pulled the last back to
the reef, towing the boat. In this manner our two
mariners
continued to work most of the time, for the next
fortnight
,
making, daily, more or less trips to the `loam-rock,'
as they called the place where this precious deposit had
been made; though they neglected none of their other
necessary
duties. As the distance was short, they could
come and go many times in a day, transporting at each
trip about as much of the loam as would make an ordinary
American cart-load of manure. In the whole, by Mark's
computation, they got across about fifty of these cargoes,
in the course of their twelve days' work. The entire day,
however, was on no occasion given up wholly to this
pursuit
.
On the contrary, many little odd tasks were
completed
,
which were set by their necessities, or by
forethought
and prudence. All the empty water-casks, for one
thing, were rolled ashore, and filled at the largest pool;
the frequency of the rains admonishing them of the wisdom
of making a provision for the dry season. The Rancocus
had a good deal of water still left in her, some of it being
excellent Delaware river water, though she had filled up
at Valparaiso, after passing the Horn. Mark counted the
full casks, and allowing ten gallons a day for Bob and
himself
,
a good deal more than could be wanted, there
remained
in the ship fresh water enough to last them two
years. It is true, it was not such water as the palate often
craved of a warm day; but they were accustomed to it, and
it was sweet. By keeping it altogether between decks, the
sun had no power on it, and it was even more palatable
than might have been supposed. Mark occasionally longed
for one good drink at some gushing spring that he
remembered
at home, it is true; and Bob was a little in the habit
of extolling a particular well that, it would seem, his family
were reputed to have used for several generations.
Notwithstanding
these little natural backslidings on this
subject
,
our mariners might be thought well off on the score
of water, having it in great abundance, and with no
reasonable
fear of ever losing it altogether. The casks taken
ashore were filled for their preservation, as well as for
convenience
,
an old sail being spread over them, after they
were rolled together and chocked. As yet, no water was
given to any of the stock, all the animals finding it in
abundance, in the cavities of the lava.
Some of the time, moreover, Betts passed in fishing,
supplying not only Mark and himself, but the pigs and the
poultry, with as much food as was desired. Several of the
fish caught turned out to be delicious, while others were
of a quality that caused them to be thrown into the
compost
heap. A cargo of guano was also imported, the rich
manure being mixed up in liberal quantities with the loam.
At the end of the first week of these voyages to `
loam-rock
,'
Betts went out to fish in a new direction, passing to
windward of the `sea-wall,' as they called the reef that
protected the ship, and pulling towards a bit of naked rock,
a short distance beyond it, where he fancied he might find
a particular sort of little fish, that greatly resembled the
Norfolk Hog-fish, one of the most delicious little creatures
for the pan that is to be found in all the finny tribe. He
had been gone a couple of hours, when Mark, who was at
work within the crater, picking up the encrusted ashes that
formed its surface, heard Bob's shout outside, as if he
wished assistance. Throwing down the pick, our young
man ran out, and was not a little surprised to see the sort
of cargo with which Bob was returning to port. It would
seem that a great collection of sea-weed had formed to
windward of the rock where Bob had gone to fish, at which
spot it ordinarily gathered in a pile until the heap became
too large to lodge any longer, when, owing to the form of
the rock, it invariably broke adrift, and passed to the
southward of the Reef, floating to leeward, to fetch up on
some other rock, or island, in that direction. Bob had
managed to get this raft round a particular point in the
reef, when the wind and current carried it, as near as
might be, directly towards the crater. He was calling to
Mark to come to his assistance, to help get the raft into a
sort of bay, ahead of him, where it might be lodged; else
would there be the danger of its drifting past the Reef,
after all his pains. Our young man saw, at once, what
was wanted, got a line, succeeded in throwing it to Bob,
and by hauling upon it brought the whole mass ashore in
the very spot Betts wished to see it landed.
This sea-weed proved to be a great acquisition on more
accounts than one. There was as much of it in quantity
as would have made two good-sized loads of hay. Then,
many small shell-fish were found among it, which the pigs
and poultry ate with avidity. It also contained seeds, that
the fowls picked up as readily as if it had been corn. The
hogs moreover masticated a good deal of the weed, and
poor Kitty, the only one of the domestic animals on the
Reef that was not now living to its heart's content, nibbled
at it, with a species of half-doubting faith in its salubrity.
Although it was getting to be late in the afternoon, Mark
and Bob got two of Friend Abraham White's pitchforks
(for the worthy Quaker had sent these, among other
implements
of husbandry, as a peace-offering to the Fejee
savages), and went to work with a hearty good-will, landed
all this weed, loaded it up, and wheeled it into the crater,
leaving just enough outside to satisfy the pigs and the
poultry. This task concluded the first week of the labour
already mentioned.
At the termination of the second week, Mark and Betts
held a council on the subject of their future proceedings.
At this consultation it was decided that it would be better
to finish the picking up of a considerable plot of ground,
one of at least half an acre in extent, that was already
commenced, within the crater, scatter their compost over
it, and spade all up together, and plant, mixing in as much
of the sea-weed as they could conveniently spade under.
Nothwithstanding their success in finding the loam, and
this last discovery of a means of getting sea-weed in large
supplies to the Reef, Mark was not very sanguine of
success
in his gardening. The loam appeared to him to be
cold and sour, as well as salt, though a good deal
freshened
by the rain since it was put in the crater; and he
knew nothing of the effects of guano, except through the
somewhat confused accounts of Bob. Then the plain of
the crater offered nothing beside a coarse and shelly ashes.
These ashes were deep enough for any agricultural
purpose
,
it is true, for Mark could work a crowbar down into
them its entire length; but they appeared to him to be
totally wanting in the fertilizing principle. Nor could he
account for the absence of everything like vegetation, on
or about the reef, if the elements of plants of any sort were
to be found in the substances of which it was composed.
He had read, however, that the territory around active
volcanoes, and which was far enough removed from the
vent to escape from the destruction caused by lava, scori
and heat, was usually highly fertile, in consequence of the
ashes and impalpable dust that was scattered in the air;
but seeing no proofs of any such fertility here, he supposed
that the adjacent sea had swallowed up whatever there
might have been of these bountiful gifts. With these
impressions
,
it is not surprising that Mark was disposed to
satisfy himself with a moderate beginning, in preference
9 *
to throwing away time and labour in endeavouring to
produce
resources which after all would fail them.
Mark's plan, as laid before his companion, on the
occasion
of the council mentioned, was briefly this:He
proposed
to pass the next month in preparing the half-acre
they had commenced upon, and in getting in seed; after
which they could do no more than trust their husbandry
to Providence and the seasons. As soon as done with the
tillage, it was his idea that they ought to overhaul the ship
thoroughly, ascertain what was actually in her, and, if the
materials of the boat mentioned by Betts were really to be
found, to set that craft up as soon as possible, and to get
it into the water. Should they not find the frame and
planks of the pinnace, as Betts seemed to think they would,
they must go to work and get out the best frame they
could themselves, and construct such a craft as their own
skill could contrive. After building such a boat, it was
Mark's opinion that he and Bob could navigate her across
that tranquil ocean, until they reached the coast of South
America, or some of the islands that were known to be
friendly to the white man; for, fifty years ago, it will be
remembered, we did not possess the same knowledge of
the Pacific that we possess to-day, and mariners did not
trust themselves always with confidence among the natives
of its islands. With this plan pretty well sketched out,
then, our mariners saw the first month of their captivity
among the unknown reefs of this remote quarter of the
world, draw to its close.
Mark was a little surprised by a proposal that he
received
from Bob, next morning, which was the Sabbath, of
course. Friends have monthly meetings, Betts observed,
and he thought they ought to set up some such day on
the Reef. He was willing to keep Christmas, if Mark
saw fit, but rather wished to pay proper respect to all the
festivals and observances of Friends. Mark was secretly
amused with this proposition, even while it pleased him.
The monthly meeting of the Quakers was for the secular
part of church business, as much as for the purposes of
religious worship; and Bob having all those concerns in
his own hands, it was not so easy to see how a stated day
was to aid him any in carrying out his church government.
But Mark understood the feeling which dictated this
request
,
and was disposed to deal gently by it. Betts was
becoming daily more and more conscious of his
dependence
on a Divine Providence, in the situation in which he
was thrown; and his mind, as well as his feelings,
naturally
enough reverted to early impressions and habits, in
their search for present relief. Bob had not the clearest
notions of either the theory or practice of his sect, but he
remembered much of the last, and believed he should be
acting right by conforming as closely as possible to the
`usages of Friends.' Mark promised to take the matter
into consideration, and to come to some decision on it, at
an early day.
The following Monday it rained nearly the whole
morning
,
confining our mariners to the ship. They took that
occasion to overhaul the `'twixt-deck' more thoroughly
than had yet been done, and particularly to give the
seed-boxes
a close examination. Much of the lumber, and most
of the tools too, were stowed on this deck, and something
like a survey was also made of them. The frame and
other materials of the pinnace were looked for, in addition,
but without any success. If in the ship at all, they were
certainly not betwixt decks. Mark was still of opinion no
such articles would ever be found; but Betts insisted on
the conversation he had overheard, and on his having
rightly understood it. The provision of tools was very
ample, and, in some respects, a little exaggerated in the
way of Friend White's expectations of civilizing the people
of Fejee. It may be well, here, to say a word concerning
the reason that the Rancocus contained so many of these
tributes to civilization. The voyage of the ship, it will
be remembered, was in quest of sandal-wood. This
sandal-wood
was to be carried to Canton and sold, and a cargo
of teas taken in with the avails. Now, sandal-wood was
supposed to be used for the purposes of idolatry, being said
to be burned before the gods of that heathenish people.
Idolatry being one of the chiefest of all sins, Friend
Abraham
White had many compunctions and misgivings of
conscience touching the propriety of embarking in the
trade at all. It was true, that our knowledge of the
Chinese
customs did not extend far enough to render it
certain
that the wood was used for the purpose of burning
before idols, some pretending it was made into ornamental
furniture; but Friend Abraham White had heard the first,
and was disposed to provide a set-off, in the event of the
report's being true, by endeavouring to do something
towards
the civilization of the heathen. Had he been a
Presbyterian merchant, of a religious turn, it is probable
a quantity of tracts would have been made to answer the
purpose; but, belonging to a sect whose practice was
generally as perfect as its theory is imperfect, Friend
Abraham White's conscience was not to be satisfied with
any such shallow contrivance. It is true that he expected
to make many thousands of dollars by the voyage, and
doubtless would so have done, had not the accident
befallen
the ship, or had poor Captain Crutchely drank less
in honour of his wedding-day; but the investment in tools,
seeds, pigs, wheelbarrows, and other matters, honestly
intended
to better the condition of the natives of Vanua
Levu and Viti Levu, did not amount to a single cent less
than one thousand dollars, lawful money of the republic.
In looking over the packages, Mark found white clover
seed, and Timothy seed, among other things, in sufficient
quantity to cover most of the mount of the crater. The
weather temporarily clearing off, he called to Bob, and
they went ashore together, Mark carrying some of the
grass seed in a pail, while Betts followed with a vessel to
hold guano. Providing a quantity of the last from a barrel
that had been previously filled with it, and covered to protect
it from the rain, they clambered up the side of the crater.
This was the first time either had ascended since the day
they finished planting there, and Mark approached his hills
with a good deal of freshly-revived interest in their fate.
From
them
he expected very little, having had no loam to
mix with the ashes; but, by dwelling so much of late on
the subject of tillage, he was not without faint hopes of
meeting with some little reward for the pains he had taken.
The reader will judge of the rapture then, as well as of the
surprise, with which he first saw a hill of melons, already
in the fourth leaf. Here, then, was the great problem
successfully solved. Vegetation had actually commenced
on that hitherto barren mount, and the spot which had lain
how long, Mark knew not, but probably for a thousand
years, if not for thousands of years, in its nakednesswas
about to be covered with verdure, and blest with
fruitfulness
.
The inert principles which, brought to act together,
had produced this sudden change from barrenness to
fertility
,
had probably been near neighbours to each other all
that time, but had failed of bringing forth their fruits, for
the want of absolute contact. So Mark reasoned, for he
nothing doubted that it was Betts's guano that had
stimulated
the otherwise barren deposit of the volcano, and
caused his seed to germinate. The tillage may have aided,
as well as the admission of air, light and water; but
something
more than this, our young gardener fancied, was
wanting to success. That something the manure of birds,
meliorated and altered by time, had supplied, and lo! the
glorious results were before his eyes.
It would not be easy to pourtray to the reader all
the-delight
which these specks of incipient verdure conveyed
to the mind of Mark Woolston. It far exceeded the joy
that would be apt to be awakened by a relief from an
apprehension
of wanting food at a distant day, for it
resembled
something of the character of a new creation. He
went from hill to hill, and everywhere did he discover
plants, some just peeping through the ashes, others already
in leaf, and all seemingly growing and thriving.
Fortunately
,
Kitty had not been on the mount for the last
fortnight
,
her acquired habits, and the total nakedness of the
hills, having kept her below with the other animals, since
her first visits. Mark saw the necessity of keeping her
off the elevation, which she would certainly climb the
instant
anything like verdure caught her eyes from below.
He determined, therefore, to confine her to the ship, until
he had taken the precautions necessary to prevent her
ascending
the mount. This last was easily enough done.
On the exterior of the hills there were but three places
where even a goat could get up. This was owing to the
circumstance that the base of the ascent rose like a wall,
for some ten or twelve feet, everywhere but at the three
points mentioned. It appeared to Mark as if the sea had
formerly washed around the crater, giving this form to its
bottom, for so wall-like was the rock for these ten or twelve
feet, that it would have defied the efforts of a man for a
long time, to overcome the difficulties of the ascent. At
two of the places where the
dbris
had made a rough
footing
,
half an hour's work would remove the material, and
leave these spots as impassable as the others. At the third
point, it might require a good deal of labour to effect the
object. At this last place, Mark told Betts it would be
necessary, for the moment, to make some sort of a fence.
Within the crater, it was equally difficult to ascend, except
at one or two places; but these ascents our mariners
thought of improving, by making steps, as the animals
were effectually excluded from the plain within by means
of the sail which served for a curtain at the gateway, or
hole of entrance.
As soon as Mark had recovered a little from his first
surprise, he sent Bob below to bring up some buckets filled
with the earth brought from Loam Rock, or island. This
soil was laid carefully around each of the plants, the two
working alternately at the task, until a bucket-full had
been laid in each hill. Mark did not know it at the time,
but subsequent experience gave him reason to suspect, that
this forethought saved most of his favourites from
premature
deaths. Seed might germinate, and the plants shoot
luxuriantly from out of the ashes of the volcano, under the
united influence of the sun and rains, in that low latitude;
but it was questionable whether the nourishment to be
derived
from such a soil, if soil it could yet be called, would
prove to be sufficient to sustain the plants, when they got
to be of an age and size to demand all the support they
wanted. So convinced did Mark become, as the season
advanced, of the prudence of what he then did out of a
mere impulse, that he passed hours, subsequently, in raising
loam to the summit of the mount, in order to place it in
the different hills. For this purpose, Bob rigged a little
derrick, and fitted a whip, so that the buckets were whipped
up, sailor-fashion, after two or three experiments made in
lugging them up by hand had suggested to the honest
fellow
that there might be a cheaper mode of attaining their
wishes.
When Mark was temporarily satisfied with gazing at his
new-found treasures, he went to work to scatter the
grass-seed
over the summit and sides of the crater. Inside, there
was not much motive for sowing anything, the rock being
so nearly perpendicular; but on the outside of the hill, or
`mountain,' as Bob invariably called it, the first ten or
twelve feet excepted, there could be no obstacle to the
seeds taking; though from the want of soil much of it, Mark
knew, must be lost; but, if it only took in spots, and gave
him a few green patches for the eye to rest on, he felt he
should be amply rewarded for his trouble. Bob scattered
guano wherever he scattered grass-seed, and in this way
they walked entirely round the crater, Mark using up at
least half of Friend Abraham White's provision in behalf
of the savages of Fejee, in the way of the grasses. A
genial, soft rain soon came to moisten this seed, and to
embed
it with whatever there was of soil on the surface,
giving
it every chance to take root that circumstances would
allow.
This preliminary step taken towards covering the face
of the mount with verdure, our mariners went to work to
lay out their garden, regularly, within the crater. Mark
manifested a good deal of ingenuity in this matter. With
occasional exceptions the surface of the plain, or the
bottom
of the crater, was an even crust of no great
thickness
,
composed of concrete ashes, scori, &c., but which
might have borne the weight of a loaded wagon. This
crust once broken, which it was not very difficult to do by
means of picks and crows, the materials beneath were found
loose enough for the purposes of agriculture, almost without
using the spade. Now, space being abundant, Mark drew
lines, in fanciful and winding paths, leaving the crust for
his walks, and only breaking into the loose materials
beneath
,
wherever he wished to form a bed. This variety
served to amuse him and Betts, and they worked with so
much the greater zeal, as their labours produced objects
that were agreeable to the eye, and which amused them
now, while they promised to benefit them hereafter. As
each bed, whether oval, winding or straight, was dug, the
loam and sea-weed was mixed up in it, in great abundance,
after which it was sown, or planted.
Mark was fully aware that many of Friend Abraham
White's seeds, if they grew and brought their fruits to
maturity, would necessarily change their properties in that
climate; some for the worse, and others for the better.
From the Irish potato, the cabbage, and most of the more
northern vegetables, he did not expect much, under any
circumstances; but, he thought he would try all, and
having several regularly assorted boxes of garden-seeds,
just as they had been purchased out of the shops of
Philadelphia
,
his garden scarce wanted any plant that was then
known to the kitchens of America.
Our mariners were quite a fortnight preparing,
manuring
,
and sowing their
parterre
, which, when complete,
occupied
fully half an acre in the very centre of the crater,
Mark intending it for the nucleus of future similar works,
that might convert the whole hundred acres into a
garden
.
By the time the work was done, the rains were
less frequent, though it still came in showers, and those
that were still more favourable to vegetation. In that
fortnight
the plants on the mount had made great advances,
showing the exuberance and growth of a tropical climate.
It sometimes, nay, it often happens, that when the sun is
the most genial for vegetation, moisture is wanting to aid
its power, and, in some respects, to counteract its
influence
.
These long and periodical droughts, however, are
not so much owing to heat as to other and local causes.
Mark now began to hope, as the spring advanced, that his
little territory was to be exempt, in a great measure, from
the curse of droughts, the trades, and some other causes
that to him were unknown, bringing clouds so often that
not only shed their rain upon his garden, but which served
in a great measure to mitigate a heat that, without shade
of some sort or other, would be really intolerable.
With a view to the approaching summer, our mariners
turned their attention to the constructing of a tent within
the crater. They got some old sails and some spars ashore,
and soon had a spacious, as well as a comfortable
habitation
of this sort erected. Not only did they spread a
spacious
tent for themselves, within the crater, but they erected
another, or a sort of canopy rather, on its outside, for the
use of the animals, which took refuge beneath it, during
the heats of the day, with an avidity that proved how
welcome
it was. This outside shed, or canopy, required a
good deal of care in its construction, to resist the wind;
while that inside scarce ever felt the breeze. This want
of wind, or of air in motion, indeed, formed the most
serious
objection to the crater, as a place of residence, in the
hot months; and the want of breeze that was suffered in
the tent, set Mark to work to devise expedients for
building
some sort of tent, or habitation, on the mount itself,
where it would be always cool, provided one could get a
protection from the fierce rays of the sun.
After a good deal of search, Mark selected a spot on the
`Summit,' as he began to term the place, and pitched his
tent on it. Holes were made in the soft rocks, and pieces
of spars were inserted, to answer for posts. With a
commencement
as solid as this, it was not difficult to make the
walls of the tent (or marquee would be the better word,
since both habitations had nearly upright sides) by means
of an old fore-course. In order to get the canvas up there,
however, it was found necessary to cut out the pieces
below
,
when, by means of the purchase at the derrick, it was
all hoisted to the Summit.
These several arrangements occupied Mark and Bob
another fortnight, completing the first quarter of a year
they had passed on the Reef. By this time they had got
accustomed to their situation, and had fallen into regular
courses of duty, though the increasing heats admonished
both of the prudence of not exposing themselves too much
beneath the fiery sun at noon-day.
Vol. I.  10
CHAPTER VIII.
Now, from the full-grown day a beamy shower
Gleams on the lake, and gilds each glossy flower,
Gay insects sparkle in the genial blaze,
Various as light, and countless as its rays
Now, from yon range of rocks, strong rays rebound,
Doubling the day on flow'ry plains around.
Savage
.
After
the tent on the Summit was erected, Mark passed
much of his leisure time there. Thither he conveyed
many of his books, of which he had a very respectable
collection
,
his flute, and a portion of his writing materials.
There he could sit and watch the growth of the different
vegetables he was cultivating. As for Bob, he fished a
good deal, both in the way of supplies and for his
amusement
.
The pigs and poultry fared well, and everything
seemed to thrive but poor Kitty. She loved to follow Mark,
and cast many a longing look up at the Summit, whenever
she saw him strolling about among his plants.
The vegetables on the Summit, or those first put into
the ground, flourished surprisingly. Loam had been added
repeatedly, and they wanted for nothing that could bring
forward vegetation. The melons soon began to run, as
did the cucumbers, squashes, and pumpkins; and by the
end of the next month, there were a dozen large patches
on the mount that were covered by a dense verdure. Nor
was this all; Mark making a discovery about this time,
that afforded him almost as much happiness as when he
first saw his melons in leaf. He was seated one day, with
the walls of his tent brailed up, in order to allow the wind
to blow through, when something dark on the rock caught
his eye. This spot was some little distance from him, and
going to it, he found that large quantities of his grass-seed
had actually taken! Now he might hope to convert that
barren-looking, and often glaring rock, into a beautiful
grassy hill, and render that which was sometimes painful
to the eyes, a pleasure to look upon. The young man
understood the laws of vegetation well enough to be
certain
that could the roots of grasses once insinuate
themselves
into the almost invisible crevices of the crust that
covered the place, they would of themselves let in light,
air and water enough for their own wants, and thus
increase
the very fertility on which they subsisted. He did
not fail, however, to aid nature, by scattering a fresh
supply
of guano all over the hill.
While Mark was thus employed at home, Bob rowed out
to the reef, bringing in his fish in such quantities that it
occurred to Mark to convert them also into manure. A
fresh half-acre was accordingly broken up, within the
crater
,
the cool of the mornings and of the evenings being
taken for the toil; and, as soon as a bed was picked over,
quantities of fish were buried in it, and left there to decay.
Nor did Betts neglect the sea-weed the while. On several
occasions he floated large bodies of it in, from the outer
reefs, which were all safely landed and wheeled into the
crater, where a long pile of it was formed, mingled with
loam from Loam Island, and guano. This work, however,
gradually ceased, as the season advanced, and summer
came in earnest. That season, however, did not prove by
any means as formidable as Mark had anticipated, the
sea-breezes
keeping the place cool and refreshed. Our
mariners
now missed the rain, which was by no means as
frequent
as it had been, though it fell in larger quantities
when it did come. The stock had to be watered for several
weeks, the power of the sun causing all the water that
lodged in the cavities of the rocks to evaporate almost
immediately
.
During the time it was too warm to venture out in the
dingui, except for half an hour of a morning, or for as long
a period of an evening, Mark turned his attention to the
ship again. Seizing suitable moments, each sail was
loosened, thoroughly dried, unbent, and got below. An
awning was got out, and spread, and the decks were wet
down, morning and evening, both for the purposes of
cleanliness, and to keep them from cheeking. The hold
was now entered, and overhauled, for the first time since
the accident. A great many useful things were found in
it, and among other articles two barrels of good sharp
vinegar, which Friend Abraham White had caused to be
put on board to be used with anything that could be
pickled
,
as an anti-scorbutic. The onions and cucumbers
both promising so well, Mark rejoiced at this discovery,
determining at once to use some of the vinegar on a part
of his expected crop of those two vegetables.
One day as Bob was rummaging about in the hold, and
Mark was looking on, that being the coolest place on the
whole reef, the former got hold of a piece of wood, and
began to tug at it to draw it out from among a pile that lay
in a dark corner. After several efforts, the stick came,
when Mark, struck with a glimpse he got of its form, bade
Bob bring it under the light of the hatchway. The instant
he got a good look at it, Woolston knew that Bob's `
foolish
,
crooked stick, which was fit to stow nowhere,' as the
honest fellow had described it when it gave him so much
trouble, was neither more nor less than one of the ribs of
a boat of larger size than common.
This is providential, truly! exclaimed Mark. Your
crooked stick, Bob, is a part of the frame of the pinnace
of which you spoke, and which we had given up, as a thing
not to be found on board!
You 're right, Mr. Mark, you 're right! answered Bob
and I must have been oncommon stupid not to have
thought of it, when it came so hard. And if there 's one
of the boat's bones stowed in that place, there must be
more to be found in the same latitude.
This was true enough. After working in that dark
corner of the hold for several hours, all the materials of
the intended craft were found and collected in the steerage.
Neither Mark nor Betts was a boat-builder, or a
shipwright
;
but each had a certain amount of knowledge on
the subject, and each well knew where every piece was
intended to be put. What a revolution this discovery
made in the feelings of our young husband! He had never
totally despaired of seeing Bridget again, for that would
scarce have comported with his youth and sanguine
temperament
;
but the hope had, of late, become so very dim,
as to survive only as that feeling will endure in the bosoms
of the youthful and inexperienced. Mark had lived a long
time for his years; had seen more and performed far more
than usually falls to persons of his age, and he was, by
character, prudent and practical; but it would have been
impossible for one who had lived as long and as well as
himself, to give up every expectation of being restored to
his bride, even in circumstances more discouraging than
those in which he was actually placed. Still, he had been
slowly accustoming himself to the idea of a protracted
separation, and had never lost sight of the expediency of
making his preparations for passing his entire life in the
solitary place where he and Betts had been cast by a
mysterious
and unexpected dispensation of a Divine
Providence
.
When Bob, from time to time, insisted on his
account of the materials for the pinnace being in the ship,
Mark had listened incredulously, unconscious himself how
much his mind had been occupied by Bridget when this
part of the cargo had been taken in, and unwilling to
believe
such an acquisition could have been made without
his knowledge. Now that he saw it, however, a
tumultuous
rushing of all the blood in his body towards his heart,
almost overpowered him, and the future entirely changed
its aspects. He did not doubt an instant, of the ability of
Bob and himself to put these blessed materials together, or
of their success in navigating the mild sea around them,
for any necessary distance, in a craft of the size this must
turn out to be. A bright vista, with Bridget's brighter
countenance at its termination, glowed before his
imagination
,
and a great deal of wholesome philosophy and
Christian
submission were unsettled, as it might be, in the
twinkling of an eye, by this all-important discovery. Mark
had never abandoned the thought of constructing a little
vessel with materials torn from the ship; but that would
have been a most laborious, as well as a doubtful experiment,
while here was the problem solved, with a certainty and
precision almost equal to one in mathematics!
The agitation and revulsion of feeling produced in Mark
by the discovery of the materials of the pinnace, were so
great as to prevent him from maturing any plan for several
days. During that time he could perceive in himself an
alteration that amounted almost to an entire change of
character. The vines on the Summit were now in full
10 *
leaf, and they covered broad patches of the rock with their
luxuriant vegetation, while the grass could actually be seen
from the ship, converting the drab-coloured concretions
of the mount into slopes and acclivities of verdure. But,
all this delighted him no longer. Home and Bridget met
him even in the fanciful and now thriving beds within the
crater, where everything appeared to push forward with a
luxuriance and promise of return, far exceeding what had
once been his fondest expectations. He could see nothing,
anticipate nothing, talk of nothing, think of nothing, but
these new-found means of quitting the Reef, and of
returning
to the abodes of men, and to the arms of his young
wife.
Betts took things more philosophically. He had made
up his mind to `Robinson Crusoe it' a few years, and,
though he had often expressed a wish that the dingui was
of twice its actual size, he would have been quite as well
content with this new boat could it be cut down to
one-fourth
of its real dimensions. He submitted to Mark's
superior information, however; and when the latter told
him that he could wait no longer for the return of cooler
weather, or for the heat of the sun to become less intense
before he began to set up the frame of his craft, as had
been the first intention, Bob acquiesced in the change of
plan, without remonstrance, bent on taking things as they
came, in humility and cheerfulness.
Nevertheless, it was far easier bravely to determine in
this matter, than to execute. The heat was now so intense,
for the greater part of the day, that it would have far
exceeded
the power of our two mariners to support it, on a
naked rock, and without shade of any sort. The frame
of the pinnace must be set up somewhere near the water,
regular ways being necessary to launch her; and nowhere,
on the shore, was the smallest shade to be found, without
recourse to artificial means of procuring it. As Mark's
impatience would no longer brook delay, this artificial
shade, therefore, was the first thing to be attended to.
The leeward end of the reef was chosen for the new
ship-yard. Although this choice imposed a good deal of
additional labour on the two workmen, by compelling them
to transport all the materials rather more than a mile,
reflection
and examination induced Mark to select the spot he
did. The formation of the rock was more favourable there,
he fancied, than in any other place he could find; offering
greater facilities for launching. This was one motive;
but the principal inducement was connected with an
apprehension
of floods. By the wall-like appearance of the
exterior base of the mount, by the smoothness of the
surface
of the Reef in general, which, while it had many
inequalities
,
wore the appearance of being semi-polished by
the washing of water over it; and by the certain signs that
were to be found on most of the lower half of the plain of
the crater itself, Mark thought it apparent that the entire
reef, the crater excepted, had been often covered with the
water of the ocean, and that at no very distant day. The
winter months were usually the tempestuous months in
that latitude, though hurricanes might at any time occur.
Now, the winter was yet an untried experiment with our
two `reefers,' as Bob sometimes laughingly called himself
and Mark, and hurricanes were things that often raised
the seas in their neighbourhood several feet in an hour or
two. Should the water be actually driven upon the Reef,
so as to admit of a current to wash across it, or the waves
to roll along its surface, the pinnace would be in the
greatest
danger of being carried off before it could be even
launched. All these things Mark bore in mind, and he
chose the spot he did, with an eye to these floods,
altogether
.
It might be six or eight months before they could
be ready to get the pinnace into the water, and it now
wanted but six to the stormy season. At the western, or
leeward, extremity of the island, the little craft would be
under the lee of the crater, which would form a sort of
breakwater, and might be the means of preventing it from
being washed away. Then the rock, just at that spot, was
three or four feet higher than at any other point,
sufficiently
near the sea to admit of launching with ease; and the
two advantages united, induced our young `reefer' to incur
the labour of transporting the materials the distance named,
in preference to foregoing them. The raft, however, was
put in requisition, and the entire frame, with a few of the
planks necessary for a commencement, was carried round
at one load.
Previously to laying the keel of the pinnace, Mark named
it the Neshamony, after a creek that was nearly opposite
to the Rancocus, another inlet of the Delaware, that had
given its name to the ship from the circumstance that
Friend Abraham White had been born on its low banks.
The means of averting the pains and penalties of working
in the sun, were also attended to, as indeed the great
preliminary
measure in this new enterprise. To this end, the
raft was again put in requisition; an old main-course was
got out of the sail-room, and lowered upon the raft; spare
spars were cut to the necessary length, and thrown into
the water, to be towed down in company; ropes, &c., were
provided, and Bob sailed anew on this voyage. It was a
work of a good deal of labour to get the raft to windward,
towing having been resorted to as the easiest process, but
a trip to leeward was soon made. In twenty minutes after
this cargo had left the ship, it reached its point of
destination
.
The only time when our men could work at even their
awning, were two hours early in the morning, and as many
after the sun had got very low, or had absolutely set. Eight
holes had to be drilled into the lava, to a depth of two feet
each. Gunpowder, in very small quantities, was used, or
these holes could not have been made in a twelvemonth.
But by drilling with a crowbar a foot or two into the rock,
and charging the cavity with a very small portion of
powder
,
the lava was cracked, when the stones rather easily
were raised by means of the picks and crows. Some idea
may be formed of the amount of labour that was expended
on this, the first step in the new task, by the circumstance
that a month was passed in setting those eight awning-posts
alone. When up, however, they perfectly answered the
purpose, everything having been done in a thorough,
seaman-like
manner. At the top of each post, itself a portion
of solid spar, a watch-tackle was lashed, by means of which
the sail was bowsed up to its place. To prevent the
bagging
unavoidable in an awning of that size, several
uprights
were set in the centre, on end, answering their
purpose
sufficiently without boring into the rocks.
Bob was in raptures with the new `ship-yard.' It was
as large as the mainsail of a ship of four hundred tons,
was complete as to shade, with the advantage of letting the
breeze circulate, and had a reasonable chance of escaping
from the calamities of a flood. Mark, too, was satisfied
with the result, and the very next day after this task was
completed, our shipwrights set to work to lay their keel.
That day was memorable on another account. Bob had
gone to the Summit in quest of a tool left there, in fitting
up the boat of Mark, and while on the mount, he
ascertained
the important fact that the melons were beginning
to ripen. He brought down three or four of these
delicious
fruits, and Mark had the gratification of tasting some
of the bounties of Providence, which had been bestowed,
as a reward of his own industry and forethought. It was
necessary to eat of these melons in moderation, however;
but it was a great relief to get them at all, after subsisting
for so long a time on salted meats, principally, with no
other vegetables but such as were dry, and had been long
in the ship. It was not the melons alone, however, that
were getting to be ripe; for, on examining himself, among
the vines which now covered fully an acre of the Summit,
Mark found squashes, cucumbers, onions, sweet-potatoes,
tomatoes, string-beans, and two or three other vegetables,
all equally fit to be used. From that time, some of these
plants were put into the pot daily, and certain slight
apprehensions
which Woolston had begun again to entertain
on the subject of scurvy, were soon dissipated. As for the
garden within the crater, which was much the most
extensive
and artistical, it was somewhat behind that on the
Summit, having been later tilled; but everything, there,
looked equally promising, and Mark saw that one acre,
well worked, would produce more than he and Betts could
consume in a twelvemonth.
It was an important day on the Reef when the keel of
the pinnace was laid. On examining his materials, Mark
ascertained that the boat-builders had marked and
numbered
each portion of the frame, each plank, and
everything
else that belonged to the pinnace. Holes were
bored, and everything had been done in the boat-yard that
could be useful to those who, it was expected, were to put
the work together in a distant part of the world. This
greatly facilitated our new boat-builders' labours in the
way of skill, besides having done so much of the actual
toil to their hands. As soon as the keel was laid, Mark
set up the frame, which came together with very little
trouble. The wailes were then got out, and were fitted,
each piece being bolted in its allotted place. As the work
had already been put together, there was little or no
dubbing
necessary. Aware that the parts had once been
accurately
fitted to each other, Mark was careful not to
disturb
their arrangement by an unnecessary use of the adze,
or broad-axe, experimenting and altering the positions of
the timbers and planks; but, whenever he met with any
obstacle, in preference to cutting and changing the
materials
themselves, he persevered until the parts came
together
as had been contemplated. By observing this
caution
,
the whole frame was set up, the wailes were fitted and
bolted, and the garboard-streak got on and secured, without
taking off a particle of the wood, though a week was
necessary
to effect these desired objects.
Our mariners now measured their new frame. The
keel was just four-and-twenty feet long, the distance
between
the knight-heads and the taffrail being six feet
greater; the beam, from outside to outside, was nine feet,
and the hold might be computed at five feet in depth.
This gave something like a measurement of eleven tons;
the pinnace having been intended for a craft a trifle smaller
than this. As a vessel of eleven tons might make very
good weather in a sea-way, if properly handled, the result
gave great satisfaction, Mark cheering Bob with accounts
of crafts, of much smaller dimensions, that had navigated
the more stormy seas, with entire safety, on various
occasions
.
The planking of the Neshamony was no great matter,
being completed the week it was commenced. The
caulking
,
however, gave more trouble, though Bob had done a
good deal of that sort of work in his day. It took a
fortnight
for the honest fellow to do the caulking to his own
mind, and before it was finished another great discovery
was made by rummaging in the ship's hold, in quest of
some of the fastenings which had not at first been found.
A quantity of old sheet-copper, that had run its time on a
vessel's bottom, was brought to light, marked copper for
the pinnace. Friend Abraham White had bethought him
of the worms of the low latitudes, and had sent out enough
of the refuse copper of a vessel that had been broken up
to cover the bottom of this little craft fairly up to her bends
To work, then, Mark and Bob went to put on the
sheathing-paper
and copper that had thus bountifully been
provided
for them, as soon as the seams were well payed.
This done, and it was no great job, the paint-brush was
set to work, and the hull was completed! In all, Mark
and Betts were eight weeks, hard at work, putting their
pinnace together. When she was painted, the summer
was more than half gone. The laying of the deck had
given more trouble than any other portion of the work on
the boat, and this because it was not a plain, full deck, or
one that covered the whole of the vessel, but left small
stern-sheets aft, which was absolutely necessary to the
comfort and safety of those she was to carry. The whole
was got together, however, leaving Mark and Bob to
rejoice
in their success thus far, and to puzzle their heads
about the means of getting their craft into the water, now
she was built. In a word, it was far easier to put together
a vessel of ten tons, that had been thus ready fitted to their
hands, than it was to launch her.
As each of our mariners had necessarily seen many
vessels
in their cradles, each had some idea of what it was
now necessary to do. Mark had laid the keel as near the
water as he could get it, and by this precaution had saved
himself a good deal of labour. It was very easy to find
materials for the ways, many heavy planks still remaining;
but the difficulty was to lay them so that they would not
spread. Here the awning-posts were found of good
service
,
plank being set on their edges against them, which,
in their turn, were made to sustain the props of the ways.
In order to save materials in the cradle, the ways
themselves
were laid on blocks, and they were secured as well
as the skill of our self-formed shipwrights could do it.
They had some trouble in making the cradle, and had
once to undo all they had done, in consequence of a
mistake
.
At length Mark was of opinion they had taken all
the necessary precautions, and told Betts that he thought
they might venture to attempt launching the next day.
But Bob made a suggestion which changed this plan, and
caused a delay that was attended with very serious
consequences
.
The weather had become cloudy, and a little menacing,
for the last few days, and Bob proposed that they should
lower the awning, get up shears on the rock, and step the
mast of the pinnace before they launched her, as a means
of saving some labour. The spar was not very heavy, it
was true, and it might be stepped by crossing a couple of
the oars in the boat itself; but a couple of light spars
top-gallant studding-sail booms for instancewould enable
them to do it much more readily, before the craft was put
into the water, than it could be done afterwards. Mark
listened to the suggestion, and acquiesced. The awning
was consequently lowered, and got out of the way. To
prevent the hogs from tearing the sail, it was placed on
two of the wheelbarrows and wheeled up into the crater,
whither those animals had never yet found their way.
Then the shears were got up, and the mast was stepped
and rigged; the boat's sails were found and bent. Mark
now thought enough had been done, and that, the next
day, they might undertake the launch. But another
suggestion
of Bob's delayed the proceedings.
The weather still continued clouded and menacing.
Betts was of opinion, therefore, that it might be well to
stow the provisions and water they intended to use in the
pinnace, while she was on the stocks, as they could work
round her so much the more easily then than afterwards.
Accordingly, the breakers were got out, on board the ship,
and filled with fresh water. They were then struck into
the raft. A barrel of beef, and one of pork followed, with
a quantity of bread. At two trips the raft carried all the
provisions and stores that were wanted, and the cargoes
were landed, rolled up to the side of the pinnace, hoisted
on board of her, by means of the throat-halliard, and
properly
stowed. Two grapnels, or rather one grapnel, and
a small kedge, were found among the pinnace's materials,
everything belonging to her having been stowed in the
same part of the ship. These, too, were carried round to
the ship-yard, got on board, and their hawsers bent. In a
word, every preparation was made that might be necessary
to make sail on the pinnace, and to proceed to sea in her,
at once.
It was rather late in the afternoon of the third clouded
day, that Betts himself admitted no more could be done to
the Neshamony, previously to putting her into the water.
When our two mariners ceased the business of the day,
therefore, it was with the understanding that they would
turn out early in the morning, wedge up, and launch. An
hour of daylight remaining, Mark went up to the Summit
to select a few melons, and to take a look at the state of
the plantations and gardens. Before ascending the hill,
the young man walked through his garden in the crater,
where everything was flourishing and doing well. Many
of the vegetables were by this time fit to eat, and there
was every prospect of there being a sufficient quantity
raised to meet the wants of two or three persons for a long
period ahead. The sight of these fruits of his toil, and
the luxuriance of the different plants, caused a momentary
feeling of regret in Mark at the thought of being about to
quit the place for ever. He even fancied he should have
a certain pleasure in returning to the Reef; and once a
faint outline of a plan came over his mind, in which he
fancied that he might bring Bridget to this place, and pass
the rest of his life with her, in the midst of its peace and
tranquillity. This was but a passing thought, however,
and was soon forgotten in the pictures that crowded on
his mind, in connection with the great anticipated event of
the next day.
While strolling about the little walks of his garden, the
appearance of verdure along the edge of the crater, or
immediately
beneath the cliff, caught Mark's eye. Going hastily
to the spot, he found that there was a long row of plants of
a new sort, not only appearing above the ground, but already
in leaf, and rising several inches in height. These were
the results of the seeds of the oranges, lemons, limes,
shaddocks
,
figs, and other fruits of the tropics, that he had
planted there as an experiment, and forgotten. While his
mind was occupied with other things, these seeds had sent
forth their shoots, and the several trees were growing with
the rapidity and luxuriance that distinguish vegetation
within the tropics. As Mark's imagination pictured what
Vol. I.  11
might be the effects of cultivation and care on that singular
spot, a sigh of regret mingled with his hopes for the future,
as he recollected he was so soon to abandon the place for
ever; while on the Summit, too, this feeling of regret was
increased, rather than diminished. So much of the
grass-seed
had taken, and the roots had already so far extended,
that acres were beginning to look verdant and smiling.
Two or three months had brought everything forward
prodigiously
,
and the frequency of the rains in showers, added
to the genial warmth of the sun, gave to vegetation a
quickness
and force that surprised, as much as it delighted our
young man.
That night Mark and Betts both slept in the ship. They
had a fancy it might be the last in which they could ever
have any chance of doing so, and attachment to the vessel
induced both to return to their old berths; for latterly they
had slept in hammocks, swung beneath the ship-yard
awning
,
in order to be near their work. Mark was awoke at
a very early hour, by the howling of a gale among the
rigging
and spars of the Rancocus, sounds that he had not
heard for many a day, and which, at first, were actually
pleasant to his ears. Throwing on his clothes, and going
out on the quarter-deck, he found that a tempest was upon
them. The storm far exceeded anything that he had ever
before witnessed in the Pacific. The ocean was violently
agitated, and the rollers came in over the reef, to
windward
,
with a force and majesty that seemed to disregard
the presence of the rocks. It was just light, and Mark
called Bob, in alarm. The aspect of things was really
serious, and, at first, our mariners had great apprehensions
for the safety of the ship. It was true, the sea-wall resisted
every shock of the rollers that reached it, but even the
billows after they were broken by this obstacle, came down
upon the vessel with a violence that brought a powerful
strain on every rope-yarn in the sheet-cable. Fortunately,
the ground-tackle, on which the safety of the vessel
depended
,
was of the very best quality, and the anchor was
known to have an excellent hold. Then, the preservation
of the ship was no longer a motive of the first
consideration
with them; that of the pinnace being the thing now
most to be regarded. It might grieve them both to see
the Rancocus thrown upon the rocks, and broken up; but
of far greater account was it to their future prospects that
the Neshamony should not be injured. Nor were the signs
of the danger that menaced the boat to be disregarded.
The water of the ocean appeared to be piling in among
these reefs, the rocks of which resisted its passage to
leeward
,
and already was washing up on the surface of the
Reef, in places, threatening them with a general
inundation
.
It was necessary to look after the security of various
articles that were scattered about on the outer plain, and
our mariners went ashore to do so.
Although intending so soon to abandon the Reef
altogether
,
a sense of caution induced Mark to take
everything
he could within the crater. All the lower portions
of the outer plain were already covered with water, and
those sagacious creatures, the hogs, showed by their
snuffing
and disturbed manner of running about, that they had
internal as well as external warnings of danger. Mark
pulled aside the curtain, and let all the animals into the
crater. Poor Kitty was delighted to get on the Summit,
whither she soon found her way, by ascending the steps
commonly used by her masters. Fortunately for the plants,
the grass was in too great abundance, and too grateful to
her, not to be her choice in preference to any other food.
As for the pigs, they got at work in a pile of sea-weed, and
overlooked the garden, which was at some distance, until
fairly glutted, and ready to lie down.
In the meanwhile the tempest increased in violence, the
sea continued to pile among the rocks, and the water
actually
covered the whole of the outer plain of the Reef.
Now it was that Mark comprehended how the base of the
crater had been worn by water, the waves washing past it
with tremendous violence. There was actually a strong
current running over the whole of the reef, without the
crater; the water rushing to leeward, as if glad to get past
the obstacle of the island on any terms, in order to hasten
away before the tempest. Mark was fully half an hour
engaged in looking to his marquee and its contents, all of
which were exposed, more or less, to the power of the
gale. After securing his books, furniture, &c., and seeing
that the stays of the marquee itself were likely to hold out,
he cast an eye to the ship, which was on that side of the
island, also. The staunch old 'Cocus, as Bob called her,
was rising and falling with the waves that now disturbed
her usually placid basin; but, as yet, her cable and anchor
held her, and no harm was done. Fortunately, our
mariners
,
when they unbent the sails, had sent down all the
upper and lighter spars, and had lowered the fore and
main yards on the gunwale, measures of precaution that
greatly lessened the strain on her ground-tackle. The
top-gallant-masts had also been lowered, and the vessel
was what seamen usually term `snug.' Mark would have
been very, very sorry to see her lost, even though he did
expect to have very little more use out of her; for he loved
the craft from habit.
After taking this look at the ship, our mate passed round
the Summit, having two or three tumbles on his way in
consequence of puffs of wind, until he reached the point
over the gate-way, which was that nearest to the ship-yard.
It now occurred to him that possibly it might become
necessary
to look a little to the security of the Neshamony,
for by this time the water on the reef was two or three feet
deep. To his surprise, on looking round for Bob, whom
he thought to be at work securing property near the
gate-way
,
he ascertained that the honest fellow had waded down
to the ship-yard, and clambered on board the pinnace, with
a view to take care of her. The distance between the
point where Mark now stood and the Neshamony exceeded
half a mile, and communication with the voice would have
been next to impossible, had the wind not blown as it did.
With the roaring of the seas, and the howling of the gale,
it was of course entirely out of the question. Mark,
however
,
could see his friend, and see that he was gesticulating,
in the most earnest manner, for himself to join him. Then
it was he first perceived that the pinnace was in motion,
seeming to move on her ways. Presently the blockings
were washed from under her, and the boat went astern
half her length at a single surge. Mark made a bound
down the hill, intending to throw himself into the raging
surf, and to swim off to the aid of Betts; but, pausing an
instant to choose a spot at which to get down the steep,
he looked towards the ship-yard, and saw the pinnace
lifted on a sea, and washed fairly clear of the land!
CHAPTER IX.
Man 's rich with little, were his judgments true;
Nature is frugal, and her wants are few;
These few wants answered bring sincere delights,
But fools create themselves new appetites.
Young
.
It
would have been madness in Mark to pursue his
intention
.
A boat, or craft of any sort, once adrift in such
a gale, could not have been overtaken by even one of those
islanders who are known to pass half their lives in the
water; and the young man sunk down on the rock, almost
gasping for breath in the intensity of his distress. He felt
more for Bob than he did for himself, for escape with life
appeared to him to be a forlorn hope for his friend.
Nevertheless
,
the sturdy old sea-dog who was cast adrift, amid
the raging of the elements, comported himself in a way to
do credit to his training. There was nothing like despair
in his manner of proceeding; but so coolly and
intelligently
did he set about taking care of his craft, that Mark
soon found himself a curious and interested observer of all
he did, feeling quite as much of admiration for Bob's
steadiness
and skill, as concern for his danger.
Betts knew too well the uselessness of throwing over his
kedge to attempt anchoring. Nor was it safe to keep the
boat in the trough of the sea, his wisest course being to
run before the gale until he was clear of the rocks, when
he might endeavour to lie-to, if his craft would bear it. In
driving off the Reef the Neshamony had gone stern
foremost
,
almost as a matter of course, vessels usually being
laid down with their bows towards the land. No sooner
did the honest old salt find he was fairly adrift, therefore,
than he jumped into the stern-sheets and put the helm
down. With stern-way on her, this caused the bows of
the craft to fall off; and, as she came broadside to the
gale, Mark thought she would fall over, also. Some idea
11 *
could be formed of the power of the wind, in the fact that
this sloop-rigged craft, without a rag of sail set, and with
scarce any hamper aloft, no sooner caught the currents of
air abeam, than she lay down to it, as one commonly sees
such craft do under their canvas in stiff breezes.
It was a proof that the Neshamony was well modelled,
that she began to draw ahead as soon as the wind took her
fairly on her broadside, when Betts shifted the helm, and
the pinnace fell slowly off. When she had got nearly
before
the wind, she came up and rolled to-windward like a
ship, and Mark scarce breathed as he saw her plunging
down upon the reefs, like a frantic steed that knows not
whither he is rushing in his terror. From the elevated
position he occupied, Mark could see the ocean as far as
the spray, which filled the atmosphere, would allow of
anything
being seen at all. Places which were usually white
with the foam of breakers, could not now be distinguished
from any of the raging cauldron around them, and it was
evident that Bob must run at hazard. Twenty times did
Mark expect to see the pinnace disappear in the foaming
waves, as it drove furiously onward; but, in each instance,
the light and buoyant boat came up from cavities where
our young man fancied it must be dashed to pieces,
scudding
away to leeward like the sea-fowl that makes its flight
with wings nearly dipping. Mark now began to hope
that his friend might pass over the many reefs that lay in
his track, and gain the open water to leeward. The rise
in the ocean favoured such an expectation, and no doubt
was the reason why the Neshamony was not dashed to
pieces within the first five minutes after she was washed
off her ways. Once to leeward of the vast shoals that
surrounded
the crater, there was the probability of Bob's
finding smoother water, and the chance of his riding out
the tempest by bringing his little sloop up head to sea.
The water through which the boat was then running was
more like a cauldron, bubbling and boiling under some
intense heat produced by subterranean fires, than the
regular
,
rolling billows of the ocean when piled up by gales.
Under the lee of the shoals this cauldron would disappear,
while the mountain waves of the open ocean could not rise
until a certain distance from the shallow water enabled
them to `get up,' as sailors express it. Mark saw the
Neshamony for about a quarter of an hour after she was
adrift, though long before the expiration of even that brief
period she was invisible for many moments at a time, in
consequence of the distance, her want of sail, her lowness
in the water, and the troubled state of the element through
which she was driving. The last look he got of her was
at an instant when the spray was filling the atmosphere
like a passing cloud; when it had driven away, the boat
could no longer be seen!
Here was a sudden and a most unexpected change for
the worse in the situation of Mark Woolston! Not only
had he lost the means of getting off the island, but he had
lost his friend and companion. It was true, Bob was a
rough and an uncultivated associate; but he was honest as
human frailty could leave a human being, true as steel in
his attachments, strong in body, and of great professional
skill. So great, indeed, was the last, that our young man
was not without the hope he would be able to keep under
the lee of the shoals until the gale broke, and then beat up
through them, and still come to his rescue. There was
one point, in particular, on which Mark felt unusual
concern
.
Bob knew nothing whatever of navigation. It was
impossible to teach him anything on that subject. He
knew the points of the compass, but had no notion of the
variations, of latitude or longitude, or of anything
belonging
to the purely mathematical part of the business. Twenty
times had he asked Mark to give him the latitude and
longitude of the crater; twenty times had he been told what
they were, and just as often had he forgotten them. When
questioned by his young friend, twenty-four hours after a
lesson of this sort, if he remembered the figures at all, he
was apt to give the latitude for the longitude, or the
longitude
for the latitude, the degrees for the minutes, or the
minutes for the degrees. Ordinarily, however, he forgot
all about the numbers themselves. Mark had in vain
endeavoured
to impress on his mind the single fact that any
number which exceeded ninety must necessarily refer to
longitude, and not to latitude; for Bob could not be made
to remember even this simple distinction. He was just as
likely to believe the Reef lay in the hundred and twentieth
degree of latitude, as he was to fancy it lay in the
twentieth
.
With such a head, therefore, it was but little to be
expected Bob could give the information to others
necessary
to find the reef, even in the almost hopeless event of
his ever being placed in circumstances to do so. Still,
while so completely ignorant of mathematics and
arithmetic
,
in all their details, few mariners could find their way
better than Bob Betts by the simple signs of the ocean.
He understood the compass perfectly, the variations
excepted
;
and his eye was as true as that of the most
experienced
artist could be, when it became necessary to judge
of the colour of the water. On many occasions had Mark
known him intimate that the ship was in a current, and
had a weatherly or a lee set, when the fact had escaped not
only the officers, but the manufacturers of the charts. He
judged by ripples, and sea-weed, and the other familiar
signs of the seas, and these seldom failed him. While,
therefore, there was not a seaman living less likely to find
the Reef again, when driven off from its vicinity, by means
of observations and the charts, there was not a seaman
living more likely to find it, by resorting to the other helps
of the navigator. On this last peculiarity Mark hung all
his hopes of seeing his friend again, when the gale should
abate.
Since the moment when all the charge of the ship fell
upon his shoulders, by the loss of Captain Crutchely, Mark
had never felt so desolate, as when he lost sight of Bob and
the Neshamony. Then, indeed, did he truly feel himself
to be alone, with none between him and his God with
whom to commune. It is not surprising, therefore, that
one so much disposed to cherish his intercourse with the
Divine Spirit, knelt on the naked rock and prayed. After
this act of duty and devotion, the young man arose, and
endeavoured to turn his attention to the state of things
around him.
The gale still continued with unabated fury. Each
instant
the water rose higher and higher on the Reef, until
it began to enter within the crater, by means of the gutters
that had been worn in the lava, covering two or three
acres of the lower part of its plain. As for the Rancocus,
though occasionally pitching more heavily than our young
man could have believed possible behind the sea-wall, her
anchor still held, and no harm had yet come to her.
Finding
it impossible to do any more, Mark descended into the
crater, where it was a perfect lull, though the wind fairly
howled on every side, and got into one of the South
American
hammocks, of which there had been two or three in
the ship, and of which he had caused one to be suspended
beneath the sort of tent he and poor Bob had erected near
the garden. Here Mark remained all the rest of that day,
and during the whole of the succeeding night. But for
what he had himself previously seen, the roar of the ocean
on the other side of his rocky shelter, and the scuffling of
the winds about the Summit, he might not have been made
conscious of the violence of the tempest that was raging
so near him. Once and awhile, however, a puff of air
would pass over him; but, on the whole, he was little
affected
by the storm, until near morning, when it rained
violently. Fortunately, Mark had taken the precaution to
give a low ridge to all his awnings and tent-coverings,
which turned the water perfectly. When, therefore, he
heard the pattering of the drops on the canvas, he did not
rise, but remained in his hammock until the day returned.
Previously to that moment, however, he dropped into a
deep sleep, in which he lay several hours.
When consciousness returned to Mark, he lay half a
minute trying to recall the past. Then he listened for the
sounds of the tempest. All was still without, and, rising,
he found that the sun was shining, and that a perfect calm
reigned in the outer world. Water was lying in spots, in
holes on the surface of the crater, where the pigs were
drinking and the ducks bathing. Kitty stood in sight, on
the topmost knoll of the Summit, cropping the young sweet
grass that had so lately been refreshed by rain, disliking
it none the less, probably, from the circumstance that a
few particles of salt were to be found among it, the deposit
of the spray. The garden looked smiling, the plants
refreshed
,
and nothing as yet touched in it, by the visiters
who had necessarily been introduced.
Our young man washed himself in one of the pools, and
then crossed the plain to drive out the pigs and poultry,
the necessity of husbanding his stores pressing even
painfully
on his mind. As he approached the gate-way, he
saw that the sea had retired; and, certain that the animals
would take care of themselves, he drove them through the
hole, and dropped the sail before it. Then he sought one
of the ascents, and was soon on the top of the hill. The
trades had returned, but scarce blew in zephyrs; the sea
was calm; the points in the reefs were easily to be seen;
the ship was at rest and seemingly uninjured, and the
whole view was one of the sweetest tranquillity and
security
.
Already had the pent and piled waters diffused
themselves, leaving the Reef as before, with the exception
that those cavities which contained rain-water, during most
of the year, now contained that which was not quite so
palatable. This was a great temporary inconvenience,
though the heavy showers of the past night had done a
good deal towards sweetening the face of the rock, and
had reduced most of the pools to a liquid that was brackish
rather than salt. A great many fish lay scattered about,
on the island, and Mark hastened down to examine their
qualities.
The pigs and poultry were already at work on the game
that was so liberally thrown in their way, and Mark felt
indebted to these scavengers for aiding him in what he
perceived was now a task indispensable to his comfort.
After going to the ship, and breaking his fast, he returned
to the crater, obtained a wheelbarrow, and set to work in
earnest to collect the fish, which a very few hours'
exposure
to the sun of that climate would render so offensive
as to make the island next to intolerable. Never in his
life did our young friend work harder than he did all that
morning. Each load of fish, as it was wheeled into the
crater, was thrown into a trench already prepared for that
purpose, and the ashes were hauled over it, by means of
the hoe. Feeling the necessity of occupation to lessen his
sorrow, as well as that of getting rid of pestilence, which
he seriously apprehended from this inroad of animal
substances
,
Mark toiled two whole days at this work, until
fairly driven from it by the intolerable effluvium which
arose, notwithstanding all he had done, on every side of
the island. It is impossible to say what would have been
the consequences had not the birds come, in thousands, to
his relief. They made quick work of it, clearing off the
fish in numbers that would be nearly incredible. As it
was, however, our young hermit was driven into the ship,
where he passed a whole week, the steadiness of the trades
driving the disagreeable odours to leeward. At the end
of that time he ventured ashore, where he found it possible
to remain, though the Reef did not get purified for more
than a month. Finding a great many fish still remaining
that neither hog nor bird would touch, Mark made a couple
of voyages to Loam Island, whence he brought two
cargoes
of the deposit, and landed at the usual place. This
he wheeled about the Reef, throwing two or three shovels
full on each offensive creature, thus getting rid of the
effluvium
and preparing a considerable store of excellent
manure
for his future husbandry. It may be as well said
here, that, at odd times, he threw these little deposits into
large heaps, and subsequently wheeled them into the crater,
where they were mixed with the principal pile of compost
that had now been, for months, collecting there.
It is a proof of the waywardness of human nature that
we bear great misfortunes better than small ones. So it
proved with Mark, on this occasion; for, much as he really
regarded Bob, and serious as was the loss of his friend to
himself, the effects of the inundation occupied his thoughts,
and disturbed him more, just at that time, than the
disappearance
of the Neshamony. Nevertheless, our young
man had not forgotten to look out for the missing boat, in
readiness to hail its return with joy. He passed much of
the week he was shut up in the ship in her
topmast-cross-trees
,
vainly examining the sea to leeward, in the hope of
catching a distant view of the pinnace endeavouring to
bear up through the reefs. Several times he actually
fancied
he saw her; but it always turned out to be the wing
of some gull, or the cap of a distant breaker. It was when
Mark had come ashore again, and commenced the toil of
covering the decayed fish, and of gathering them into piles,
that these smaller matters supplanted the deep griefs of his
solitude.
One of the annoyances to which our solitary man found
himself most subject, was the glare produced by a burning
sun on rocks and ashes of the drab colour of the crater.
The spots of verdure that he had succeeded in producing
on the Summit, not only relieved and refreshed his eyes,
but they were truly delightful as aids to the view, as well
as grateful to Kitty, which poor creature had, by this time,
cropped them down to a pretty short herbage. This Mark
knew, however, was an advantage to the grass, making it
finer, and causing it to thicken at the roots. The success
of this experiment, the annoyance to his eyes, and a
feverish
desire to be doing, which succeeded the disappearance
of Betts, set Mark upon the project of sowing grass-seed
over as much of the plain of the crater as he thought he
should not have occasion to use for the purposes of tillage.
To work he went then, scattering the seed in as much
profusion as the quantity to be found in the ship would
justify. Friend Abraham White had provided two barrels
of the seed, and this went a good way. While thus
employed
a heavy shower fell, and thinking the rain a most
favourable time to commit his grass-seeds to the earth,
Mark worked through the whole of it, or for several hours,
perspiring with the warmth and exercise.
This done, a look at the garden, with a free use of the
hoe, was the next thing undertaken. That night Mark
slept in his hammock, under the crater-awning, and when
he awoke in the morning it was to experience a weight
like that of lead in his forehead, a raging thirst, and a
burning fever. Now it was that our poor solitary hermit
felt the magnitude of his imprudence and the weight of
the evils of his peculiar situation. That he was about to
be seriously ill he knew, and it behoved him to improve
the time that remained to him, to the utmost. Everything
useful to him was in the ship, and thither it became
indispensable
for him to repair, if he wished to retain even a
chance for life. Opening an umbrella, then, and
supporting
his tottering legs by a cane, Mark commenced a walk
of very near a mile, under an almost perpendicular sun,
at the hottest season of the year. Twenty times did the
young man think he should be compelled to sink on the
bare rock, where there is little question he would soon
have expired, under the united influence of the fever within
and the burning heat without. Despair urged him on,
and, after pausing often to rest, he succeeded in entering
the cabin, at the end of the most perilous hour he had
ever yet passed.
No words of ours can describe the grateful sense of
coolness, in spite of the boiling blood in his veins, that
Mark Woolston experienced when he stepped beneath the
shade of the poop-deck of the Rancocus. The young man
knew that he was about to be seriously ill, and his life
might depend on the use he made of the next hour, or
half-hour, even. He threw himself on a settee, to get a
little rest, and while there he endeavoured to reflect on his
situation, and to remember what he ought to do. The
medicine-chest always stood in the cabin, and he had used
its contents too often among the crew, not to have some
knowledge of their general nature and uses. Potions were
kept prepared in that depository, and he staggered to the
table, opened the chest, took a ready-mixed dose of the
sort he believed best for him, poured water on it from the
filterer, and swallowed it. Our mate ever afterwards
believed
that draught saved his life. It soon made him
deadly sick, and produced an action in his whole system.
For an hour he was under its influence, when he was
enabled
to get into his berth, exhausted and literally unable
any longer to stand. How long he remained in that berth,
or near it ratherfor he was conscious of having crawled
from it in quest of water, and for other purposes, on several
occasionsbut, how long he was confined to his cabin,
Mark Woolston never knew. The period was certainly
to be measured by days, and he sometimes fancied by
weeks. The first probably was the truth, though it might
have been a fortnight. Most of that time his head was
light with fever, though there were intervals when reason
was, at least partially, restored to him, and he became
painfully conscious of the horrors of his situation. Of food
and water he had a sufficiency, the filterer and a bread-bag
being quite near him, and he helped himself often from the
first, in particular; a single mouthful of the ship's biscuit
commonly proving more than he could swallow, even after
it was softened in the water. At length he found himself
indisposed to rise at all, and he certainly remained
eight-and-forty
hours in his berth, without quitting it, and almost
without sleeping, though most of the time in a sort of doze.
Vol. I.  12
At length the fever abated in its violence, though it
began to assume, what for a man in Mark Woolston's
situation
was perhaps more dangerous, a character of a low
type, lingering in his system and killing him by inches.
Mark was aware of his condition, and thought of the means
of relief. The ship had some good Philadelphia porter in
her, and a bottle of it stood on a shelf over his berth. This
object caught his eye, and he actually longed for a draught
of that porter. He had sufficient strength to raise
himself
high enough to reach it, but it far exceeded his powers
to draw the cork, even had the ordinary means been at
hand, which they were not. There was a hammer on the
shelf, however, and with that instrument he did succeed
in making a hole in the side of the bottle, and in filling a
tumbler. This liquor he swallowed at a single draught.
It tasted deliciously to him, and he took a second tumbler
full, when he lay down, uncertain as to the consequences.
That his head was affected by these two glasses of porter,
Mark himself was soon aware, and shortly after drowsiness
followed. After lying in an uneasy slumber for half an
hour, his whole person was covered with a gentle
perspiration
,
in which condition, after drawing the sheet around
him, the sick man fell asleep.
Our patient never knew how long he slept, on this
all-important
occasion. The period certainly included part
of two days and one entire night; but, afterwards, when
Mark endeavoured to correct his calendar, and to regain
something like a record of the time, he was inclined to
think he must have lain there two nights with the
intervening
day. When he awoke, Mark was immediately
sensible that he was free from disease. He was not
immediately
sensible, nevertheless, how extremely feeble
disease
had left him. At first, he fancied he had only to rise,
take nourishment, and go about his ordinary pursuits.
But the sight of his emaciated limbs, and the first effort
he made to get up, convinced him that he had a long state
of probation to go through, before he became the man he
had been a week or two before. It was well, perhaps,
that his head was so clear, and his judgment so
unobscured
at this, his first return to consciousness.
Mark deemed it a good symptom that he felt disposed
to eat. How many days he had been altogether without
nourishment he could not say, but they must have been
several; nor had he received more than could be obtained
from a single ship's biscuit since his attack. All this
came to his mind, with a distinct recollection that he must
be his own physician and nurse. For a few minutes he
lay still, during which he addressed himself to God, with
thanks for having spared his life until reason was restored.
Then he bethought him, well as his feeble state would
allow, of the course he ought to pursue. On a table in
the cabin, and in sight of his berth, through the state-room
door, was a liquor-case, containing wines, brandy, and gin.
Our sick man thought all might yet go well, could he get
a few spoonsfull of an excellent port wine which that case
contained, and which had been provided expressly for cases
of sickness. To do this, however, it was necessary to
obtain
the key, to open the case, and to pour out the liquor;
three things, of which he distrusted his powers to perform
that which was the least difficult.
The key of the liquor-case was in the draw of an open
secretary, which, fortunately, stood between him and the
table. Another effort was made to rise, which so far
succeeded
as to enable the invalid to sit up in his bed. The
cool breeze which aired the cabin revived him a little, and
he was able to stretch out a hand and turn the cock of the
filterer, which he had himself drawn near his berth, while
under the excitement of fever, in order to obtain easy
access
to water. Accidentally this filterer stood in a draught,
and the quart or two of water that had not yet evaporated
was cool and palatable; that is, cool for a ship and such
a climate. One swallow of the water was all Mark
ventured
on, but it revived him more than he could believe
possible. Near the glass into which he had drawn the
water, lay a small piece of pilot bread, and this he dropped
into the tumbler. Then he ventured to try his feet, when
he found a dizziness come over him, that compelled him
to fall back on his berth. Recovering from this in a minute
or two, a second attempt succeeded better, and the poor
fellow, by supporting himself against the bulkheads, and
by leaning on chairs, was enabled to reach the desk. The
key was easily obtained, and the table was next reached.
Here Mark sunk into a chair, as much exhausted as he
would have been, previously to his illness, by a desperate
effort to defend life.
The invalid was in his shirt, and the cool sea-breeze had
the effect of an air-bath on him. It revived him in a little
while, when he applied the key, opened the case, got out
the bottle by using both hands, though it was nearly empty,
and poured out a wine-glass of the liquor. With these
little exertions he was so much exhausted as almost to
faint. Nothing saved him, probably, but a sip of the wine
which he took from the glass as it stood on the table. It
has been much the fashion, of late years, to decry wine,
and this because it is a gift of Providence that has been
greatly abused. In Mark Woolston's instance it proved,
what it was designed to be, a blessing instead of a curse.
That single sip of wine produced an effect on him like
that of magic. It enabled him soon to obtain his tumbler
of water, into which he poured the remainder of the liquor.
With the tumbler in his hand, the invalid next essayed to
cross the cabin, and to reach the berth in the other
state-room
.
He was two or three minutes in making this
passage
,
sustained by a chair, into which he sunk not less
than three times, and revived by a few more sips of the
wine and water. In this state-room was a bed with clean
cool linen, that had been prepared for Bob, but which that
worthy fellow had pertinanciously refused to use, out of
respect to his officer. On these sheets Mark now sank,
almost exhausted. He had made a happy exchange,
however
,
the freshness and sweetness of the new bed, of itself,
acting as delicious restoratives.
After resting a few minutes, the solitary invalid formed
a new plan of proceeding. He knew the importance of
not over-exerting himself, but he also knew the importance
of cleanliness and of a renovation of his strength. By this
time the biscuit had got to be softened in the wine and
water, and he took a piece, and after masticating it well,
swallowed it. This was positively the first food the sick
and desolate young man had received in a week. Fully
aware of this, he abstained from taking a second mouthful,
though sorely pressed to it by hunger. So strong was the
temptation, and so sweet did that morsel taste, that Mark
felt he might not refrain unless he had something to occupy
his mind for a few minutes. Taking a small swallow of
the wine and water, he again got on his feet, and staggered
to the drawer in which poor Captain Crutchely had kept
his linen. Here he got a shirt, and tottered on as far as
the quarter-deck. Beneath the awning Mark had kept the
section of a hogshead, as a bathing-tub, and for the
purpose
of catching the rain-water that ran from the awning,
Kitty often visiting the ship and drinking from this
reservoir
.
The invalid found the tub full of fresh and sweet water,
and throwing aside the shirt in which he had lain so long,
he rather fell than seated himself in the water. After
remaining
a sufficient time to recover his breath, Mark
washed his head, and long matted beard, and all parts of
his frame, as well as his strength would allow. He must
have remained in the water several minutes, when he
managed
to tear himself from it, as fearful of excess from this
indulgence as from eating. The invalid now felt like a
new man! It is scarcely possible to express the change
that came over his feelings, when he found himself purified
from the effects of so long a confinement in a feverish bed,
without change, or nursing of any sort. After drying
himself
as well as he could with a towel, though the breeze
and the climate did that office for him pretty effectually,
Mark put on the clean, fresh shirt, and tottered back to
his own berth, where he fell on the mattress, nearly
exhausted
.
It was half-an-hour before he moved again,
though all that time experiencing the benefits of the
nourishment
taken, and the purification undergone. The bath,
moreover, had acted as a tonic, giving a stimulus to the
whole system. At the end of the half hour, the young
man took another mouthful of the biscuit, half emptied the
tumbler, fell back on his pillow, and was soon in a sweet
sleep.
It was near sunset when Mark lost his consciousness on
this occasion, nor did he recover it until the light of day
was once more cheering the cabin. He had slept
profoundly
twelve hours, and this so much the more readily
from the circumstance that he had previously refreshed
himself with a bath and clean linen. The first
consciousness
12 *
of his situation was accompanied with the bleat of
poor Kitty. That gentle animal, intended by nature to
mix with herds, had visited the cabin daily, and had been
at the sick man's side, when his fever was at its height;
and had now come again, as if to inquire after his night's
rest. Mark held out his hand, and spoke to his companion,
for such she was, and thought she was rejoiced to hear his
voice again, and to be allowed to lick his hand. There
was great consolation in this mute intercourse, poor Mark
feeling the want of sympathy so much as to find a deep
pleasure in this proof of affection even in a brute.
Mark now arose, and found himself sensibly improved
by his night's rest, the washing, and the nourishment
received
,
little as the last had been. His first step was to
empty the tumbler, bread and all. Then he took another
bath, the last doing quite as much good, he fancied, as his
breakfast. All that day, the young man managed his case
with the same self-denial and prudence, consuming a ship's
biscuit in the course of the next twenty-four hours, and
taking two or three glasses of the wine, mixed with water
and sweetened with sugar. In the afternoon he
endeavoured
to shave, but the first effort convinced him he was
getting well too fast.
It was thrice twenty-four hours after his first bath,
before
Mark Woolston had sufficient strength to reach the
galley and light a fire. In this he then succeeded, and he
treated himself to a cup of good warm tea. He concocted
some dishes of arrow-root and cocoa, too, in the course of
that and the next day, continuing his baths, and changing
his linen repeatedly. On the fifth day, he got off his beard,
which was a vast relief to him, and by the end of the week
he actually crawled up on the poop, where he could get a
sight of his domains.
The Summit was fast getting to be really green in
considerable
patches, for the whole rock was now covered
with grass. Kitty was feeding quietly enough on the
hillside
,
the gentle creature having learned to pass the curtain
at the gate, and go up and down the ascents at pleasure.
Mark scarce dared to look for his hogs, but there they
were rooting and grunting about the Reef, actually fat and
contented. He knew that this foreboded evil to his garden,
for the creatures must have died for want of food during
his illness, had not some such relief been found. As yet,
his strength would not allow him to go ashore, and he was
obliged to content himself with this distant view of his
estate. The poultry appeared to be well, and the invalid
fancied he saw chickens running at the side of one of the
hens.
It was a week later before Mark ventured to go as far
as the crater. On entering it, he found that his
conjectures
concerning the garden were true. Two-thirds of it
had been dug over by the snouts of his pigs, quite as
effectually
as he could have done it, in his vigour, with the
spade. Tops and roots had been demolished alike, and
about as much wasted as had been consumed. Kitty was
found,
flagrante delictu
, nibbling at the beans, which, by
this time, were dead ripe. The peas, and beans, and
Indian
corn had made good picking for the poultry; and
everything possessing life had actually been living in
abundance
,
while the sick man had lain unconscious of even
his own existence, in a state as near death as life.
Mark found his awning standing, and was glad to rest
an hour or two in his hammock, after looking at the
garden
.
While there the hogs entered the crater, and made
a meal before his eyes. To his surprise, the sow was
followed
by ten little creatures, that were already getting to
be of the proper size for eating. A ravenous appetite was
now Mark's greatest torment, and the coarse food of the
ship was rather too heavy for him. He had exhausted his
wit in contriving dishes of flour, and pined for something
more grateful than salted beef, or pork. Although he
somewhat distrusted his strength, yet longing induced him
to make an experiment. A fowling-piece, loaded with
ball, was under the awning; and freshening the priming,
the young man watched his opportunity when one of the
grunters was in a good position, and shot it in the head.
Then cutting its throat with a knife, he allowed it to bleed,
when he cleaned, and
skinned it
. This last operation was
not very artistical, but it was necessary in the situation of
our invalid. With the carcase of this pig, which was quite
as much as he could even then carry back to the ship,
though the animal was not yet six weeks old, Mark made
certain savoury and nourishing dishes, that contributed
essentially to the restoration of his strength. In the course
of the ensuing month three more of the pigs shared the
same fate, as did half-a-dozen of the brood of chickens
already mentioned, though the last were not yet half-grown.
But Mark felt, now, as if he could eat the crater, though
as yet he had not been able to clamber to the Summit.
CHAPTER X.
Yea! long as nature's humblest child
Hath kept her temple undefiled
By sinful sacrifice,
Earth's fairest scenes are all his own,
He is a monarch, and his throne
Is built amid the skies.
Wilson
.
Our
youthful hermit was quite two months in regaining
his strength, though, by the end of one he was able to look
about him, and turn his hand to many little necessary jobs.
The first thing he undertook was to set up a gate that
would keep the animals on the outside of the crater. The
pigs had not only consumed much the largest portion of
his garden truck, but they had taken a fancy to break up
the crust of that part of the crater where the grass was
showing itself, and to this inroad upon his meadows, Mark
had no disposition to submit. He had now ascertained
that the surface of the plain, though of a rocky appearance,
was so far shelly and porous that the seeds had taken very
generally; and as soon as their roots worked their way
into the minute crevices, he felt certain they would of
themselves convert the whole surface into a soil sufficiently
rich to nourish the plants he wished to produce there.
Under such circumstances he did not desire the assistance
of the hogs. As yet, however, the animals had done good,
rather than harm to the garden, by stirring the soil up,
and mixing the sea-weed and decayed fish with it; but
among the grass they threatened to be more destructive
than useful. In most places the crust of the plain was just
thick enough to bear the weight of a man, and Mark, no
geologist, by the way, came to the conclusion that it
existed
at all more through the agency of the salt deposited
in ancient floods, than from any other cause. According
to the great general law of the earth, soil should have been
formed from rock, and not rock from soil; though there
certainly are cases in which the earths indurate, as well
as become disintegrated. As we are not professing to
give a scientific account of these matters, we shall simply
state the facts, leaving better scholars than ourselves to
account for their existence.
Mark made his gate out of the fife-rail, at the foot of the
mainmast, sawing off the stanchions for that purpose.
With a little alteration it answered perfectly, being made
to swing from a post that was wedged into the arch, by
cutting it to the proper length. As this was the first
attack
upon the Rancocus that had yet been made, by axe
or saw, it made the young man melancholy; and it was
only with great reluctance that he could prevail on himself
to begin what appeared like the commencement of breaking
up the good craft. It was done, however, and the gate
was hung; thereby saving the rest of the crop. It was
high time; the hogs and poultry, to say nothing of Kitty,
having already got their full share. The inroads of the
first, however, were of use in more ways than one, since
they taught our young cultivator a process by which he
could get his garden turned up at a cheap rate. They
also suggested to him an idea that he subsequently turned
to good account. Having dug his roots so early, it
occurred
to Mark that, in so low a climate, and with such a
store of manure, he might raise two crops in a year, those
which came in the cooler months varying a little in their
properties from those which came in the warmer. On this
hint he endeavoured to improve, commencing anew beds
that, without it, would probably have lain fallow some
months longer.
In this way did our young man employ himself until he
found his strength perfectly restored. But the severe
illness
he had gone through, with the sad views it had given
him of some future day, when he might be compelled to
give up life itself, without a friendly hand to smooth his
pillow, or to close his eyes, led him to think far more
seriously
than he had done before, on the subject of the true
character of our probationary condition here on earth, and
on the unknown and awful future to which it leads us.
Mark had been carefully educated on the subject of
religion
,
and was well enough disposed to enter into the
inquiry
in a suitable spirit of humility; but, the grave
circumstances
in which he was now placed, contributed
largely to the clearness of his views of the necessity of
preparing for the final change. Cut off, as he was, from
all communion with his kind; cast on what was, when he
first knew it, literally a barren rock in the midst of the
vast Pacific Ocean, Mark found himself, by a very natural
operation of causes, in much closer communion with his
Creator, than he might have been in the haunts of the
world. On the Reef, there was little to divert his thoughts
from their true course; and the very ills that pressed upon
him, became so many guides to his gratitude by showing,
through the contrasts, the many blessings which had been
left him by the mercy of the hand that had struck him.
The nights in that climate and season were much the
pleasantest portions of the four-and-twenty hours. There
were no exhalations from decayed vegetable substances or
stagnant pools, to create miasma, but the air was as pure
and little to be feared under a placid moon as under a
noon-day sun. The first hours of night, therefore, were
those in which our solitary man chose to take most of his
exercise, previously to his complete restoration to strength;
and then it was that he naturally fell into an obvious and
healthful communion with the stars.
So far as the human mind has as yet been able to
penetrate
the mysteries of our condition here on earth, with
the double connection between the past and the future, all
its just inferences tend to the belief in an existence of a
vast and beneficent design. We have somewhere heard, or
read, that the gipsies believe that men are the fallen angels,
toiling their way backward on the fatal path along which
they formerly rushed to perdition. This may not be,
probably
is not true, in its special detail; but that men are
placed here to prepare themselves for a future and higher
condition of existence, is not only agreeable to our
consciousness
,
but is in harmony with revelation. Among the
many things that have been revealed to us, where so many
are hid, we are told that our information is to increase, as
we draw nearer to the millennium, until The whole earth
shall be filled with the knowledge of the Lord, as the
waters cover the sea. We may be far from that blessed
day; probably are; but he has lived in vain, who has dwelt
his half century in the midst of the civilization of this our
own age, and does not see around him the thousand proofs
of the tendency of things to the fulfilment of the decrees,
announced to us ages ago by the pens of holy men. Rome,
Greece, Egypt, and all that we know of the past, which
comes purely of man and his passions; empires, dynasties,
heresies and novelties, come and go like the changes of
the seasons; while the only thing that can be termed stable,
is the slow but sure progress of prophecy. The agencies
that have been employed to bring about the great ends
foretold so many centuries since, are so very natural, that
we often lose sight of the mighty truth in its seeming
simplicity
.
But, the signs of the times are not to be mistaken.
Let any man of fifty, for instance, turn his eyes toward the
East, the land of Judea, and compare its condition, its
promises of to-day, with those that existed in his own
youth, and ask himself how the change has been produced.
That which the Richards and Sts. Louis of the middle ages
could not effect with their armed hosts, is about to happen
as a consequence of causes so obvious and simple that they
are actually overlooked by the multitude. The Ottoman
power and Ottoman prejudices are melting away, as it
might be under the heat of divine truth, which is clearing
for itself a path that will lead to the fulfilment of its own
predictions.
Among the agents that are to be employed, in
impressing
the human race with a sense of the power and
benevolence
of the Deity, we think the science of astronomy,
with its mechanical auxiliaries, is to act its full share.
The more deeply we penetrate into the arcana of nature,
the stronger becomes the proofs of design; and a deity
thus obviously, tangibly admitted, the more profound will
become the reverence for his character and power. In
Mark Woolston's youth, the great progress which has since
been made in astronomy, more especially in the way of its
details through observations, had but just commenced. A
vast deal, it is true, had been accomplished in the way of
pure science, though but little that came home to the
understandings
and feelings of the mass. Mark's education
had given him an outline of what Herschel and his
contemporaries
had been about, however; and when he sat on the
Summit, communing with the stars, and through those
distant and still unknown worlds, with their Divine First
Cause, it was with as much familiarity with the subject as
usually belongs to the liberally educated, without carrying
a particular branch of learning into its recesses. He had
increased his school acquisitions a little, by the study and
practice of Navigation, and had several works that he was
fond of reading, which may have made him a somewhat
more accurate astronomer than those who get only leading
ideas on the subject. Hours at a time did Mark linger on
the Summit, studying the stars in the clear, transparent
atmosphere of the tropics, his spirit struggling the while
to get into closer communion with that dread Being which
had produced all these mighty results; among which the
existence of the earth, its revolutions, its heats and colds,
its misery and happiness, are but specks in the incidents
of a universe. Previously to this period, he had looked
into these things from curiosity and a love of science;
now, they impressed him with the deepest sense of the
power and wisdom of the Deity, and caused him the better
to understand his own position in the scale of created
beings.
Not only did our young hermit study the stars with his
own eyes, but he had the aid of instruments. The ship
had two very good spy-glasses, and Mark himself was the
owner of a very neat reflecting telescope, which he had
purchased with his wages, and had brought with him as a
source of amusement and instruction. To this telescope
there was a brass stand, and he conveyed it to the tent on
the Summit, where it was kept for use. Aided by this
instrument, Mark could see the satellites of Jupiter and
Saturn, the ring of the latter, the belts of the former, and
many of the phenomena of the moon. Of course, the
spherical forms of all the nearer planets, then known to
astronomers, were plainly to be seen by the assistance of
this instrument; and there is no one familiar fact connected
with our observations of the heavenly bodies, that strikes
the human mind, through the senses, as forcibly as this.
For near a month, Mark almost passed the nights gazing
at the stars, and reflecting on their origin and uses. He
had no expectations of making discoveries, or of even
adding
to his own stores of knowledge: but his thoughts were
brought nearer to his Divine Creator by investigations of
this sort; for where a zealous mathematician might have
merely exulted in the confirmation of some theory by means
of a fact, he saw the hand of God instead of the solution
of a problem. Thrice happy would it be for the man of
science, could he ever thus hold his powers in subjection to
the great object for which they were brought into existence;
and, instead of exulting in, and quarrelling about the pride
of human reason, be brought to humble himself and his
utmost learning, at the feet of Infinite Knowledge and
power, and wisdom, as they are thus to be traced in the
path of the Ancient of Days!
By the time his strength returned, Mark had given up,
altogether, the hope of ever seeing Betts again. It was
just possible that the poor fellow might fall in with a ship,
or find his way to some of the islands; but, if he did so,
it would be the result of chance and not of calculations.
The pinnace was well provisioned, had plenty of water,
and, tempests excepted, was quite equal to navigating the
Pacific; and there was a faint hope that Bob might
continue
his course to the eastward, with a certainty of
reaching
some part of South America in time. If he should
take this course, and succeed, what would be the
consequence
?
Who would put sufficient faith in the story of a
simple seaman, like Robert Betts, and send a ship to look
for Mark Woolston? In these later times, the government
would doubtless despatch a vessel of war on such an errand,
did no other means of rescuing the man offer; but, at the
close of the last century, government did not exercise that
much of power. It scarcely protected its seamen from the
English press-gang and the Algerine slave-driver; much
Vol. I.  13
less did it think of rescuing a solitary individual from a
rock in the midst of the Pacific. American vessels did
then roam over that distant ocean, but it was comparatively
in small numbers, and under circumstances that promised
but little to the hopes of the hermit. It was a subject he
did not like to dwell on, and he kept his thoughts as much
diverted from it as it was in his power so to do.
The season had now advanced into as much of autumn
as could be found within the tropics, and on land so low.
Everything in the garden had ripened, and much had been
thrown out to the pigs and poultry, in anticipation of its
decay. Mark saw that it was time to re-commence his
beds, selecting such seed as would best support the winter
of that climate, if winter it could be called. In looking
around him, he made a regular survey of all his
possessions
,
inquiring into the state of each plant he had put into
the ground, as well as into that of the ground itself. First,
then, as respects the plants.
The growth of the oranges, lemons, cocoa-nuts, limes,
figs, &c., placed in rows beneath the cliffs, had been
prodigious
.
The water had run off the adjacent rocks and
kept them well moistened most of the season, though a
want of rain was seldom known on the Reef. Of the two,
too much, rather than too little water fell; a circumstance
that was of great service, however, in preserving the stock,
which had used little beside that it found in the pools, for
the last ten months. The shrubs, or little trees, were quite
a foot high, and of an excellent colour. Mark gave each
of them a dressing with the hoe, and manured all with a
sufficient quantity of the guano. About half he transplanted
to spots more favourable, putting the cocoa-nuts, in
particular
,
as near the sea as he could get them.
With respect to the other plants, it was found that each
had flourished precisely in proportion to its adaptation to
the climate. The products of some were increased in size,
while those of others had dwindled. Mark took note of
these facts, determining to cultivate those most which
succeeded
best. The melons of both sorts, the tomatoes, the
egg-plants, the peppers, cucumbers, onions, beans, corn,
sweet-potatoes, &c. &c., had all flourished; while the Irish
potato, in particular, had scarce produced a tuber at all.
As for the soil, on examination Mark found it had been
greatly improved by the manure, tillage and water it had
received. The hogs were again let in to turn it over with
their snouts, and this they did most effectually in the course
of two or three days. By this time, in addition to the
three grown porkers our young man possessed, there were
no less than nine young ones. This number was getting
to be formidable, and he saw the necessity of killing off,
in order to keep them within reasonable limits. One of
the fattest and best he converted into pickled pork, not
from any want of that article, there being still enough left
in the ship to last him several years, but because he
preferred
it corned to that which had been in the salt so long
a time. He saw the mistake he had made in allowing the
pigs to get to be so large, since the meat would spoil long
before he could consume even the smallest-sized shoats.
For their own good, however, he was compelled to shoot
no less than five, and these he buried entire, in deep places
in his garden, having heard that earth which had imbibed
animal substances, in this way, was converted into
excellent
manure.
Mark now made a voyage to Loam Island, in quest of a
cargo, using the raft, and towing the dingui. It was on
this occasion that our young man was made to feel how
much he had lost, in the way of labour, in being deprived
of the assistance of Bob. He succeeded in loading his
raft, however, and was just about to sail for home again,
when it occurred to him that possibly the seeds and roots
of the asparagus he had put into a corner of the deposit
might have come to something. Sure enough, on going
to the spot, Mark found that the seed had taken well, and
hundreds of young plants were growing flourishingly, while
plants fit to eat had pushed their tops through the loam,
from the roots. This was an important discovery,
asparagus
being a vegetable of which Mark was exceedingly fond,
and one easily cultivated. In that climate, and in a soil
sufficiently rich, it might be made to send up new shoots
the entire year; and there was little fear of scurvy so long
as he could obtain plenty of this plant to eat. The melons
and other vegetables, however, had removed all Mark's
dread of that formidable disease; more especially as he
had now eggs, chickens, and fresh fish, the latter in
quantities
that were almost oppressive. In a word, the means
of subsistence now gave the young man no concern
whatever
.
When he first found himself on a barren rock,
indeed
,
the idea had almost struck terror into his mind; but,
now that he had ascertained that his crater could be
cultivated
,
and promised, like most other extinct volcanoes,
unbounded fertility, he could no longer apprehend a disease
which is commonly owing to salted provisions.
When Mark found his health completely re-established,
he sat down and drew up a regular plan of dividing his
time between work, contemplation, and amusement.
Fortunately
,
perhaps, for one who lived in a climate where
vegetation was so luxuriant when it could be produced at
all, work was pressed into his service as an amusement.
Of the last, there was certainly very little, in the common
acceptation of the word; but our hermit was not without
it altogether. He studied the habits of the sea-birds that
congregated in thousands around so many of the rocks of
the Reef, though so few scarce ever ventured on the crater
island. He made voyages to and fro, usually connecting
business with pleasure. Taking favourable times for such
purposes, he floated several cargoes of loam to the Reef,
as well as two enormous rafts of sea-weed. Mark was
quite a month in getting these materials into his compost
heap, which he intended should lie in a pile during the
winter, in order that it might be ready for spading in the
spring. We use these terms by way of distinguishing the
seasons, though of winter, strictly speaking, there was none.
Of the two, the grass grew better at mid-winter than at
mid-summer, the absence of the burning heat of the last
being favourable to its growth. As the season advanced,
Mark saw his grass very sensibly increase, not only in
surface
,
but in thickness. There were now spots of some
size, where a turf was forming, nature performing all her
tasks in that genial climate, in about a fourth of the time
it would take to effect the same object in the temperate
zone. On examining these places, Mark came to the
conclusion
that the roots of his grasses acted as cultivators,
by working their way into the almost insensible crevices
of the crust, letting in air and water to places whence they
had hitherto been excluded. This seemed, in particular,
to be the case with the grass that grew within the crater,
which had increased so much in the course of what may
be termed the winter, that it was really fast converting a
plain of a light drab colour, that was often painful to the
eyes, into a plot of as lovely verdure as ever adorned the
meadows of a Swiss cottage. It became desirable to keep
this grass down, and Kitty being unable to crop a meadow
of so many acres, Mark was compelled to admit his pigs
and poultry again. This he did at stated times only,
however
;
or when he was at work himself in the garden, and
could prevent their depredations on his beds. The rooting
gave him the most trouble; but this he contrived in a great
measure to prevent, by admitting his hogs only when they
were eager for grass, and turning them out as soon as they
began to generalize, like an epicure picking his nuts after
dinner.
It was somewhere near mid-winter, by Mark's
calculations
,
when the young man commenced a new task that
was of great importance to his comfort, and which
might
affect his future life. He had long determined to lay down
a boat, one of sufficient size to explore the whole reef in,
if not large enough to carry him out to sea. The dingui
was altogether too small for labour; though exceedingly
useful in its way, and capable of being managed even in
pretty rough water by a skilful hand, it wanted both weight
and room. It was difficult to float in, even a raft of
sea-weed
,
with so light a boat; and as for towing the raft, it
was next to impossible. But the raft was unwiedly, and
when loaded down, besides carrying very little for its great
weight, it was very much at the mercy of the currents and
waves. Then the construction of a boat was having an
important purpose in view, and, in that sense, was a
desirable
undertaking.
Mark had learned so much in putting the pinnace
together
,
that he believed himself equal to this new undertaking.
Materials enough remained in the ship to make half-a-dozen
boats, and in tumbling over the lumber he had found a
quantity of stuff that had evidently been taken in with a
view to repair boats, if not absolutely to construct them.
A ship's hold is such an omnium gatherum, stowage being
13*
necessarily so close, that it usually requires time for one
who does not know where to put his hand on everything,
to ascertain how much or how little is to be found in it.
Such was the fact with Mark, whose courtship and
marriage
had made a considerable inroad on his duties as a
mate. As he overhauled the hold, he daily found fresh
reasons for believing that Friend Abraham White had
made provisions, of one sort and another, of which he was
profoundly ignorant, but which, as the voyage had
terminated
,
proved to be of the greatest utility. Thus it was,
that just as he was about to commence getting out these
great requisites from new planks, he came across a stem,
stern-frame, and keel of a boat, that was intended to be
eighteen feet long. Of course our young man profited by
this discovery, getting the materials of all sorts, including
these, round to the ship-yard by means of the raft.
For the next two months, or until he had reason to
believe
spring had fairly set in, Mark toiled faithfully at
his boat. Portions of his work gave him a great deal of
trouble; some of it on account of ignorance of the craft,
and some on account of his being alone. Getting the
awning up anew cost poor Mark the toil of several days,
and this because his single strength was not sufficient to
hoist the corners of that heavy course, even when aided
by watch-tackles. He was compelled to rig a crab, with
which he effected his purpose, reserving the machine to
aid him on other occasions. Then the model of the boat
cost him a great deal of time and labour. Mark knew a
good bottom when he saw it, but that was a very different
thing from knowing how to make one. Of the rules of
draughting he was altogether ignorant, and his eye was
his only guide. He adopted a plan that was sufficiently
ingenious, though it would never do to build a navy on the
same principle.
Having a great plenty of deal, Mark got out in the rough
about twice as many timbers for one side of his boat as
would be required, in this thin stuff, when he set them up
in their places. Aided by this beginning, the young man
began to dub and cut away, until he got each piece into
something very near the shape his eye told him it ought to
be. Even after he had got as far as this, our boat-builder
passed a week in shaving, and planing, and squinting, and
in otherwise reducing his lines to fair proportions.
Satisfied
,
at length, with the bottom he had thus fashioned,
Mark took out just one half of his pieces, leaving the other
half standing. After these moulds did he saw and cut his
boat's timbers, making, in each instance, duplicates. When
the ribs and floors of his craft were ready, he set them up
in the vacancies, and secured them, after making an
accurate
fit with the pieces left standing. On knocking away
the deal portions of his work, Mark had the frame of his
boat complete. This was much the most troublesome part
of the whole job; nor was it finished, when the young man
was obliged, by the progress of the seasons, to quit the
ship-yard for the garden.
Mark had adopted a system of diet and a care of his
person, that kept him in perfect health, illness being the
evil that he most dreaded. His food was more than half
vegetable, several plants having come forward even in the
winter; and the asparagus, in particular, yielding at a rate
that would have made the fortune of a London gardener.
The size of the plants he cut was really astounding, a
dozen stems actually making a meal. The hens laid all
winter, and eggs were never wanting. The corned pork
gave substance, as well as a relish, to all the dishes the
young man cooked; and the tea, sugar and coffee,
promising
to hold out years longer, the table still gave him little
concern. Once in a month, or so, he treated himself to a
bean-soup, or a pea-soup, using the stores of the Rancocus
for that purpose, foreseeing that the salted meats would
spoil after a time, and the dried vegetables get to be
worthless
,
by means of insects and worms. By this time,
however
,
there were fresh crops of both those vegetables, which
grew better in the winter than they could in the summer,
in that hot climate. Fish, too, were used as a change,
whenever the young man had an inclination for that sort
of food, which was as often as three or four times a week;
the little pan-fish already mentioned, being of a sort of
which one would scarcely ever tire.
It being a matter of some moment to save unnecessary
labour, Mark seldom cooked more than once in
twenty-four
hours, and then barely enough to last for that day.
In consequence of this rule, he soon learned how little was
really necessary for the wants of one person, it being his
opinion that a quarter of an acre of such soil as that which
now composed his garden, would more than furnish all the
vegetables he could consume. The soil, it is true, was of
a very superior quality. Although it had lain so long
unproductive
and seemingly barren, now that it had been
stirred, and air and water were admitted, and guano, and
sea-weed, and loam, and dead fish had been applied, and
all in quantities that would have been deemed very ample
in the best wrought gardens of christendom, the acre he
had under tillage might be said to have been brought to
the highest stage of fertility. It wanted a little in
consistency
,
perhaps; but the compost heap was very large,
containing enough of all the materials just mentioned to
give the garden another good dressing. As for the grass,
Mark was convinced the guano was all-sufficient for that,
and this he took care to apply as often as once in two or
three months.
Our young man was never tired, indeed, with feasting
his eyes with the manner in which the grass had spread
over the mount. It is true, that he had scattered seed, at
odd and favourable moments, over most of it, by this time;
but he was persuaded the roots of those first sown would
have extended themselves, in the course of a year or two,
over the whole Summit. Nor were these grasses thin and
sickly, threatening as early an extinction as they had been
quick in coming to maturity. On the contrary, after
breaking what might be called the crust of the rock with
their vigorous though nearly invisible roots, they made a
bed for themselves, on which they promised to repose for
ages. The great frequency of the rains favoured their
growth, and Mark was of opinion after the experience of
one summer, that his little mountain might be green the
year round.
We have called the mount of the crater little, but the
term ought not to be used in reference to such a hill, when
the extent of the island itself was considered. By actual
measurement, Mark had ascertained that there was one
knoll on the Summit which was just seventy-two feet above
the level of the rock. The average height, however, might
be given as somewhat less than fifty. Of surface, the rocky
barrier of the crater had almost as much as the plain within
it, though it was so broken and uneven as not to appear
near as large. Kitty had long since determined that the
hill was more than large enough for all her wants; and
glad enough did she seem when Mark succeeded, after a
great deal of difficulty, in driving the hogs up a flight of
steps he had made within the crater, to help her crop the
herbage. As for the rooting of the last, so long as they
were on the Summit, it was so much the better; since, in
that climate, it was next to impossible to kill grass that
was once fairly in growth, and the more the crust of the
ashes was broken, the more rapid and abundant would be
the vegetation.
Mark had, of course, abandoned the idea of continuing
to cultivate his melons, or any other vegetables, on the
Summit, or he never would have driven his hogs there.
He was unwilling, notwithstanding, to lose the benefit of
the deposits of soil and manure which he and Bob had
made there with so much labour to themselves. After
reflecting what he could do with them, he came to the
conclusion that he would make small enclosures around
some fifteen or twenty of the places, and transplant some
of the fig-trees, orange-trees, limes, lemons, &c., which
still stood rather too thick within the crater to ripen their
fruits to advantage. In order to make these little
enclosures
,
Mark merely drove into the earth short posts,
passing
around them old rope, of which there was a
superabundance
on board the ship. This arrangement suggested
the idea of fencing in the garden, by the same means, in
order to admit the pigs to eat the grass, when he was not
watching them. By the time these dispositions were made,
it was necessary to begin again to put in the seeds.
On this occasion Mark determined to have a succession
of crops, and not to bring on everything at once, as he had
done the first year of his tillage. Accordingly, he would
manure and break up a bed, and plant or sow it, waiting
a few days before he began another. Experience had told
him that there was never an end to vegetation in that
climate
,
and he saw no use in pushing his labours faster than
he might require their fruits. It was true, certain plants
did better if permitted to come to maturity in particular
periods, but the season was so long as very well to allow
of the arrangement just mentioned. As this distribution
of his time gave the young man a good deal of leisure, he
employed it in the ship-yard. Thus the boat and the
garden
were made to advance together, and when the last was
sown and planted, the first was planked. When the last
bed was got in, moreover, those first set in order were
already giving forth their increase. Mark had abundance
of delicious salad, young onions, radishes that seemed to
grow like mushrooms, young peas, beans, &c., in
quantities
that enabled him to turn the hogs out on the Reef,
and keep them well on the refuse of his garden, assisted a
little by what was always to be picked up on the rocks.
By this time Mark had settled on a system which he
thought to pursue. There was no use in his raising more
pigs than he could use. Taking care to preserve the
breed, therefore, he killed off the pigs, of which he had
fresh litters, from time to time; and when he found the
old hogs getting to be troublesome, as swine will become
with years, he just shot them, and buried their bodies in
his compost heap, or in his garden, where one
common-sized
hog would render highly fertile several yards square
of earth, or ashes. This practice he continued ever after,
extending it to his fowls and ducks, the latter of which
produced a great many eggs. By rigidly observing this
rule, Mark avoided an evil which is very common even in
inhabited countries, that of keeping more stock than is
good for their owner. Six or eight hens laid more eggs
than he could consume, and there was always a sufficient
supply of chickens for his wants. In short, our hermit
had everything he actually required, and most things that
could contribute to his living in great abundance. The
necessity of cooking for himself, and the want of pure, cold
spring water, were the two greatest physical hardships he
endured. There were moments, indeed, when Mark would
have gladly yielded one-half of the advantages he actually
possessed, to have a good spring of living water. Then
he quelled the repinings of his spirit at this privation, by
endeavouring to recall how many blessings were left at his
command, compared to the wants and sufferings of many
another shipwrecked mariner of whom he had read or
heard.
The spring passed as pleasantly as thoughts of home and
Bridget would allow, and his beds and plantations
flourished
to a degree that surprised him. As for the grass,
as soon as it once got root, it became a most beneficial
assistant to his plans of husbandry. Nor was it grass alone
that rewarded Mark's labours and forethought in his
meadows
and pastures. Various flowers appeared in the
herbage
;
and he was delighted at fidning a little patch of the
common wild strawberry, the seed of which had doubtless
got mixed with those of the grasses. Instead of indulging
his palate with a taste of this delicious and most salubrious
fruit, Mark carefully collected it all, made a bed in his
garden, and included the cultivation of this among his
other plants. He would not disturb a single root of the
twenty or thirty different shoots that he found, all being
together, and coming from the same cast of his hand while
sowing, lest it might die; but, with the seed of the fruit,
he was less chary. One thing struck Mark as singular.
Thus far his garden was absolutely free from weeds of
every sort. The seed that he put into the ground came
up, and nothing else. This greatly simplified his toil,
though he had no doubt that, in the course of time, he
should meet with intruders in his beds. He could only
account for this circumstance by the facts, that the ashes
of the volcano contained of themselves no combination of
the elements necessary to produce plants, and that the
manures he used, in their nature, were free from weeds.
CHAPTER XI.
The globe around earth's hollow surface shakes,
And is the ceiling of her sleeping sons:
O'er devastation we blind revels keep;
While buried towns support the dancer's heel.
Young
.
It
was again mid-summer ere Mark Woolston had his
boat ready for launching. He had taken things leisurely,
and completed his work in all its parts, before he thought
of putting the craft into the water. Afraid of worms, he
used some of the old copper on this boat, too; and he
painted her, inside and out, not only with fidelity, but with
taste. Although there was no one but Kitty to talk to, he
did not forget to paint the name which he had given to his
new vessel, in her stern-sheets, where he could always see
it. She was called the Bridget Yardley; and,
notwithstanding
the unfavourable circumstances in which she had
been put together, Mark thought she did no discredit to
her beautiful namesake, when completed. When he had
everything finished, even to mast and sails, of the last of
which he fitted her with mainsail and jib, the young man
set about his preparations for getting his vessel afloat.
There was no process by which one man could move a
boat of the size of the Bridget, while out of its proper
element
,
but to launch it by means of regular ways. With a
view to this contingency, the keel had been laid between
the ways of the Neshamony, which were now all ready to
be used. Of course it was no great job to make a cradle
for a boat, and our boat-builder had `wedged up,' and got
the keel of his craft off the `blocks,' within eight-and-forty
hours after he had begun upon that part of his task. It
only remained to knock away the spur-shores and start
the boat. Until that instant, Mark had pursued his work
on the Bridget as mechanically and steadily as if hired by
the day. When, however, he perceived that he was so
near his goal, a flood of sensations came over the young
man, and his limbs trembled to a degree that compelled
him to be seated. Who could tell the consequences to
which that boat might lead? Who knew but the `Bridget'
might prove the means of carrying him to his own Bridget,
and restoring him to civilized life? At that instant, it
appeared to Mark as if his existence depended on the
launching of his boat, and he was fearful some unforeseen
accident might prevent it. He was obliged to wait several
minutes in order to recover his self-possession.
At length Mark succeeded in subduing this feeling, and
he resumed his work with most of his former self-command.
Everything being ready, he knocked away the spur-shores,
and, finding the boat did not start, he gave it a blow with
a mawl. This set the mass in motion, and the little craft
slid down the ways without any interruption, until it
became
water-born, when it shot out from the Reef like a
duck. Mark was delighted with his new vessel, now that
it was fairly afloat, and saw that it sat on an even keel,
according to his best hopes. Of course he had not
neglected
to secure it with a line, by which he hauled it in
towards the rock, securing it in a natural basin which was
just large enough for such a purpose. So great, indeed,
were his apprehensions of losing his boat, which now
seemed so precions to him, that he had worked some
ringbolts
out of the ship and let them into the rock, where he
had secured them by means of melted lead, in order to
make fast to.
The Bridget was not more than a fourth of the size of
the Neshamony, though rather more than half as long.
Nevertheless, she was a good boat; and Mark, knowing
that he must depend on sails principally to more her, had
built a short deck forward to prevent the seas from
breaking
aboard her, as well as to give him a place in which he
might stow away various articles, under cover from the
rain. Her ballast was breakers, filled with fresh water, of
which there still remained several in the ship. All these,
as well as her masts, sails, oars, &c., were in her when she
was launched; and that important event having taken
place early in the morning, Mark could not restrain his
impatience for a cruise, but determined to go out on the
Vol. I.  14
reef at once, further than he had ever yet ventured in the
dingui, in order to explore the seas around him.
Accordingly
,
he put some food on board, loosened his fasts, and
made sail.
The instant the boat moved ahead, and began to obey
her helm, Mark felt as if he had found a new companion.
Hitherto Kitty had, in a measure, filled this place; but a
boat had been the young man's delight on the Delaware,
in his boyhood, and he had not tacked his present craft
more than two or three times, before he caught himself
talking to it, and commending it, as he would a human
being. As the wind usually blew in the same direction,
and generally a good stiff breeze, Mark beat up between
the Reef and Guano Island, working round the weather end
of the former, until he came out at the anchorage of the
Rancocus. After beating about in that basin a little while,
as if merely to show off the Bridget to the ship, Mark put
the former close by the wind, and stood off in the channel
by which he and Bob had brought the latter into her
present
berth.
It was easy enough to avoid all such breakers as would
be dangerous to a boat, by simply keeping out of white
water; but the Bridget could pass over most of the reefs
with impunity, on account of the depth of the sea on them.
Mark beat up, on short tacks, therefore, until he found the
two buoys between which he had brought the ship, and
passing to windward of them, he stood off in the direction
where he expected to find the reef over which the
Rancocus
had beaten. He was not long in making this
discovery
.
There still floated the buoy of the bower, watching
as faithfully as the seaman on his look-out! Mark ran the
boat up to this well-tried sentinel, and caught the lanyard,
holding on by it, after lowering his sails.
The boat was now moored by the buoy-rope of the ship's
anchor, and it occurred to our young man that a certain
use might be made of this melancholy memorial of the
calamity
that had befallen the Rancocus. The anchor lay
quite near a reef, on it indeed in one sense; and it was in
such places that fish most abounded. Fishing-tackle was
in the boat, and Mark let down a line. His success was
prodigious. The fish were hauled in almost as fast as he
could bait and lower his hook, and what was more they
proved to be larger and finer than those taken at the old
fishing-grounds. By the experience of the half hour he
passed at the spot, Mark felt certain that he could fill his
boat there in a day's fishing. After hauling in some twenty
or thirty, however, he cast off from the lanyard, hoisted his
sails, and crossed the reef, still working to windward.
It was Mark's wish to learn something of the nature and
extent of the shoals in this direction. With this object in
view, he continued beating up, sometimes passing boldly
through shallow water, at others going about to avoid that
which he thought might be dangerous, until he believed
himself to be about ten miles to windward of the island.
The ship's masts were his beacon, for the crater had sunk
below the horizon, or if visible at all, it was only at
intervals
,
as the boat was lifted on a swell, when it appeared a
low hummock, nearly awash. It was with difficulty that
the naked spars could be seen at that distance; nor could
they be, except at moments, and that because the compass
told the young man exactly where to look for them.
As for the appearance of the reefs, no naked rock was
anywhere to be seen in this direction, though there were
abundant evidences of the existence of shoals. As well as
he could judge, Mark was of opinion that these shoals
extended
at least twenty miles in this direction, he having
turned up fully five leagues without getting clear of them.
At that distance from his solitary home, and out of sight
of everything like land, did the young man eat his frugal,
but good and nourishing dinner, with his jib-sheet to
windward
and the boat hove-to. The freshness of the breeze
had induced him to reef, and under that short sail, he found
the Bridget everything he could wish. It was now about
the middle of the afternoon, and Mark thought it prudent
to turn out his reef, and run down for the crater. In half
an hour he caught a sight of the spars of the ship; and ten
minutes later, the Summit appeared above the horizon.
It had been the intention of our young sailor to stay
out all night, had the weather been promising. His
wish was to ascertain how he might manage the boat,
single-handed, while he slept, and also to learn the extent
of the shoals. As the extraordinary fertility of the crater
superseded the necessity of his labouring much to keep
himself supplied with food, he had formed a plan of
cruising
off the shoals, for days at a time, in the hope of falling
in with something that was passing, and which might carry
him back to the haunts of men. No vessel would or could
come in sight of the crater, so long as the existence of the
reefs was known; but the course steered by the Rancocus
was a proof that ships did occasionally pass in that quarter
of the Pacific. Mark had indulged in no visionary hopes
on this subject, for he knew he might keep in the offing a
twelvemonth and see nothing; but an additional
twenty-four
hours might realize all his hopes.
The weather, however, on this his first experiment, did
not encourage him to remain out the whole night. On the
contrary, by the time the crater was in sight, Mark thought
he had not seen a more portentous-looking sky since he
had been on the Reef. There was a fiery redness in the
atmosphere that alarmed him, and he would have rejoiced
to be at home, in order to secure his stock within the
crater
.
From the appearances, he anticipated another
tempest
with its flood. It is true, it was not the season when
the last occurred, but the climate might admit of these
changes. The difference between summer and winter was
very trifling on that reef, and a hurricane, or a gale, was
as likely to occur in the one as in the other.
Just as the Bridget was passing the two buoys by which
the ship-channel had been marked, her sail flapped. This
was a bad omen, for it betokened a shift of wind, which
rarely happened, unless it might be from six months to six
months, without being the precursor of some sort of a storm.
Mark was still two miles from the Reef, and the little wind
there was soon came ahead. Luckily, it was smooth water,
and very little air sufficed to force that light craft ahead,
while there was usually a current setting from that point
towards the crater. The birds, moreover, seemed uneasy,
the air being filled with them, thousands flying over the
boat, around which they wheeled, screaming and
apparently
terrified. At first Mark ascribed this unusual
behaviour
of his feathered neighbours to the circumstance of
their now seeing a boat for the commencement of such an
acquaintance; but, recollecting how often he had passed
their haunts, in the dingui, when they would hardly get
out of the way, he soon felt certain there must be another
reason for this singular conduct.
The sun went down in a bank of lurid fire, and the
Bridget was still a mile from the ship. A new
apprehension
now came over our hermit. Should a tempest bring
the wind violently from the westward, as was very likely
to be the case under actual circumstances, he might be
driven out to sea, and, did the little craft resist the waves,
forced so far off as to make him lose the Reef altogether.
Then it was that Mark deeply felt how much had been
left him, by casting his lot on that beautiful and luxuriant
crater, instead of reducing him to those dregs of misery
which so many shipwrecked mariners are compelled to
swallow! How much, or how many of the blessings that
he enjoyed on the Reef, would he not have been willing
to part with, that evening, in order to secure a safe arrival
at the side of the Rancocus! By the utmost care to profit
by every puff of air, and by handling the boat with the
greatest skill, this happy result was obtained, however,
without any sacrifice.
About nine o'clock, and not sooner, the boat was well
secured, and Mark went into his cabin. Here he knelt
and returned thanks to God, for his safe return to a place
that was getting to be as precious to him as the love of life
could render it. After this, tired with his day's work, the
young man got into his berth and endeavoured to sleep.
The fatigue of the day, notwithstanding the invigorating
freshness of the breeze, acted as an anodyne, and our
young man soon forgot his adventures and his boat, in
profound slumbers. It was many hours ere Mark awoke,
and when he did, it was with a sense of suffocation. At
first he thought the ship had taken fire, a lurid light
gleaming
in at the open door of the cabin, and he sprang to his
feet in recollection of the danger he ran from the
magazine
,
as well as from being burned. But no cracking of
flames reaching his ears, he dressed hastily and went out
on the poop. He had just reached this deck, when he felt
the whole ship tremble from her truck to her keel, and a
rushing of water was heard on all sides of him, as if a flood
were coming. Hissing sounds were heard, and streams
14 *
of fire, and gleams of lurid light were seen in the air. It
was a terrible moment, and one that might well induce any
man to imagine that time was drawing to its close.
Mark Woolston now comprehended his situation,
notwithstanding
the intense darkness which prevailed, except
in those brief intervals of lurid light. He had felt the
shock of an earthquake, and the volcano had suddenly
become
active. Smoke and ashes certainly filled the air, and
our poor hermit instinctively looked towards his crater,
already so verdant and lively, in the expectation of
seeing
it vomit flames. Everything there was tranquil; the
danger, if danger there was, was assuredly more remote.
But the murky vapour which rendered breathing
exceedingly
difficult, also obstructed the view, and prevented his
seeing where the explosion really was. For a brief space
our young man fancied he must certainly be suffocated;
but a shift of wind came, and blew away the oppressive
vapour, clearing the atmosphere of its sulphurous and most
offensive gases and odours. Never did feverish tongue
enjoy the cooling and healthful draught, more than Mark
rejoiced in this change. The wind had got back to its old
quarter, and the air he respired soon became pure and
refreshing
.
Had the impure atmosphere lasted ten minutes
longer, Mark felt persuaded he could not have breathed it
with any safety.
The light was now most impatiently expected by our
young man. The minutes seemed to drag; but, at length,
the usual signs of returning day became apparent to him,
and he got on the bowsprit of the ship, as if to meet it in
its approach. There he stood looking to the eastward,
eager to have ray after ray shoot into the firmament, when
he was suddenly struck with a change in that quarter of
the ocean, which at once proclaimed the power of the effort
which the earth had made in its subterranean throes.
Naked rocks appeared in places where Mark was certain
water in abundance had existed a few hours before. The
sea-wall, directly ahead of the ship, and which never showed
itself above the surface more than two or three inches, in
any part of it, and that only at exceedingly neap tides,
was now not only bare for a long distance, but parts rose
ten and fifteen feet above the surrounding sea. This
proved, at once, that the earthquake had thrust upward a
vast surface of the reef, completely altering the whole
appearance
of the shoal! In a word, nature had made another
effort, and islands had been created, as it might be in the
twinkling of an eye.
Mark was no sooner assured of this stupendous fact, than
he hurried on to the poop, in order to ascertain what
changes had occurred in and about the crater. It had
been pushed upward, in common with all the rocks for
miles on every side of it, though without disturbing its
surface! By the computation of our young man, the Reef,
which previously lay about six feet above the level of the
ocean, was now fully twenty, so many cubits having been,
by one single but mighty effort of nature, added to its
stature
.
The planks which led from the stern of the vessel
to the shore, and which had formed a descent, were now
nearly level, so much water having left the basin as to
produce
this change. Still the ship floated, enough remaining
to keep her keel clear of the bottom.
Impatient to learn all, Mark ran ashore, for by this time
it was broad daylight, and hastened into the crater, with
an intention to ascend at once to the Summit. As he
passed along, he could detect no change whatever on the
surface of the Reef; everything lying just as it had been
left, and the pigs and poultry were at their usual business
of providing for their own wants. Ashes, however, were
strewn over the rocks to a depth that left his footprints as
distinct as they could have been made in a light snow.
Within the crater the same appearances were observed,
fully an inch of ashes covering its verdant pastures and the
whole garden. This gave Mark very little concern, for
he knew that the first rain would wash this drab-looking
mantle into the earth, where it would answer all the
purposes
of a rich dressing of manure.
On reaching the Summit, our young man was enabled
to form a better opinion of the vast changes which had
been wrought around him, by this sudden elevation of the
earth's crust. Everywhere sea seemed to be converted
into land, or, at least, into rock. All the white water had
disappeared, and in its place arose islands of rock, or
mud, or sand. A good deal of the last was to be seen, and
some quite near the Reef, as we shall still continue to call
the island of the crater. Island, however, it could now
hardly be termed. It is true that ribands of water
approached
it on all sides, resembling creeks, and rivers and
small sounds; but, as Mark stood there on the Summit, it
seemed to him that it was now possible to walk for leagues,
in every direction, commencing at the crater and following
the lines of reefs, and rocks, and sands, that had been laid
bare by the late upheaving. The extent of this change
gave him confidence in its permanency, and the young man
had hopes that what had thus been produced by the
Providence
of God would be permitted to remain, to answer his
own benevolent purposes. It certainly made an immense
difference in his own situation. The boat could still be
used, but it was now possible for him to ramble for hours,
if not for days, along the necks, and banks, and hummocks,
and swales that had been formed, and that with a dry foot.
His limits were so much enlarged as to offer something
like a new world to his enterprise and curiosity.
The crater, nevertheless, was apparently about the centre
of this new creation. To the south, it is true, the eye
could not penetrate more than two or three leagues. A
vast, dun-looking cloud, still covered the sea in that
direction
,
veiling its surface far and wide, and mingling with
the vapours of the upper atmosphere. Somewhere within
this cloud, how far or how near from him he knew not,
Mark made no doubt a new outlet to the pent forces of the
inner earth was to be found, forming another and an active
crater for the exit of the fires beneath. Geology was a
science that had not made its present progress in the day
of Mark Woolston, but his education had been too good to
leave him totally without a theory for what had happened.
He supposed that the internal fires had produced so much
gas, just beneath this spot, as to open crevices at the
bottom
of the ocean, through which water had flowed in
sufficient
quantities to create a vast body of steam, which steam
had been the immediate agent of lifting so much of the
rock and land, and of causing the earthquake. At the
same time, the internal fires had acted in concert; and
following an opening, they had got so near the surface as
to force a chimney for their own exit, in the form of this
new crater, of the existence of which, from all the signs to
the southward, Mark did not entertain the smallest doubt.
This theory may have been true, in whole or in part, or
it may have been altogether erroneous. Such speculations
seldom turn out to be minutely accurate. So many
unknown
causes exist in so many unexpected forms, as to
render precise estimates of their effects, in cases of physical
phenomena, almost as uncertain as those which follow
similar attempts at an analysis of human motives and
human
conduct. The man who has been much the subject
of the conjectures and opinions of his fellow-creatures, in
this way, must have many occasions to wonder, and some
to smile, when he sees how completely those around him
misjudge his wishes and impulses. Although formed of
the same substance, influenced by the same selfishness,
and governed by the same passions, in nothing do men
oftener err than in this portion of the exercise of their
intellects
.
The errors arise from one man's rigidly judging
his fellow by himself, and that which he would do he
fancies
others would do also. This rule would be pretty safe,
could we always penetrate into the wants and longings of
others, which quite as often fail to correspond closely with
our own, as do their characters, fortunes, and hopes.
At first sight, Mark had a good deal of difficulty in
understanding
the predominant nature of the very many
bodies of water that were to be seen on every side of him.
On the whole, there still remained almost as much of one
element as of the other, in the view; which of itself,
however
,
was a vast change from what had previously been the
condition of the shoals. There were large bodies of water,
little lakes in extent, which it was obvious enough must
disappear under the process of evaporation, no
communication
existing between them and the open ocean. But,
on the other hand, many of these sheets were sounds, or
arms of the sea, that must always continue, since they
might be traced, far as eye could reach, towards the mighty
Pacific. Such, Mark was induced to believe, was the fact
with the belt of water that still surrounded, or nearly
surrounded
the Reef; for, placed where he was, the young
man was unable to ascertain whether the latter had, or had
not, at a particular point, any land communication with an
extensive range of naked rock, sand, mud, and deposit,
that stretched away to the westward, for leagues. In
obvious
connection with this broad reach of what might be
termed bare ground, were Guano and Loam Islands;
neither
of which was an island any longer, except as it was a
part of the whole formation around it. Nevertheless, our
young man was not sorry to see that the channel around
the Reef still washed the bases of both those important
places of deposit, leaving it in his power to transport their
valuable manures by means of the raft, or boat.
The situation of the ship next became the matter of
Mark's most curious and interested investigation. She
was clearly afloat, and the basin in which she rode had a
communication on each side of it, with the sound, or inlet,
that still encircled the Reef. Descending to the shore,
our young mariner got into the dingui, and pulled out round
the vessel, to make a more minute examination. So very
limpid was the water of that sea, it was easy enough to
discern a bright object on the bottom, at a depth of several
fathoms. There were no streams in that part of the world
to pour their deposits into the ocean, and air itself is
scarce more transparent than the pure water of the ocean,
when unpolluted with any foreign substances. All it wants
is light, to enable the eye to reach into its mysteries for a
long way. Mark could very distinctly perceive the sand
beneath the Rancocus' keel, and saw that the ship still
floated two or three feet clear of the bottom. It was near
high water, however; and there being usually a tide of
about twenty inches, it was plain enough that, on certain
winds, the good old craft would come in pretty close
contact
with the bottom. All expectation of ever getting the
vessel out of the basin must now be certainly abandoned,
since she lay in a sort of cavity, where the water was six
or eight feet deeper than it was within a hundred yards on
each side of her.
Having ascertained these facts, Mark provided himself
with a fowling-piece, provisions, &c., and set out to
explore
his newly acquired territories on foot. His steps
were first directed to the point where it appeared to the
eye, that the vast range of dry land to the westward,
extending
both north and south, had become connected with
the Reef. If such connection existed at all, it was by two
very narrow necks of rock, of equal height, both of which
had come up out of the water under the late action, which
action had considerably altered and extended the shores
of Crater Island. Sand appeared in various places along
these shores, now; whereas, previously to the earthquake,
they had everywhere been nearly perpendicular rocks.
Mark was walking, with an impatient step, towards the
neck just mentioned, and which was at no great distance
from the ship-yard, when his eye was attracted towards a
sandy beach of several acres in extent, that spread itself
along the margin of the rocks, as clear from every impurity
as it was a few hours before, when it had been raised from
out of the bosom of the ocean. To him, it appeared that
water was trickling through this sand, coming from beneath
the lava of the Reef. At first, he supposed it was merely
the remains of some small portion of the ocean that had
penetrated to a cavity within, and which was now trickling
back through the crevices of the rocks, to find its level,
under the great law of nature. But it looked so pleasant
to see once more water of any sort coming upwards from
the earth, that the young man jumped down upon the sands,
and hastened to the spot for further inquiry. Scooping up
a little of the water in the hollow of his hand, he found it
sweet, soft, and deliciously cool. Here was a discovery,
indeed! The physical comfort for which he most pined
was thus presented to him, as by a direct gift from heaven;
and no miser who had found a hoard of hidden gold, could
have felt so great pleasure, or a tenth part of the gratitude,
of our young hermit, if hermit we may call one who did
not voluntarily seek his seclusion from the world, and who
worshipped God less as a penance than from love and
adoration.
Before quitting this new-found treasure, Mark opened a
cavity in the sand to receive the water, placing stone around
it to make a convenient and clean little basin. In ten
minutes this place was filled with water almost as limpid
as air, and every way as delicious as the palate of man
could require. The young man could scarce tear himself
away from the spot, but fearful of drinking too much he
did so, after a time. Before quitting the spring, however,
he placed a stone of some size at a gap in the rock, a
precaution
that completely prevented the hogs, should they
stroll that way, from descending to the beach and defiling
the limpid basin. As soon as he had leisure, Mark
resolved
to sink a barrel in the sand, and to build a fence
around it; after which the stock might descend and drink
at a pool he should form below, at pleasure.
Mark proceeded. On reaching the narrowest part of
the `Neck,' he found that the rocks did not meet, but the
Reef still remained an island. The channel that separated
the two points of rock was only about twenty feet wide,
however, though it was of fully twice that depth. The
young man found it necessary to go back to the ship-yard
(no great distance, by the way), and to bring a plank with
which to make a bridge. This done, he passed on to the
newly emerged territory. As might have been expected,
the rocks were found tolerably well furnished with fish,
which had got caught in pools and crevices when the water
flowed into the sea; and what was of still more importance,
another and a much larger spring of fresh water was found
quite near the bridge, gushing through a deposit of sand
of some fifteen or twenty acres in extent. The water of
this spring had run down into a cavity, where it had already
formed a little lake of some two acres in surface, and
whence it was already running into the sea, by overflowing
its banks. These two discoveries induced Mark to return
to the Reef again, in quest of the stock. After laying
another plank at his bridge, he called every creature he
had over into the new territory; for so great was the
command
he had obtained over even the ducks, that all came
willingly at his call. As for Kitty, she was never more
happy than when trotting at his side, accompanying him
in his walks, like a dog.
Glad enough were the pigs, in particular, to obtain this
new range. Here was everything they could want; food
in thousands, sand to root on, fresh water to drink, pools
to wallow in, and a range for their migratory propensities.
Mark had no sooner set them at work on the sea-weed and
shell-fish that abounded there, for the time being at least,
than he foresaw he should have to erect a gate at his
bridge, and keep the hogs here most of the time. With
such a range, and the deposits of the tides alone, they
would have no great difficulty in making their own living.
This would enable him to increase the number kept, which
he had hitherto been obliged to keep down with the most
rigid attention to the increase.
Mark now set out, in earnest, on his travels. He was
absent from the Reef the entire day. At one time, he
thought he was quite two leagues in a straight line from
the ship, though he had been compelled to walk four to
get there. Everywhere he found large sheets of salt water,
that had been left on the rocks, in consequence of the
cavities
in the latter. In several instances, these little lakes
were near a mile in length, having the most beautifully
undulating outlines. None of them were deep, of course,
though their bottoms varied. Some of these bottoms were
clean rock; others contained large deposits of mud; and
others, again, were of a clean, dark-coloured sand. One,
and one only, had a bottom of a bright, light-coloured sand.
As a matter of course, these lakes, or pools, must shortly
evaporate, leaving their bottoms bare, or encrusted with
salt. One thing gave the young man great satisfaction.
He had kept along the margin of the channel that
communicated
with the water that surrounded the Reef, and,
when at the greatest distance from the crater, he ascended
a rock that must have had an elevation of a hundred feet
above the sea. Of course most of this rock had been above
water previously to the late eruption, and Mark had often
seen it at a distance, though he had never ventured through
the white water near so far, in the dingui. When on its
apex, Mark got an extensive view of the scene around him.
In the first place, he traced the channel just mentioned,
quite into open water, which now appeared distinctly not
many leagues further, towards the north-west. There were
a great many other channels, some mere ribands of water,
others narrow sounds, and many resembling broad, deep,
serpenting creeks, which last was their true character,
being strictly inlets from the sea. The lakes, or pools,
could be seen in hundreds, creating some confusion in the
view; but all these must soon disappear, in that climate.
Towards the southward, however, Mark found the objects
of his greatest wonder and admiration. By the time he
Vol. I.  15
reached the apex of the rock, the smoke in that quarter
of the horizon had, in a great measure, risen from the sea;
though a column of it continued to ascend towards a vast,
dun-coloured cloud that overhung the place. To Mark's
astonishment he had seen some dark, dense body first
looming through the rising vapour. When the last was
sufficiently removed, a high, ragged mountain became
distinctly visible. He thought it arose at least a thousand
feet above the ocean, and that it could not be less than a
league in extent. This exhibition of the power of nature
filled the young man's soul with adoration and reverence
for the mighty Being that could set such elements at work.
It did not alarm him, but rather tended to quiet his
longings
to quit the place; for he who lives amid such scenes
feels that he is so much nearer to the arm of God than
those who dwell in uniform security, as to think less of
ordinary advantages than is common.
Mark knew that there must have been a dislocation of
the rocks, to produce such a change as that he saw to the
southward. It was well for him it occurred there at a
distance
,
as he then thought, of ten or fifteen miles from the
Reef, though in truth it was at quite fifty, instead of
happening
beneath him. It was possible, however, for one
to have been on the top of that mountain, and to have
lived through the late change, could the lungs of man have
breathed the atmosphere. Not far from this mountain a
column of smoke rose out of the sea, and Mark fancied
that, at moments, he could discern the summit of an active
crater at its base.
After gazing at these astonishing changes for a long
time, our young man descended from the height and
retraced
his steps homeward. Kitty gladly preceded him,
and some time after the sun had set, they regained the
Reef. About a mile short of home, Mark passed all the
hogs, snugly deposited in a bed of mud, where they had
esconced themselves for the night, as one draws himself
beneath his blanket.
CHAPTER XII.
All things in common nature should produce
Without sweat or endeavour; treason, felony,
Sword, pike, gun, or need of any engine
Would I not have; but nature should bring forth,
Of its own kind, all foizen, all abundance
To feed my innocent people.
Tempest
.
For
the next ten days Mark Woolston did little but
explore
.
By crossing the channel around the Reef, which
he had named the `Armlet' (the young man often talked
to himself), he reached the sea-wall, and, once there, he
made a long excursion to the eastward. He now walked
dryshod over those very reefs among which he had so
recently
sailed in the Bridget, though the ship-channel through
which he and Bob had brought in the Rancocus still
remained
.
The two buoys that had marked the narrow
passage
were found, high and dry; and the anchor of the ship,
that by which she rode after beating over the rocks into
deep water, was to be seen so near the surface, that the
stock could be reached by the hand.
There was little difference in character between the
newly-made land to windward and that which Mark had
found in the opposite direction. Large pools, or lakes, of
salt water, deposits of mud and sand, some of which were
of considerable extent and thickness, sounds, creeks, and
arms of the sea, with here and there a hummock of rock
that rose fifteen or twenty feet above the face of the main
body, were the distinguishing peculiarities. For two days
Mark explored in this direction, or to windward, reaching
as far by his estimate of the distance, as the place where
he had bore up in his cruise in the Bridget. Finding a
great many obstacles in the way, channels, mud, &c., he
determined, on the afternoon of the second day, to return
home, get a stock of supplies, and come out in the boat,
in order to ascertain if he could not now reach the open
water to windward.
On the morning of the fourth day after the earthquake,
and the occurrence of the mighty change that had altered
the whole face of the scene around him, the young man
got under way in the Bridget. He shaped his course to
windward, beating out of the Armlet by a narrow passage,
that carried him into a reach that stretched away for several
miles, to the northward and eastward, in nearly a straight
line. This passage, or sound, was about half a mile in
width, and there was water enough in nearly all parts of it
to float the largest sized vessel. By this passage the poor
hermit, small as was his chance of ever seeing such an
event occur, hoped it might be possible to come to the
very side of the Reef in a ship.
When about three leagues from the crater, the `Hope
Channel,' as Mark named this long and direct passage,
divided into two, one trending still more to the northward,
running nearly due north, indeed, while the other might
be followed in a south-easterly direction, far as the eye
could reach. Mark named the rock at the junction `Point
Fork,' and chose the latter passage, which appeared the
most promising, and the wind permitting him to lay through
it. The Bridget tacked in the Forks, therefore, and stood
away to the south-east, pretty close to the wind. Various
other channels communicated with this main passage, or
the Hope; and, about noon, Mark tacked into one of them,
heading about north-east, when trimmed up sharp to do so.
The water was deep, and at first the passage was half a
mile in width; but after standing along it for a mile or two,
it seemed all at once to terminate in an oval basin, that
might have been a mile in its largest diameter, and which
was bounded to the eastward by a belt of rock that rose
some twenty feet above the water. The bottom of this
basin was a clear beautiful sand, and its depth of water,
on sounding, Mark found was uniformly about eight
fathoms
.
A more safe or convenient basin for the anchorage
of ships could not have been formed by the art of man,
had there been an entrance to it, and any inducement for
them to come there.
Mark had beaten about `Oval Harbour,' as he named
the place, for half an hour, before he was struck by the
circumstance that the even character of its surface appeared
to be a little disturbed by a slight undulation which seemed
to come from its north-eastern extremity. Tacking the
Bridget, he stood in that direction, and on reaching the
place, found that there was a passage through the rock of
about a hundred yards in width. The wind permitting,
the boat shot through this passage, and was immediately
heaving and setting in the long swells of the open ocean.
At first Mark was startled by the roar of the waves that
plunged into the caverns of the rocks, and trembled lest
his boat might be hove up against that hard and iron-bound
coast, where one toss would shatter his little craft into
splinters. Too steady a seaman, however, to abandon his
object unnecessarily, he stood on, and soon found he could
weather the rocks under his lee, tacking in time. After
two or three short stretches were made, Mark found
himself
half a mile to windward of a long line, or coast, of
dark rock, that rose from twenty to twenty-five feet above
the level of the water, and beyond all question in the open
ocean. He hove-to to sound, and let forty fathoms of line
out without reaching bottom. But everywhere to leeward
of him was land, or rock; while everywhere to windward,
as well as ahead and astern, it was clear water. This,
then, was the eastern limit of the old shoals, now converted
into dry land. Here the Rancocus had, unknown to her
officers, first run into the midst of these shoals, by which
she had ever since been environed.
It was not easy to compute the precise distance from the
outlet or inlet of Oval Harbour, to the crater. Mark
thought it might be five-and-twenty miles, in a straight
line, judging equally by the eye, and the time he had been
in running it. The Summit was not to be seen, however,
any more than the masts of the ship; though the distant
Peak, and the column of dark smoke, remained in sight,
as eternal land-marks. The young man might have been
an hour in the open sea, gradually hauling off the land, in
order to keep clear of the coast, when he bethought him
of returning. It required a good deal of nerve to run in
towards those rocks, under all the circumstances of the
case. The wind blew fresh, so much indeed as to induce
15 *
Mark to reef, but there must always be a heavy swell
rolling
in upon that iron-bound shore. The shock of such
waves expending their whole force on perpendicular rocks
may be imagined better than it can be described. There
was an undying roar all along that coast, produced by these
incessant collisions of the elements; and occasionally,
when a sea entered a cavern, in a way suddenly to expel
its air, the sound resembled that which some huge animal
might be supposed to utter in its agony, or its anger. Of
course, the spray was flying high, and the entire line of
black rocks was white with its particles.
Mark had unwittingly omitted to take any land-marks
to his inlet, or strait. He had no other means of finding
it, therefore, than to discover a spot in which the line of
white was broken. This inlet, however, he remembered
did not open at right angles to the coast, but obliquely;
and it was very possible to be within a hundred yards of
it, and not see it. This fact our young sailor was not long
in ascertaining; for standing in towards the point where
he expected to find the entrance, and going as close to the
shore as he dared, he could see nothing of the desired
passage
.
For an hour did he search, passing to and fro, but
without success. The idea of remaining out in the open
sea for the night, and to windward of such an inhospitable
coast, was anything but pleasant to Mark, and he
determined
to stand to the northward, now, while it was day,
and look for some other entrance.
For four hours did Mark Woolston run along those dark
rocks, whitened only by the spray of the wide ocean,
without
perceiving a point at which a boat might even land.
As he was now running off the wind, and had turned out
his reef, he supposed he must have gone at least
five-and-twenty
miles, if not thirty, in that time; and thus had he
some means of judging of the extent of his new territories.
About five in the afternoon a cape, or headland, was
reached, when the coast suddenly trended to the westward.
This, then, was the north-eastern angle of the entire
formation
,
and Mark named it Cape North-East. The boat
was now jibed, and ran off west, a little northerly, for
another
hour, keeping quite close in to the coast, which was
no longer dangerous as soon as the Cape was doubled.
The seas broke upon the rocks, as a matter of course; but
there being a lee, it was only under the power of the
ceaseless undulations of the ocean. Even the force of the
wind was now much less felt, the Bridget carrying whole
sail when hauled up, as Mark placed her several times, in
order to examine apparent inlets.
It was getting to be too late to think of reaching home
that night, for running in those unknown channels after
dark was not a desirable course for an explorer to adopt.
Our young man, therefore, limited his search to some place
where he might lie until the return of light. It is true,
the lee formed by the rocks was now such as to enable him
to remain outside, with safety, until morning; but he
preferred
greatly to get within the islands, if possible, to
trusting
himself, while asleep, to the mercy of the open ocean.
Just as the sun was setting, leaving the evening cool and
pleasant, after the warmth of an exceedingly hot day, the
boat doubled a piece of low headland; and Mark had half
made up his mind to get under its lee, and heave a grapnel
ashore, in order to ride by his cable during the
approaching
night, when an opening in the coast greeted his eyes.
It was just as he doubled the cape. This opening appeared
to be a quarter of a mile in width, and it had perfectly
smooth water, a half-gunshot within its mouth. The helm
was put down, the sheets hauled aft, and the Bridget luffed
into this creek, estuary, sound, or harbour, whichever it
might prove to be. For twenty minutes did Mark stand
on through this passage, when suddenly it expanded into
a basin, or bay, of considerable extent. This was at a
distance of about a league within the coast. This bay was
a league long, and half a league in width, the boat entering
it close to its weather side. A long and wide sandy beach
offered on that side, and the young man stood along it a
short distance, until the sight of a spring induced him to
put his helm down. The boat luffed short round, and
came gently upon the beach. A grapnel was thrown on
the sands, and Mark leaped ashore.
The water proved to be sweet, cool, and every way
delicious
.
This was at least the twentieth spring which had
been seen that day, though it was the first of which the
waters had been tasted. This new-born beach had every
appearance of having been exposed to the air a thousand
years. The sand was perfectly clean, and of a bright
golden colour, and it was well strewed with shells of the
most magnificent colours and size. The odour of their
late tenants alone proclaimed the fact of their recent
shipwreck
.
This, however, was an evil that a single month
would repair; and our sailor determined to make another
voyage to this bay, which he called Shell Bay, in order to
procure some of its treasures. It was true he could not
place them before the delighted eyes of Bridget, but he
might arrange them in his cabin, and fancy that she was
gazing at their beauties. After drinking at the spring,
and supping on the rocks above, Mark arranged a mattress,
provided for that purpose, in the boat, and went to sleep.
Early next morning the Bridget was again under way,
but not until her owner had both bathed and broken his
fast. Bathe he did every morning throughout the year,
and occasionally at night also. A day of exertion usually
ended with a bath, as did a night of sweet repose also. In
all these respects no one could be more fortunate. From
the first, food had been abundant; and now he possessed
it in superfluity, including the wants of all dependent on
him. Of clothes, also, he had an inexhaustible supply, a
small portion of the cargo consisting of coarse cotton
jackets and trousers, with which to purchase sandal-wood.
To these means, delicious water was now added in
inexhaustible
quantities. The late changes had given to Mark's
possession territory sufficient to occupy him months, even
in exploring it thoroughly, as it was his purpose to do.
God was there, also, as he is everywhere. This our
secluded
man found to be a most precious consolation.
Again and again, each day, was he now in the practice of
communing in spirit, directly with his Creator; not in cold
and unmeaning forms and commonplaces, but with such
yearning of the soul, and such feelings of love and
reverence
,
as an active and living faith can alone, by the aid
of the Divine Spirit, awaken in the human breast.
After crossing Shell Bay, the Bridget continued on for
a couple of hours, running south, westerly, through a
passage
of a good width, until it met another channel, at a
point which Mark at once recognized as the Forks. When
at Point Fork, he had only to follow the track he had
come the previous day, in order to arrive at the Reef.
The crater could be seen from the Forks, and there was
consequently a beacon in sight, to direct the adventurer,
had he wanted such assistance; which he did not,
however
,
since he now recognized objects perfectly well as he
advanced. About ten o'clock he ran alongside of the ship,
where he found everything as he had left it. Lighting the
fire, he put on food sufficient to last him for another cruise,
and then went up into the cross-trees in order to take a
better look than he had yet obtained, of the state of things
to the southward.
By this time the vast murky cloud that had so long
overhung
the new outlet of the volcano, was dispersed. It was
succeeded by one of ordinary size, in which the thread of
smoke that arose from the crater, terminated. Of course
the surrounding atmosphere was clear, and nothing but
distance obstructed the view. The Peak was indeed a
sublime sight, issuing, as it did, from the ocean without
any relief. Mark now began to think he had
miscalculated
its height, and that it might be
two
thousand feet,
instead of one, above the water. There it was, in all its
glory, blue and misty, but ragged and noble. The crater
was clearly many miles beyond it, the young man being
satisfied, after this look, that he had not yet seen its
summit
.
He also increased his distance from Vulcan's Peak,
as he named the mountain, to ten leagues, at least. After
sitting in the cross-trees for fully an hour, gazing at this
height with as much pleasure as the connoisseur ever
studied
picture, or statue, the young man determined to
attempt
a voyage to that place, in the Bridget. To him,
such an expedition had the charm of the novelty and
change which a journey from country to town could bring
to the wearied worldling, who sighed for the enjoyment
of his old haunts, after a season passed in the ennui of his
country-house. It is true, great novelties had been
presented
to our solitary youth, by the great changes wrought
immediately in his neighbourhood, and they had now kept
him for a week in a condition of high excitement; but
nothing they presented could equal the interest he felt in
that distant mountain, which had arisen so suddenly in a
horizon that he had been accustomed to see bare of any
object but clouds, for near eighteen months.
That afternoon Mark made all his preparations for a
voyage that he felt might be one of great moment to him.
All the symptoms of convulsions in the earth, however,
had ceased; even the rumbling sounds which he had heard,
or imagined, in the stillness of the night, being no longer
audible. From that source, therefore, he had no great
apprehensions of danger; though there was a sort of dread
majesty in the exhibition of the power of nature that he
had so lately witnessed, which disposed him to approach
the scene of its greatest effort with secret awe. So much
did he think of the morrow and its possible consequences,
that he did not get asleep for two or three hours, though
he awoke in the morning unconscious of any want of rest.
An hour later, he was in his boat, and under way.
Mark had now to steer in an entirely new direction,
believing, from what he had seen while aloft the day
before
,
that he could make his way out into the open ocean
by proceeding a due south course. In order to do this,
and to get into the most promising-looking channel in that
direction, he was obliged to pass through the narrow strait
that separated the Reef from the large range of rock over
which he had roamed the day succeeding the earthquake.
Of course, the bridge was removed, in order to allow the
boat's mast to pass; but for this, Mark did not care. He
had seen his stock the previous evening, and saw that it
wanted for nothing. Even the fowls had gone across to
the new territory, on exploring expeditions; and Kitty
herself had left her sweet pastures on the Summit, to see
of what the world was made beyond her old range. It is
true she had made one journey in that quarter, in the
company
of her master; but, one journey no more satisfied her
than it would have satisfied the curiosity of any other
female.
After passing the bridge, the boat entered a long narrow
reach, that extended at least two leagues, in nearly a direct
line towards Vulcan's Peak. As it approached the end of
this piece of water, Mark saw that he must enter a bay of
considerable extent; one, indeed, that was much larger
than any he had yet seen in his island, or, to speak more
accurately, his group of islands. On one side of this bay
appeared a large piece of level land, or a plain, which
Mark supposed might cover one or two thousand acres.
Its colour was so different from anything he had yet seen,
that our young man was induced to land, and to walk a
short distance to examine it. On reaching its margin, it
was found to be a very shallow basin, of which the bottom
was mud, with a foot or two of salt water still remaining,
and in which sea-weed, some ten or twelve inches in
thickness
,
was floating. It was almost possible for Mark to
walk on this weed, the green appearance of which induced
him to name the place the Prairie. Such a collection of
weed could only have been owing to the currents, which
must have brought it into this basin, where it was probably
retained even previously to the late eruption. The
presence
of the deposit of mud, as well as the height of the
surrounding rocks, many of which were doubtless out of
water previously to the phenomenon, went to corroborate
this opinion.
After working her way through a great many channels,
some wide and some narrow, some true and some false,
the Bridget reached the southern verge of the group, about
noon. Mark then supposed himself to be quite twenty
miles from the Reef, and the Peak appeared very little
nearer than when he left it. This startled him on the
score of distance; and, after meditating on all his chances,
the young man determined to pass the remainder of that
day where he was, in order to put to sea with as much
daylight before him as possible. He desired also to
explore
the coast and islands in that vicinity, in order to
complete his survey of the cluster. He looked for a
convenient
place to anchor his boat, accordingly, ate his
dinner
,
and set out on foot to explore, armed as usual with a
fowling-piece.
In the first place, an outlet to the sea very different from
that on the eastern side of the group, was found here, on
its southern. The channel opened into a bay of some size,
with an arm of rock reaching well off on the weather side,
so that no broken water was encountered in passing into
or out of it, provided one kept sufficiently clear of the
point itself. As there was abundance of room, Mark saw
he should have no difficulty in getting out into open water,
here, or in getting back again. What was more, the arm,
or promontory of rock just mentioned, had a hummock
near a hundred feet in height on its extremity, that
answered
admirably for a land-mark. Most of this hummock
must have been above water previously to the late
eruption
,
though it appeared to our explorer, that all the visible
land, as he proceeded south, was lifted higher and on a
gradually-increasing scale, as if the eruption had exerted
its force at a certain point, the new crater for instance,
and raised the earth to the northward of that point, on an
inclined plane. This might account, in a measure, for the
altitude of the Peak, which was near the great crevice that
must have been left somewhere, unless materials on its
opposite
side had fallen to fill it up again. Most of these
views were merely speculative, though the fact of the greater
elevation of all the rocks, in this part of the group, over
those further north, was beyond dispute. Thus the coast,
here, was generally fifty or eighty feet high; whereas, at
the Reef, even now, the surface of the common rock was
not much more than twenty feet above the water. The
rise seemed to be gradual, moreover, which certainly
favoured
this theory.
As a great deal of sand and mud had been brought up
by the eruption, there was no want of fresh water. Mark
found even a little brook, of as perfectly sweet a stream as
he had ever tasted in America, running into the little
harbour
where he had secured the boat. He followed this
stream two miles, ere he reached its source, or sources;
for it came from at least a dozen copious springs, that
poured their tribute from a bed of clean sand several miles
in length, and which had every sign of having been bare
for ages. In saying this, however, it is not to be supposed
that the signs, as to time, were very apparent anywhere.
Lava, known to have been ejected from the bowels of the
earth thousands of years, has just as fresh an appearance,
to the ordinary observer, as that which was thrown out ten
years ago; and, had it not been for the deposits of moist
mud, the remains of fish, sea-weed that was still
undecayed
,
pools of salt water, and a few other peculiarities of
the same sort, Mark would have been puzzled to find any
difference between the rocks recently thrown up, and those
which were formerly exposed to the air. Even the mud
was fast changing its appearance, cracking and drying
under the sun of the tropics. In a month or two, should
as much rain as usual fall, it was probable the sea-weed
would be far gone in decay.
It was still early when our adventurer kneeled on the
sand, near his boat, to hold his last direct communication
with his Creator, ere he slept. Those communications
were now quite frequent with Mark, it being no unusual
thing for him to hold them when sailing in his boat, on the
deck of the ship, or in the soft salubrious air of the
Summit
.
He slept none the less soundly for having
commended
his soul to God, asking support against
temptations
,
and forgiveness for past sins. These prayers were
usually very short. More than half the time they were
expressed in the compendious and beautiful words given
to man by Christ himself, the model and substance of all
petitions of this nature. But the words were devoutly
uttered
,
the heart keeping even pace with them, and the soul
fully submitting to their influence.
Mark arose, next morning, two hours before the light
appeared, and at once left the group. Time was now
important
to him; for, while he anticipated the possibility of
remaining under the lee of the mountain during the
succeeding
night, he also anticipated the possibility of being
compelled to return. In a favourable time, with the wind
a little free, five knots in the hour was about the maximum
of the boat's rate of sailing, though it was affected by the
greater or less height of the sea that was on. When the
waves ran heavily, the Bridget's low sails got becalmed
in the troughs, and she consequently lost much of her way.
On the whole, however, five knots might be set down as
her average speed, under the pressure of the ordinary
trades, and with whole canvas, and a little off the wind.
Close-hauled, she scarcely made more than three; while,
with the wind on the quarter, she often went seven,
especially
in smooth water.
The course steered was about a point to the westward
of south, the boat running altogether by compass, for the
first two hours. At the end of that time day returned,
Vol. I.  16
and the dark, frowning Peak itself became visible. The
sun had no sooner risen, than Mark felt satisfied with his
boat's performance. Objects began to come out of the
mass of the mountain, which no longer appeared a pile of
dark outline, without detail. He expected this, and was
even disappointed that his eyes could not command more,
for he now saw that he had materially underrated the
distance
between the crater and the Peak, which must be
nearer sixty than fifty miles. The channel between the
group and this isolated mass was, at least, twelve leagues
in width. These twelve leagues were now to be run, and
our young navigator thought he had made fully three of
them, when light returned.
From that moment every mile made a sensible difference
in the face of the mountain. Light and shadow first
became
visible; then ravines, cliffs, and colours, came into
the view. Each league that he advanced increased Mark's
admiration and awe; and by the time that the boat was
on the last of those leagues which had appeared so long,
he began to have a more accurate idea of the sublime
nature
of the phenomenon that had been wrought so near
him. Vulcan's Peak, as an island, could not be less than
eight or nine miles in length, though its breadth did not
much exceed two. Running north and south, it offered
its narrow side to the group of the crater, which had
deceived
its solitary observer. Yes! of the millions on earth,
Mark Woolston, alone, had been so situated as to become
a witness of this grand display of the powers of the
elements
.
Yet, what was this in comparison with the
thousand
vast globes that were rolling about in space, objects
so familiar as to be seen daily and nightly without raising
a thought, in the minds of many, from the created to the
creator? Even these globes come and go, and men remain
indifferent to the mighty change!
The wind had been fresh in crossing the strait, and
Mark was not sorry when his pigmy boat came under the
shadow of the vast cliffs which formed the northern
extremity
of the Peak. When still a mile distant, he thought
he was close on the rocks; nor did he get a perfectly true
idea of the scale on which this rare mountain had been
formed, until running along at its base, within a hundred
yards of its rocks. Coming in to leeward, as a matter of
course, Mark, found comparatively smooth water, though
the unceasing heaving and setting of the ocean rendered
it a little hazardous to go nearer to the shore. For some
time our explorer was fearful he should not be able to land
at all; and he was actually thinking of putting about, to
make the best of his way back, while light remained to do
so, when he came off a place that seemed fitted by art,
rather than by nature, to meet his wishes. A narrow
opening appeared between two cliffs, of about equal height,
or some hundred feet in elevation, one of which extended
further into the ocean than its neighbour. The water
being quite smooth in this inlet, Mark ventured to enter
it, the wind favouring his advance. On passing this
gate-way
,
he found himself nearly becalmed, in a basin that
might be a hundred yards in diameter, which was not only
surrounded by a sandy beach, but which had also a sandy
bottom. The water was several fathoms deep, and it was
very easy to run the bows of the boat anywhere on the
beach. This was done, the sails were furled, and Mark
sprang ashore, taking the grapnel with him. Like
Columbus
,
he knelt on the sands, and returned his thanks to
God.
Not only did a ravine open from this basin, winding its
way up the entire ascent, but a copious stream of water
ran through it, foaming and roaring amid its glens. At
first, Mark supposed this was sea-water, still finding its
way from some lake on the Peak; but, on tasting it, he
found it was perfectly sweet. Provided with his gun, and
carrying his pack, our young man entered this ravine, and
following the course of the brook, he at once commenced
an ascent. The route was difficult only in the labour of
moving upwards, and by no means as difficult in that as
he had expected to find it. It was, nevertheless, fortunate
that this climbing was to be done in the shade, the sun
seldom penetrating into those cool and somewhat damp
crevices through which the brook found its way.
Notwithstanding his great activity, Mark Woolston was
just an hour in ascending to the Peak. In no place had
he found the path difficult, though almost always upward;
but he believed he had walked more than two miles before
he came out on level ground. When he had got up about
three-fourths of the way, the appearances of things around
him suddenly changed. Although the rock itself looked
no older than that below, it had, occasionally, a covering
that clearly could never have emerged from the sea within
the last few days. From that point everything denoted an
older existence in the air, from which our young man
inferred
that the summit of Vulcan's Peak had been an island
long prior to the late eruption. Every foot he advanced
confirmed this opinion, and the conclusion was that the
ancient island had lain too low to be visible to one on the
Reef.
An exclamation of delight escaped from our explorer,
as he suddenly came out on the broken plain of the Peak.
It was not absolutely covered, but was richly garnished with
wood; cocoa-nut, bread-fruits, and other tropical trees; and
it was delightfully verdant with young grasses. The latter
were still wet with a recent shower that Mark had seen
pass over the mountain, while standing for the island; and
on examining them more closely, the traces of the former
shower of volcanic ashes were yet to be seen. The warmth
in the sun, after so sharp a walk, caused the young man
to plunge into the nearest grove, where he had no
difficulty
in helping himself to as many cocoa-nuts, fresh from
the trees, as a thousand men could have consumed. Every
one has heard of the delicious beverage that the milk of
the cocoa-nut, and of the delicious food that its pulp
furnishes
,
when each is taken from the fruit before it hardens.
How these trees came there, Mark did not know. The
common theory is that birds convey the seeds from island
to island; though some suppose that the earth contains the
elements of all vegetation, and that this or that is
quickened
,
as particular influences are brought to bear by means
of climate and other agents.
After resting himself for an hour in that delicious grove,
Mark began to roam around the plain, to get an idea of its
beauties and extent. The former were inexhaustible,
offering
every variety of landscape, from the bold and
magnificent
to the soft and bewitching. There were birds
innumerable, of the most brilliant plumage, and some that
Mark imagined must be good to eat. In particular did he
observe an immense number of a very small sort that were
constantly pecking at a wild fig, of which there was a grove
of considerable extent. The fig, itself, he did not find as
palatable as he had hoped, though it was refreshing, and
served to vary the diet; but the bird struck him to be of
the same kind as the celebrated reed-bird, of the
Philadelphia
market, which we suppose to be much the same as
the
becca fichi
of Italy. Being provided with mustard-seed
shot, Mark loaded his piece properly, and killed at least
twenty of these little creatures at one discharge. After
cleaning them, he struck a light by means of the pan and
some powder, and kindled a fire. Here was wood, too, in
any quantity, an article of which he had feared in time he
might be in want, and which he had already begun to
husband
,
though used only in his simple cookery. Spitting
half-a-dozen of the birds, they were soon roasted. At the
same time he roasted a bunch of plantain, and, being
provided
with pepper and salt in his pack, as well as with
some pilot-bread, and a pint-bottle of rum, we are almost
ashamed to relate how our young explorer dined. Nothing
was wanting to such a meal but the sweets of social
converse
.
Mark fancied, as he sat enjoying that solitary
repast
,
so delicious of itself, and which was just enough
sweetened with toil to render it every way acceptable, that
he could gladly give up all the rest of the world, for the
enjoyment of a paradise like that before him, with Bridget
for his Eve.
The elevation of the mountain rendered the air far more
grateful and cool than he was accustomed to find it, at
mid-summer, down on the Reef, and the young man was
in a sort of gentle intoxication while breathing it. Then
it was that he most longed for a companion, though little
did he imagine how near he was to some of his species, at
that very moment; and how soon that, the dearest wish of
his heart, was to be met by an adventure altogether so
unexpected to him, that we must commence a new chapter,
in order to relate it.
16 *
CHAPTER XIII.
The merry homes of England!
Around their hearths by night,
What gladsome looks of household love
Meet in the ruddy light!
There woman's voice flows forth in song,
Or childhood's tale is told,
Or lips move tunefully along
Some glorious page of old.
Mrs. Hemans
.
The
peak, or highest part of the island, was at its
northern
extremity, and within two miles of the grove in which
Mark Woolston had eaten his dinner. Unlike most of the
plain, it had no woods whatever, but rising somewhat
abruptly
to a considerable elevation, it was naked of
everything
but grass. On the peak itself, there was very little
of the last even, and it was obvious that it must command
a full view of the whole plain of the island, as well as of
the surrounding sea, for a wide distance. Resuming his
pack, our young adventurer, greatly refreshed by the
delicious
repast he had just made, left the pleasant grove in
which he had first rested, to undertake this somewhat sharp
acclivity. He was not long in effecting it, however,
standing
on the highest point of his new discovery within an
hour after he had commenced its ascent.
Here, Mark found all his expectations realized touching
the character of the view. The whole plain of the island,
with the exceptions of the covers made by intervening
woods, lay spread before him like a map. All its beauties,
its shades, its fruits, and its verdant glades, were placed
beneath his eye, as if purposely to delight him with their
glories. A more enchanting rural scene the young man
had never beheld, the island having so much the air of
cultivation and art about it, that he expected, at each
instant
,
to see bodies of men running across its surface. He
carried the best glass of the Rancocus with him, in all his
excursions, not knowing at what moment Providence might
bring a vessel in sight, and he had it now slung from his
shoulders. With this glass, therefore, was every part of
the visible surface of the island swept, in anxious and
almost alarmed search for the abodes of inhabitants.
Nothing
of this sort, however, could be discovered. The
island was unquestionably without a human being, our
young man alone excepted. Nor could he see any trace
of beast, reptile, or of any animal but birds. Creatures
gifted with wings had been able to reach that little
paradise
;
but to all others, since it first arose from the sea,
had it probably been unapproached, if not unapproachable,
until that day. It appeared to be the very Elysium of
Birds!
Mark next examined the peak itself. There was a vast
deposit of very ancient guano on it, the washings of which
for ages, had doubtless largely contributed to the great
fertility of the plain below. A stream of more size than
one would expect to find on so small an island, meandered
through the plain, and could be traced to a very copious
spring that burst from the earth at the base of the peak.
Ample as this spring was, however, it could never of itself
have supplied the water of the brook, or rivulet, which
received the contributions of some fifty other springs, that
reached it in rills, as it wound its way down the gently
inclined plane of the island. At one point, about two
leagues from the Peak, there was actually a little lake
visible
,
and Mark could even trace its outlet, winding its way
beyond it. He supposed that the surplus tumbled into the
sea in a cascade.
It will readily be imagined that our young man turned
his glass to the northward, in search of the group he had
left that morning, with a most lively interest. It was easy
enough to see it from the great elevation at which he was
now placed. There it lay, stretched far and wide,
extending
nearly a degree of latitude, north and south, and
another
of longitude, east and west, most truly resembling a
vast dark-looking map, spread upon the face of the waters
for his special examination. It reminded Mark of the
moon, with its ragged outlines of imaginary continents, as
seen by the naked eye, while the island he was now on, bore
a fancied resemblance to the same object viewed through a
telescope; not that it had the look of molten silver which
is observed in the earth's satellite, but that it appeared
gloriously bright and brilliant. Mark could easily see
many of the sheets of water that were to be found among
the rocks, though his naked eye could distinguish neither
crater nor ship. By the aid of the glass, however, the first
was to be seen, though the distance was too great to leave
the poor deserted Rancocus visible, even with the
assistance
of magnifying-glasses.
When he had taken a good look at his old possessions,
Mark made a sweep of the horizon with the glass, in
order to ascertain if any other land were visible, from the
great elevation on which he now stood. While arranging
the focus of the instrument, an object first met his eye that
caused his heart almost to leap into his mouth. Land was
looming up, in the western board, so distinctly as to admit
of no cavil about its presence. It was an island,
mountainous
,
and Mark supposed it must be fully a hundred
miles distant. Still it was land, and strange land, and
might prove to be the abode of human beings. The glass
told him very little more than his eye, though he could
discern a mountainous form through it, and saw that it
was an island of no great size. Beyond this mountain,
again, the young man fancied that he could detect the
haze of more land; but, if he did, it was too low, too
distant
,
and too indistinct, to be certain of it. It is not easy
to give a clear idea of the tumult of feeling with which
Mark Woolston beheld these unknown regions, though it
might best be compared with the emotions of the
astronomer
who discovers a new planet. It would scarce exceed
the truth to say that he regarded that dim, blue mountain,
which arose in the midst of a watery waste, with as much
of admiration, mysterious awe and gratification united, as
Herschel may have been supposed to feel when he
established
the character of Uranus. It was fully an hour
before our hermit could turn his eyes in any other
direction
.
And when our young mariner did look aside, it was
more with the intention of relieving eyes that had grown
dim with gazing, than of not returning to the same objects
again, as soon as restored to their power. It was while
walking to and fro on the peak, with this intent, that a
new subject of interest caused him almost to leap into the
air, and to shout aloud. He saw a sail! For the first
time since Betts disappeared from his anxious looks, his
eyes now surely rested on a vessel. What was more, it
was quite near the island he was on, and seemed to be
beating up to get under its lee. It appeared but a speck
on the blue waves of the ocean, seen from that height, it
is true; but Mark was too well practised in his craft to be
mistaken. It was a vessel, under more or less canvas, how
much he could not then tell, or even seebut it was most
decidedly a vessel. Mark's limbs trembled so much that
he was compelled to throw himself upon the earth to find
the support he wanted. There he lay several minutes,
mentally returning thanks to God for this unexpected
favour
;
and when his strength revived, these signs of
gratitude
were renewed on his knees. Then he arose, almost
in terror lest the vessel should have disappeared, or it
should turn out that he was the subject of a cruel illusion.
There was no error. There was the little white speck,
and he levelled the glass to get a better look at it. An
exclamation now clearly broke from his lips, and for a
minute or two the young man actually appeared to be out
of his senses. The pinnace, the Neshamony,
however
,
were words that escaped him, and, had there been a
witness, might have given an insight into this extraordinary
conduct. Mark had, in fact, ascertained that the sail
beneath
the peak was no other than the little craft that had
been swept away, as already described, with Betts in it.
Fourteen months had elapsed since that occurrence, and
here it was again, seemingly endeavouring to return to the
place where it had been launched! Mark adopted
perhaps
the best expedient in his power to attract attention to
himself, and to let his presence be known. He fired both
barrels of his fowling-piece, and repeated the discharges
several times, or until a flag was shown on board the sloop,
which was now just beneath the cliff, a certain sign that
he had succeeded. A musket was also fired from the
vessel.
Our young man rather flew than ran to the ravine, down
which he went at a pace that several times placed his neck
in jeopardy. It was a very different thing to descend from
ascending such a mountain. In less than a quarter of an
hour the half-distracted hermit was in his boat, nearly
crazy with the apprehension that he might yet not meet
with his friend; for, that it was Bob looking for the Reef
and himself, he did not now entertain the least doubt.
The most plausible course for him to adopt was precisely
that which he followed. He pushed off in the Bridget,
making sail on the boat, and getting out of the cove in the
shortest time he could. On quitting his little haven, and
coming out clear of all the rocks, another shout burst out
of his very soul, when he saw the Neshamony, beyond all
cavil, within a hundred fathoms of him, running along the
shore in search of a place to land. That shout was returned,
and Mark and Bob recognised each other at the next
instant
.
As for the last, he just off tarpaulin, and gave three
hearty cheers, while the former sank on a seat, literally
unable to stand. The sheet of the sail got away from him,
nor could he be said to know what he was about, until
some little time after he was in the arms of his friend, and
on board the pinnace.
It was half-an-hour before Mark was master of himself
again. At length tears relieved him; nor was he ashamed
to indulge in them, when he saw his old companion not
only alive and well, but restored to him. He perceived
another in the boat; but as he was of a dark skin, he
naturally
inferred this second person was a native of some
neighbouring island where Bob had been, and who had
consented to come with him in this, his search after the
shipwrecked mariner. At length Bob began to
converse
.
Well, Mr. Mark, the sight of you is the pleasantest
prospect that has met my eyes this many a day, exclaimed
the honest fellow. It was with fear and trembling that
I set out on the search, and little did I hope to fall in with
you so early in the cruise.
Thank you, thank you, Bob, and God be praised for
this great mercy! You have been to some other island, I
see, by your companion; but the miraculous part of all is,
that you should find your way back to the Reef, since you
are no navigator.
The Reef! If this here mountain is the Reef, the
country has greatly altered since I left it, answered Bob.
Mark then briefly explained the great change that had
actually occurred, and told his own story touching his boat
and his late voyages of discovery. Betts listened with the
greatest attention, casting occasional glances upward at the
immense mass that had been so suddenly lifted out of the
sea, as well as turning his head to regard the smoke of the
more distant volcano.
Well, this explains our 'arthquake, he answered, as
soon as Mark was done. I must have been as good as a
hundred and fifty leagues from this very spot at the time
you mention, and we had tremblings there that would
scarce let a body stand on his feet. A ship came in two
days arterwards, that must have been a hundred leagues
further to the nor'ard when it happened, and her people
reported that they thought heaven and 'arth was a coming
together, out there in open water.
It has been a mighty earthquakemust have been, to
have wrought these vast changes; though I had supposed
that Providence had confined a knowledge of its existence
to myself. But, you spoke of a ship, Bobsurely we are
not in the neighbourhood of vessels.
Sartainbut, I may as well tell you my adventures at
once, Mr. Mark; though I own I should like to land first,
as it is a long story, and take a look at this island that you
praise so much, and taste them reed-birds of which you
give so good an account. I 'm Jarsey-born and bred, and
know what the little things be.
Mark was dying to hear Bob's story, more especially
since he understood a ship was connected with it, but he
could not refuse his friend's demand for sweet water and
a dinner. The entrance of the cove was quite near, and
the boats entered that harbour and were secured; after
which the three men commenced the ascent, Mark picking
up by the way the spy-glass, fowling-piece, and other
articles
that he had dropped in the haste of his descent. While
going up this sharp acclivity, but little was said; but, when
they reached the summit, or the plain rather, exclamations
of delight burst from the mouths of both of Mark's
companions
.
To the young man's great surprise, those which
came from Bob's dark-skinned associate were in English,
as well as those which came from Bob himself. This
induced
him to take a good look at the man, when he
discovered
a face that he knew!
How is this, Bob? cried Mark, almost gasping for
breathwhom have you here? Is not this Socrates?
Ay, ay, sir; that 's Soc; and Dido, his wife, is within
a hundred miles of you.
This answer, simple as it was, nearly overcame our
young man again. Socrates and Dido had been the slaves
of Bridget, when he left home; a part of the estate she
had received from her grandmother. They dwelt in the
house with her, and uniformly called her mistress. Mark
knew them both very well, as a matter of course; and
Dido, with the archness of a favourite domestic, was often
in the habit of calling him her `young master.' A flood
of expectations, conjectures and apprehensions came over
our hero, and he refrained from putting any questions
immediately
,
out of pure astonishment. He was almost afraid
indeed to ask any.
Nearly unconscious of what he was about, he led the
way to the grove where he had dined two or three hours
before, and where the remainder of the reed-birds were
suspended from the branch of a tree. The embers of the
fire were ready, and in a few minutes Socrates handed
Betts his dinner.
Bob ate and drank heartily. He loved a tin-pot of
rum-and-water
,
or grog, as it used to be calledthough even
the word is getting to be obsolete in these temperance
timesand he liked good eating. It was not epicurism,
however, or a love of the stomach, that induced him to
defer his explanations on the present occasion. He saw
that Mark must hear what he had to relate gradually, and
was not sorry that the recognition of the negro had
prepared
him to expect something wonderful. Wonderful it
was, indeed; and at last Betts, having finished his dinner,
and given half-a-dozen preparatory hints, in order to lessen
the intensity of his young friend's feelings, yielded to
an appeal from the other's eyes, and commenced his
narrative
.
Bob told his story, as a matter of course, with a
great deal of circumlocution, and in his own language.
There was a good deal of unnecessary prolixity in it, and
some irrelative digressions touching currents, and the
trades, and the weather; but, on the whole, it was given
intelligibly, and with sufficient brevity for one who
devoured
every syllable he uttered. The reader, however,
would most probably prefer to hear an abridgement of the
tale in our own words.
When Robert Betts was driven off the Reef, by the
hurricane of the preceding year, he had no choice but to
let the Neshamony drive to leeward with him. As soon
as he could, he got the pinnace before the wind, and,
whenever he saw broken water ahead, he endeavoured to
steer clear of it. This he sometimes succeeded in
effecting
;
while at others he passed through it, or over it, at the
mercy of the tempest. Fortunately the wind had piled up
the element in such a way as to carry the craft clear of the
rocks, and in three hours after the Neshamony was lifted
out of her cradle, she was in the open ocean, to leeward
of all the dangers. It blew too hard, however, to make
sail on her, and Bob was obliged to scud until the gale
broke. Then, indeed, he passed a week in endeavouring
to beat back and rejoin his friend, but without success,
`losing all he made in the day, while asleep at night.'
Such, at least, was Bob's account of his failure to find the
Reef again; though Mark thought it probable that he was
a little out in his reckoning, and did not look in exactly
the right place for it.
At the end of this week high land was made to leeward,
and Betts ran down for it, in the hope of finding
inhabitants
.
In this last expectation, however, he did not
succeed
.
It was a volcanic mountain, of a good many
resources
,
and of a character not unlike that of Vulcan's
Peak, but entirely unpeopled. He named it after his old
ship, and passed several days on it. On describing its
appearance, and its bearings from the place where they
then were, Mark had no doubt it was the island that was
visible from the peak near them, and at which he had been
gazing that very afternoon, for fully an hour, with longing
Vol. I.  17
eyes. On describing its form to Bob, the latter coincided
in this opinion, which was in fact the true one.
From the highest point of Rancocus Island, land was
to be seen to the northward and westward, and Bob now
determined to make the best of his way in that direction,
in the hope of falling in with some vessel after sandal-wood
or bche-le-mar. He fell in with a group of low islands,
of a coral formation, about a hundred leagues from his
volcanic
mountain, and on them he found inhabitants. These
people were accustomed to see white men, and turned out
to be exceedingly mild and just. It is probable that they
connected the sudden appearance of a vessel like the
Neshamony
,
having but one man in it, with some miraculous
interposition of their gods, for they paid Bob the highest
honours, and when he landed, solemnly tabooed his sloop.
Bob was a long-headed fellow in the main, and was not
slow to perceive the advantage of such a ceremony, and
encouraged it. He also formed a great intimacy with the
chief, exchanging names and rubbing noses with him.
This chief was styled Betto, after the exchange, and Bob
was called Ooroony by the natives. Ooroony stayed a
month with Betto, when he undertook a voyage with him
in a large canoe, to another group, that was distant two or
three hundred miles, still further to the northward, and
where Bob was told he should find a ship. This account
proved to be true, the ship turning out to be a Spaniard,
from South America, engaged in the pearl fishery, and on
the eve of sailing for her port. From some
misunderstanding
with the Spanish captain, that Bob never comprehended
and of course could not explain, and which he did not
attempt
to explain, Betto left the group in haste, and without
taking leave of his new friend, though he sent him a
message
of apology, one-half of which was lost on Bob, in
consequence
of not understanding the language. The result
was, however, to satisfy the latter that his friend was quite
as sorry to abandon
him
, as he was glad to get away from
the Spanish captain.
This desertion left Betts no choice between remaining
on the pearl island, or of sailing in the brig, which went
to sea next day. He decided to do the last. In due time
he was landed at Panama, whence he made his way across
the isthmus, actually reaching Philadelphia in less than
five months after he was driven off the Reef. In all this
he was much favoured by circumstances; though an old
salt, like Bob, will usually make his way where a landsman
would be brought up.
The owners of the Rancocus gave up their ship, as soon
as Betts had told his story, manifesting no disposition to
send good money after bad. They looked to the
underwriters
,
and got Bob to make oath to the loss of the vessel;
which said oath, by the way, was the ground-work of a
law-suit that lasted Friend Abraham White as long as he
lived. Bob next sought Bridget with his tale. The young
wife received the poor fellow with floods of tears, and the
most eager attention to his story, as indeed did our hero's
sister Anne. It would seem that Betts's arrival was most
opportune. In consequence of the non-arrival of the ship,
which was then past due two or three months, Doctor
Yardley had endeavoured to persuade his daughter that
she was a widow, if indeed, as he had of late been
somewhat
disposed to maintain, she had ever been legally
married
at all. The truth was, that the medical war in Bristol
had broken out afresh, in consequence of certain cases
that had been transferred to that village, during one of the
fever-seasons in Philadelphia. Greater cleanliness, and
the free use of fresh water, appear to have now arrested
the course of this formidable disease, in the northern cities
of America; but, in that day, it was of very frequent
occurrence
.
Theories prevailed among the doctors
concerning
it, which were bitterly antagonistical to each other;
and Doctor Woolston headed one party in Bucks, while
Doctor Yardley headed another. Which was right, or
whether either was right, is more than we shall pretend to
say, though we think it probable that both were wrong.
Anne Woolston had been married to a young physician
but a short time, when this new outbreak concerning
yellow
fever occurred. Her husband, whose name was
Heaton
,
unfortunately took the side of this grave question that
was opposed to his father-in-law, for a reason no better
than that he believed in the truth of the opposing theory,
and this occasioned another breach. Doctor Yardley could
not, and did not wholly agree with Doctor Heaton, because
the latter was Doctor Woolston's son-in-law, and he altered
his theory a little to create a respectable point of
disagreement
;
while Doctor Woolston could not pardon a
disaffection
that took place, as it might be, in the height of a war.
About this time too, Mrs. Yardley died.
All these occurrences, united to the protracted absence
of Mark, made Bridget and Anne extremely unhappy. To
increase this unhappiness, Doctor Yardley took it into his
head to dispute the legality of a marriage that had been
solemnized on board a ship. This was an entirely new
legal crotchet, but the federal government was then young,
and jurisdictions had not been determined as clearly as has
since been the case. Had it been the fortune of Doctor
Yardley to live in these later times, he would not have given
himself the trouble to put violent constructions on
anything
;
but, getting a few female friends to go before the
necessary judge, with tears in their eyes, anything would
be granted to their requests, very much as a matter of
course. Failing of this, moreover, there is always the
resource
of the legislature, which will usually pass a law
taking away a man's wife, or his children, and sometimes
his estate, if a pretty pathetic appeal can be made to it, in
the way of gossip. We have certainly made great progress
in this country, within the last twenty years; but whether
it has been in a direction towards the summit of human
perfection, or one downward towards the destruction of all
principles, the next generation will probably be better able
to say than this. Even the government is getting to be
gossipian.
In the case of Bridget, however, public sympathy was
with her, as it always will be with a pretty woman.
Nevertheless
,
her father had great influence in Bucks county,
more especially with the federalists and the
anti-depletionists
,
and it was in his power to give his daughter great
uneasiness, if not absolutely to divorce her. So violent
did he become, that he actually caused proceedings to be
commenced in Bridget's name, to effect a legal separation,
taking the grounds that the marriage had never been
consummated
,
that the ceremony had occurred on board a
ship, that the wife was of tender years, and lastly, that she
was an heiress. Some persons thought the Doctor's
proceedings
were instigated by the circumstance that another
relative had just died, and left Bridget five thousand
dollars
,
which were to be paid to her the day she was eighteen,
the period of a female's reaching her majority, according
to popular notions. The possession of this money, which
Bridget received and placed in the hands of a friend in
town, almost made her father frantic for the divorce, or a
decree against the marriage, he contending there was no
marriage, and that a divorce was unnecessary. The young
wife had not abandoned the hope of seeing her husband
return, all this time, although uneasiness concerning the
fate of the ship, was extending from her owners into the
families of those who had sailed in her. She wished to
meet Mark with a sum of money that would enable him,
at once, to commence life respectably, and place him above
the necessity of following the seas.
Betts reached Bristol the very day that a decision was
made, on a preliminary point, in the case of Yardley versus
Woolston, that greatly encouraged the father in his hopes
of final success, and as greatly terrified his daughter. It
was, in fact, a mere question of practice, and had no real
connection with the merits of the matter at issue; but it
frightened Bridget and her friend Anna enormously. In
point of fact, there was not the smallest danger of the
marriage
being declared void, should any one oppose the
decision
;
but this was more than any one of the parties then
knew, and Doctor Yardley seemed so much in earnest,
that Bridget and Anne got into the most serious state of
alarm on the subject. To increase their distress, a suitor
for the hand of the former appeared in the person of a
student
of medicine, of very fair expectations, and who
supported
every one of Doctor Yardley's theories, in all their
niceties and distinctions; and what is more, would have
supported them, had they been ten times as untenable as
they actually were, in reason.
Had the situation of Doctor Heaton been more pleasant
than it was, it is probable that the step taken by himself,
his wife, and Bridget, would never have been thought of.
But it was highly unpleasant. He was poor, and dependent
altogether on his practice for a support. Now, it was in
Doctor Woolston's power to be of great service to the
17 *
young couple, by introducing the son-in-law to his own
patients, but this he could not think of doing with a
depletionist
;
and John, as Anne affectionately styled her
husband
,
was left to starve on his system of depletion. Such
was the state of things when Bob appeared in Bristol, to
announce to the young wife not only the existence but the
deserted and lone condition of her husband. The honest
fellow knew there was something clandestine about the
marriage, and he used proper precautions not to betray his
presence to the wrong persons. By means of a little
management
he saw Bridget privately, and told his story.
As Bob had been present at the wedding, and was known
to stand high in Mark's favour, he was believed, quite as a
matter of course, and questioned in a thousand ways, until
the poor fellow had not really another syllable to
communicate
.
The sisters shed floods of tears at the thought of poor
Mark's situation. For several days they did little besides
weep and pray. Then Bridget suddenly dried her tears,
and announced an intention to go in person to the rescue
of her husband. Not only was she determined on this,
but, as a means of giving a death-blow to all expectations
of a separation and to the hopes of her new suitor, she was
resolved to go in a way that should enable her to remain
on the Reef with Mark, and, if necessary, to pass the
remainder
of her days there. Bob had given a very glowing
description of the charms of the residence, as well as of the
climate, the latter quite justly, and declared his readiness
to accompany this faithful wife in the pursuit of her lost
partner. The whole affair was communicated to Doctor
and Mrs. Heaton, who not only came into the scheme, but
enlisted in its execution in person. The idea pleased the
former in particular, who had a love of adventure, and a
desire to see other lands, while Anne was as ready to
follow
her husband to the ends of the earth, as Bridget was
to go to the same place in quest of Mark. In a word, the
whole project was deliberately framed, and ingeniously
carried out.
Doctor Heaton had a brother, a resident of New York,
and often visited him. Bridget was permitted to
accompany
Anne to that place, whither her money was
transferred
to her. A vessel was found that was about to sail for
the North-west Coast, and passages were privately engaged.
A great many useful necessaries were laid in, and, at the
proper time, letters of leave-taking were sent to Bristol,
and the whole party sailed. Previously to the
embarkation
,
Bob appeared to accompany the adventurers. He
was attended by Socrates, and Dido, and Juno, who had
stolen away by order of their young mistress, as well as by
a certain Friend Martha Waters, who had stood up in
`meeting' with Friend Robert Betts, and had become
bone of his bone and flesh of his flesh; and her maiden
sister, Joan Waters, who was to share their fortunes. In
a word, Bob had brought an early attachment to the test
of matrimony.
So well had the necessary combinations been made, that
the ship sailed with our adventurers, nine in number,
without
meeting with the slightest obstacle. Once at sea, of
course nothing but that caused by the elements was to
be anticipated. Cape Horn was doubled in due time, and
Doctor Heaton, with all under his care, was landed at
Panama
,
just five months, to a day, after leaving New York.
Here passages were taken in the same brig that Bob had
returned in, which was again bound out, on a pearl-fishing
voyage. Previously to quitting Panama, however, a recruit
was engaged in the person of a young American shipwright,
of the name of Bigelow, who had run from his ship a
twelvemonth
before, to marry a Spanish girl, and who had
become
heartily tired of his life in Panama. He and his
wife and child joined the party, engaging to serve the
Heatons, for a stipulated sum, for the term of two years.
The voyage from Panama to the pearl islands was a long
one, but far from unpleasant. Sixty days after leaving
port the adventurers were safely landed, with all their
effects
.
These included two cows, with a young bull, two
yearling colts, several goats obtained in South America,
and various implements of husbandry that it had not entered
into the views of Friend Abraham White to send to even
the people of Fejee. With the natives of the pearl island,
Bob, already known to them and a favourite, had no
difficulty
in negotiating. He had brought them suitable and
ample presents, and soon effected an arrangement, by which
they agreed to transport him and all his stores, the animals
included, to Betto's Islands, a distance of fully three
hundred
miles. The horses and cows were taken on a species
of catamaran, or large raft, that is much used in those mild
seas, and which sail reasonably well a little off the wind,
and not very badly on. At Betto's Islands a new bargain
was struck, and the whole party proceeded to Rancocus
Island, Bob making his land-fall without any difficulty,
from having observed the course steered in coming from it.
At Betto's group, however, Bob found the Neshamony,
covered with mats, and tabooed, precisely as he had left
her to a rope-yarn. Not a human hand had touched
anything
belonging to the boat, or a human foot approached it,
during the whole time of his absence. Ooroony, or Betto,
was rewarded for his fidelity by the present of a musket
and some ammunition, articles that were really of the last
importance to his dignity and power. They were as good
as a standing army to him, actually deciding summarily a
point of disputed authority, that had long been in
controversy
between himself and another chief, in his favour.
The voyage between Betto's group and Rancocus Island
was made in the Neshamony, so far as the human portion
of the freight was concerned. The catamarans and
canoes
,
however, came on with the other animals, and all
the utensils and stores.
The appearance of Rancocus Island created quite as
much astonishment among the native mariners, as had that
of the horses, cows, &c. Until they saw it, not one of
them had any notion of its existence, or of a mountain at
all. They dwelt themselves on low coral islands, and quite
beyond the volcanic formation, and a hill was a thing
scarcely
known to them. At this island Heaton and Betts deemed
it prudent to dismiss their attendants, not wishing them to
know anything of the Reef, as they were not sure what
sort of neighbours they might prove, on a longer
acquaintance
.
The mountain, however, possessed so many
advantages
over the Reef, as the latter was when Bob left it,
that the honest fellow frankly admitted its general
superiority
,
and suggested the possibility of its becoming their
permanent residence. In some respects it was not equal
to the Reef, as a residence, however, the fishing in
particular
turning out to be infinitely inferior. But it had trees
and fruits, being very much of the same character as
Vulcan's
Peak, in this respect. Nevertheless, there was no
comparison between the two islands as places of residence,
the last having infinitely the most advantages. It was
larger, had more and better fruits, better water, and richer
grasses. It had also a more even surface, and a more
accessible
plain. Rancocus Island was higher and more
broken, and, while it might be a pleasanter place of
residence
than the Reef during the warm months, it never
could be a place as pleasant as the plain of the Peak.
Bob found it necessary to leave his friends, and most
of his stores, at Rancocus Island; Mrs. Heaton becoming
a mother two days after their arrival at it, and the cows
both increasing their families in the course of the same
week. It was, moreover, impossible to transport everybody
and everything in the Neshamony, at the same time. As
Doctor Heaton would not leave Anne at such a moment, and
Bridget was of the same way of thinking, it was thought
best to improve the time by sending out Betts to explore.
It will be remembered that he was uncertain where the
Reef was to be found exactly, though convinced it was to
windward, and within a hundred miles of him. While
roaming over the rocks of Rancocus, however, Vulcan's
Peak had been seen, as much to Bob's surprise as to his
delight. To his surprise, inasmuch as he had no notion
of the great physical change that had recently been wrought
by the earthquake yet could scarce believe he had
overlooked
such an object in his former examinations; and to
his delight, because he was now satisfied that the Reef
must lie to the northward of that strange mountain, and a
long distance from it, because no such peak had been
visble
from the former when he left it. It was a good place
to steer for, nevertheless, on this new voyage, since it
carried
him a hundred miles to windward; and when Bob,
with Socrates for a companion, left Rancocus to look for
the Reef, he steered as near the course for the Peak as the
wind would permit. He had made the island from the
boat, after a run of ten hours; and, at the same time, he
made the crater of the active volcano. For the latter, he
stood that night, actually going within a mile of it; and,
next morning, he altered his course, and beat up for the
strange island. When Mark first discovered him, he had
nearly made the circuit of Vulcan's Peak, in a vain
endeavour
to land, and he would actually have gone on his way,
had it not been for the firing of the fowling-piece, the
report
of which he heard, and the smoke of which he saw.
CHAPTER XIV.
Compell the hawke to sit, that is unmanned,
Or make the hound, untaught, to draw the deere,
Or bring the free, against his will, in band,
Or move the sad, a pleasant tale to heere,
Your time is lost, and you no whit the neere!
So love ne learnes, of force, the heart to knit:
She serves but those, that feels sweet fancie's fit.
Churchyard
.
We
leave the reader to imagine with what feelings Mark
heard these facts. Bridget, for whom his tenderness was
unabated; Bridget, who had been the subject of so many
of his thoughts since his shipwreck, had shown herself
worthy to be thus loved, and was now on an island that he
might easily reach in a run of a few hours! The young
man retired further within the grove, leaving Bob and
Socrates
behind, and endeavoured to regain his composure
by himself. Before rejoining his companions, he knelt
and returned thanks to God for this instance of his great
kindness. It was a long time, notwithstanding, before he
could become accustomed to the idea of having associates,
at all. Time and again, within the next month or two,
did he
dream
that all this fancied happiness was only a
dream
, and awoke under a sense of having been the subject
of an agreeable illusion. It took months perfectly to
restore
the tone of his mind in this respect, and to bring it
back into the placid current of habitual happiness. The
deep sense of gratitude to God he never lost; but the
recollection
of what he had suffered, and from what he had
been relieved by the Divine mercy, remained indelibly
impressed
on his heart, and influenced his future life to a
degree that increased the favour a thousand-fold.
The mode of proceeding was next discussed, in the
course of doing which Mark communicated to Bob,
somewhat
in detail, the circumstance of the recent convulsion,
and the changes which it had produced. After talking the
matter over, both agreed it would be every way desirable
to bring the whole party, and as much of the property as
could be easily moved, up to windward at once. Now,
that the natives knew of the existence of Rancocus Island,
their visits might be often expected, and nothing was more
uncertain than their policy and friendship. Once on
Rancocus
Island the Peak could be seen, and from the Peak
the Reef was visible. In this way, then, there was every
reason to believe that the existence of their little colony
would soon become known, and the property they possessed
the object of cupidity and violence. Against such
consequences
it would be necessary to guard with the strictest
care, and the first step should be to get everything of value
up to windward, with the least possible delay. The
natives
often went a long distance, in their canoes and on
their rafts, with the wind abeam, but it was not often they
undertook to go directly to windward. Then the activity
of the volcano might be counted on as something in favour
of the colonists, since those uninstructed children of nature
would be almost certain to set the phenomenon down to
the credit of some god, or some demon, neither of whom
would be likely to permit his special domains to be
trespassed
on with impunity.
While Mark and Bob were talking these matters over,
Socrates had been shooting and cleaning a few dozen
more of the reed-birds. This provision of the delicacy
was made, because Betts affirmed no such delicious little
creature was to be met with on Rancocus, though they were
to be found on Vulcan's Peak literally in tens of thousands.
This difference could be accounted for in no other way,
than by supposing that some of the birds had originally
found their way to the latter, favoured by accidental
circumstances
,
driven by a hurricane, transported on
sea-weed
,
or attending the drift of some plants, and that the
same, or similar circumstances, had never contributed to
carry them the additional hundred miles to leeward.
It was near sunset when the Neshamony left Snug Cove,
as Mark had named his little haven, at the foot of the
ravine
,
which, by the way, he called the Stairs, and put to
sea, on her way to Rancocus Island. The bearings of the
last had been accurately taken, and our mariners were just
as able to run by night as by day. It may as well be said
here, moreover, that the black was a capital boatman, and
a good fresh-water sailor in general, a proficiency that he
had acquired in consequence of having been born and
brought up on the banks of the Delaware. But it would
have been very possible to run from one of these islands
to the other, by observing the direction of the wind alone,
since it blew very steadily in the same quarter, and changes
in the course were always to be noted by changes in the
violence or freshness of the breeze. In that quarter of the
ocean the trades blew with very little variation from the
south-east, though in general the Pacific Trades are from
the south-west.
Mark was delighted with the performances of the
Neshamony
.
Bob gave a good account of her qualities, and
said he should not hesitate to make sail in her for either
of the continents, in a case of necessity. Accustomed, as
he had been of late, to the little Bridget, the pinnace
appeared
a considerable craft to Mark, and he greatly exulted
in this acquisition. No seaman could hesitate about
passing
from the Reef to the islands, at any time when it did
not absolutely blow a gale, in a boat of this size and of
such qualities; and, even in a gale, it might be possible
to make pretty good weather of it. Away she now went,
leaving the Bridget moored in Snug Cove, to await their
return. Of course, Mark and Bob had much discourse,
while running down before the wind that night, in which
each communicated to the other many things that still
remained
to be said. Mark was never tired of asking
questions
about Bridget; her looks, her smiles, her tears, her
hopes, her fears, her health, her spirits, and her resolution,
being themes of which he never got weary. A watch was
set, nevertheless, and each person in the pinnace had his
turn of sleep, if sleep he could.
At the rising of the sun Mark was awake. Springing
to his feet, he saw that Rancocus Island was plainly in
view. In the course of the ten hours she had been out,
the Neshamony had run about seventy miles, having a
square-sail set, in addition to her jib and mainsail. This
brought the mountain for which she was steering within
ten leagues, and directly to leeward. A little impatience
was betrayed by the young husband, but, on the whole,
he behaved reasonably well. Mark had never neglected
his person, notwithstanding his solitude. Daily baths, and
the most scrupulous attention to his attire, so far as
neatness
went, had kept him not only in health, but in spirits,
the frame of the mind depending most intimately on the
condition of the body. Among other habits, he preserved
that of shaving daily. The cutting of his hair gave him
the most trouble, and he had half a mind to get Bob to act
as barber on the present occasion. Then he remembered
having seen Bridget once cut the hair of a child, and he
could not but fancy how pleasant it would be to have her
moving about him, in the performance of the same office
on himself. He decided, consequently, to remain as he
was, as regarded his looks, until his charming bride could
act as his hair-dresser. The toilette, however, was not
neglected, and, on the whole, there was no reason to
complain
of the young man's appearance. The ship furnished
him clothes at will, and the climate rendered so few
necessary
,
that even a much smaller stock than he possessed,
would probably have supplied him for life.
When about a league from the northern end of
Rancocus
Island, Bob set a little flag at his mast-head, the signal,
previously arranged, of his having been successful. Among
the stores brought by the party from America, were three
regular tents, or marquees, which Heaton purchased at a
sale of old military stores, and had prudently brought with
him, to be used as occasion might demand. These
marquees
were now pitched on a broad piece of low land, that
lay between the cliffs and the beach, and where the colony
had temporarily established itself. Mark's heart beat
violently
as Bob pointed out these little canvas dwellings to
him. They were the abodes of his friends, including his
young wife. Next the cows appeared, quietly grazing
Vol. I.  18
near by, with a pleasant home look, and the goats and colts
were not far off, cropping the grass. Altogether our young
man was profoundly overcome again, and it was some time
ere he could regain his self-command. On a point that
proved to be the landing-place, stood a solitary female
figure. As the boat drew nearer she extended her arms,
and then, as if unable to stand, she sunk on a rock which
had served her for a seat ever since the distant sail was
visible. In two more minutes Mark Woolston had his
charming young bride encircled in his arms. The delicacy
which kept the others aloof from this meeting, was imitated
by Bob, who, merely causing the boat to brush near the
rock, so as to allow of Mark's jumping ashore, passed on
to a distant landing, where he was met by most of his
party, including `Friend Martha,' who rejoiced not a little
in the safe return of Friend Robert Betts. In half-an-hour
Mark and Bridget came up to the marquees, when the
former made the acquaintance of his brother-in-law, and
had the happiness of embracing his sister. It was a
morning
of the purest joy, and deepest gratitude. On the one
side, the solitary man found himself restored to the delights
of social life, in the persons of those on earth whom he
most loved; and, on the other hand, the numberless
apprehensions
of those who looked for him, and his place of
retirement, had all their anxiety rewarded by complete
success. Little was done that day but to ask and answer
questions. Mark had to recount all that had happened
since Bob was taken from him, and not trifling was the
trepidation created among his female listeners, when he
related the history of the earthquake. Their fears,
however
,
were somewhat appeased by his assurances of
security
;
the circumstance that a volcano was in activity near
by, being almost a pledge that no very extensive
convulsions
could follow.
The colonists remained a week at Rancocus Island,
being actually too happy to give themselves the disturbance
of a removal. At the end of that time, however, Anne
was so far recovered that they began to talk of a voyage,
Bridget, in particular, dying to see the place where Mark
had passed so many solitary hours; and, as he had assured
her more than once, where her image had scarcely ever
been absent from his thoughts an hour at a time. As it
would be impossible to embark all the effects at once, in
the Neshamony, some method was to be observed in the
removal. The transportation of the cows and horses was
the most serious part of the undertaking, the pinnace not
being constructed to receive such animals. Room,
nevertheless
,
could be made for one at a time, and still leave
sufficient space in the stern-sheets for the accommodation
of five or six persons. It was very desirable to get the
females
away first, lest the rumour of the mountain, hitherto
unknown, should spread among the islands, and bring them
visitors who might prove to be troublesome, if not
dangerous
.
Parties existed in Betto's group, as we believe they
exist everywhere else; and Bob knew very well that
nothing
but the ascendancy of his friend, the chief, Ooroony,
had been the means of his escaping as well as he did, in
the land-fall among them that he had made. The smallest
reverse of fortune might put Betto down, and some bitter
foe up, and then there was the certainty that war canoes
might come off in quest of the mountain, at any time,
without asking the leave of the friendly chief, even while
he remained in power. On the whole, therefore, it was
determined to freight the pinnace with the most valuable
of the effects, put all the females on board, and send her
off under the care of Mark, Heaton, and Socrates, leaving
Bob and Bigelow to look after the stock and the rest of the
property. It was supposed the boat might be absent a
week. This was done accordingly, Bob, on taking leave
of Friend Martha, particularly recommending to her
attention
the Vulcan's Peak reed-birds, throwing in a hint that
he should be glad to find a string of them in the pinnace,
on her return.
The voyage to windward was a much more serious
business
than the run to leeward. By Bob's advice Mark
reefed his mainsail, and took the bonnet of the jib.
Following
the same instructions, he stood away to the
southward
,
letting the boat go through the water freely,
intending
to tack when he came near the volcano, and not before.
This was what Bob himself had done, and that which had
turned out so well with him, he fancied might succeed
with his friend. The Neshamony left Rancocus Island
just at sunset. Next morning Mark saw the smoke of the
Volcano, and stood for it. After making two stretches, he
came up within a league of this spot, when he tacked and
stood to the northward and eastward, Vulcan's Peak having
been in plain view the entire day. As respects the
volcano
,
it was in a comparatively quiet state, though
rumbling
sounds were heard, and stones were cast into the air
in considerable quantities, while the boat was nearest in.
One thing, moreover, Mark ascertained, which greatly
increased his confidence in the permanency of the changes
that had lately occurred in the physical formation of all
that region. He found himself in comparatively shoal
water, when fully a league from this new crater. Shoal
in a seaman's sense, though not in shallow water; the
soundings being from fifteen to twenty fathoms, with a
rocky bottom.
Between the volcano and Vulcan's Peak it blew quite
fresh, and Mark had a good occasion to ascertain the
qualities
of the pinnace. A long, heavy swell, came rolling
through the passage, which was near sixty miles in width,
seemingly with a sweep that extended to the Southern
Ocean. Notwithstanding all this, the little craft did
wonders
,
struggling along in a way one would hardly have
expected from so small a vessel. She made fully two knots'
headway in the worst of it, and in general her rate of
sailing
,
close on a wind and under pretty short canvas, was
about three. The night was very dark, and there was
nothing to steer by but the wind, which gave some little
embarrassment; but finding himself in much smoother
water than he had been all the previous day, about
midnight
,
our young man felt satisfied that he was under the
lee of the island, and at no great distance from it. He
made short tacks until daylight, when the huge mass hove
up out of the departing darkness, within a mile of the boat.
It only remained to run along the land for two or three
miles, and to enter the haven of Snug Cove. Mark had
been telling his companions what a secret place this haven
was to conceal a vessel in, when he had a practical
confirmation
of the truth of his statement that caused him to
be well laughed at. For ten minutes he could not discover
the entrance himself, having neglected to take the proper
land-marks, that he might have no difficulty in running for
his port. After a time, however, he caught sight of an
object that he remembered, and found his way into the
cove. Here lay the little namesake of his pretty wife, just
as he had left her, the true Bridget smiling and blushing
as the young husband pointed out the poor substitute he
had been compelled to receive for herself, only ten days
earlier.
Mark, and Socrates, and Dido, and Teresa, Bigelow's
wife, all carried up heavy loads; while Heaton had as
much as he could do to help Anne and the child up the
sharp acclivity. Bridget, with her light active step, and
great eagerness to behold a scene that Mark had described
with so much eloquence, was the first, by a quarter of an
hour, on the plain. When the others reached the top,
they saw the charming young thing running about in the
nearest grove, that in which her husband had dined,
collecting
fruit, and apparently as enchanted as a child. Mark
paused, as he gained the height, to gaze on this sight, so
agreeable in his eyes, and which rendered the place so
very different from what it had been so recently, while he
was in possession of its glorious beauties, a solitary man.
Then, he had several times likened himself to Adam in
the garden of Eden, before woman was given to him for a
companion. Now, now he could feast his eyes on an Eve,
who would have been highly attractive in any part of the
world.
The articles brought up on the plain, at this first trip,
comprised all that was necessary to prepare and to partake
of a breakfast in comfort. A fire was soon blazing, the
kettle on, and the bread-fruit baking. It was almost
painful
to destroy the reed-birds, or
becca fichi
, so numerous
were they, and so confiding. One discharge from each
barrel of the fowling-piece had enabled. Heaton to bring in
enough for the whole party, and these were soon roasting.
Mark had brought with him from the Reef, a basket of
fresh eggs, and they had been Bridget's load, in ascending
the mountain. He had promised her an American
breakfast
,
and these eggs, boiled, did serve to remind everybody
of a distant home, that was still remembered with
melancholy
pleasure. A heartier, or a happier meal,
notwithstanding
,
18 *
was never made than was that breakfast. The
mountain air, invigorating though bland, the exercise, the
absence of care, the excellence of the food, which
comprised
fresh figs, a tree or two of tolerable sweetness having
been found, the milk of the cocoa-nut, the birds, the eggs,
the bread-fruit, &c., all contributed their share to render
the meal memorable.
The men, and the three labouring women, were
employed
two days in getting the cargo of the Neshamony
up on the plain; or to Eden, as Bridget named the spot,
unconscious how often she herself had been likened to a
lovely Eve, in the mind of her young husband. Two of
the marquees had been brought, and were properly erected,
having board floors, and everything comfortably arranged
within and without them. A roof, however, was scarcely
necessary in that delicious climate, where one could get
into the shade of a grove; and a thatched shed was easily
prepared for a dwelling for the others. By the end of the
third day the whole party in Eden was comfortably
established
,
and Mark took a short leave of his bride, to sail
for Rancocus again. Bridget shed tears at this separation,
short as it was intended to be; and numberless were the
injunctions to be wary of the natives, should the latter have
visited Betts, in the time intervening between the departure
of the Neshamony and her return.
The voyage between the two islands lost something of
its gravity each time it was made. Mark learned a little
every trip, of the courses to be steered, the peculiarities
of the currents, and the height of the seas. He ran down
to Rancocus, on this occasion, in three hours' less time
than he had done it before, sailing at dusk, and reaching
port next day at noon. Nothing had occurred, and to work
the men went at once, to load the pinnace. Room was
left for one of the cows and its calf; and Bob being
seriously
impressed with the importance of improving every
moment, the little sloop put to sea again, the evening of
the very day on which it had arrived.
Bridget was standing on a rock, by the side of the limpid
water of the cove, when the Neshamony shot through its
entrance into the little haven, and her hand was in Mark's
the instant he landed. Tears gushed into the eyes of the
young man as he recalled his year of solitude, and felt how
different was such a welcome from his many melancholy
arrivals and departures, previously to the recent events.
It was rather a troublesome matter to get the cow and
calf up the mountain. The first did not see enough that
was attractive in naked rocks, to induce her to mount in
the best of humours. She drank freely, however, at the
brook, appearing to relish its waters particularly well. At
length the plan was adopted of carrying the calf up a good
distance, the cries of the little thing inducing its mother
immediately to follow. In this way both were got up into
Eden, in the course of an hour. And well did the poor
cow vindicate the name, when she got a look at the broad
glades of the sweetest grasses, that were stretched before
her. So strongly was her imagination struck with the
viewfor we suppose that some cows have even more
imagination
than many menthat she actually kicked up her
heels, and away she went, head down and tail erect,
scampering
athwart the sward like a colt. It was not long,
however, before she began to graze, the voyage having
been made on a somewhat short allowance of both food
and water. If there ever was a happy animal, it was that
cow! Her troubles were all over. Sea-sickness, dry food,
short allowances of water, narrow lodgings, and hard beds,
were all, doubtless, forgotten, as she roamed at pleasure
over boundless fields, on which the grass was perennial,
seeming never to be longer or shorter than was necessary
to give a good bite; and among which numberless rills of
the purest waters were sparkling like crystal. The great
difficulty in possessing a dairy, in a warm climate, is the
want of pasture, the droughts usually being so long in the
summer months. At Vulcan's Peak, however, and indeed
in all of that fine region, it rained occasionally,
throughout
the year; more in winter than in summer, and that
was the sole distinction in the seasons, after allowing for a
trifling change in the temperature. These peculiarities
appear to have been owing to the direction of the prevalent
winds, which not only brought frequent showers, but which
preserved a reasonable degree of freshness in the
atmosphere
.
Within
the crater, Mark had often found the
heat oppressive, even in the shade; but,
without
, scarcely
ever, provided his body was not directly exposed to the
sun's rays. Nor was the difference in the temperature
between the Reef and the Peak, as marked as might have
been expected from the great elevation of the last. This
was owing to the circumstance that the sea air, and that
usually in swift motion, entered so intimately into the
composition of the atmosphere down on that low range of
rocks, imparting its customary freshness to everything it
passed over.
Mark did not make the next trip to Rancocus. By this
time Anne passed half the day in the open air, and was so
fast regaining her strength that Heaton did not hesitate to
leave her. The doctor had left many things behind him,
that he much wished to see embarked in person, and he
volunteered to be the companion of Socrates, on this
occasion
,
leaving the bridegroom behind, with his bride. By
this time Heaton himself was a reasonably good sailor, and
to him Mark confided the instructions as to the course to
be steered, and the distance to be run. All resulted
favourably
,
the Neshamony making the trip in very good
time, bringing into the cove, the fourth day after she had
sailed, not only the remaining cow, and her calf, but
several
of the goats. Convinced he might now depend on
Heaton and Socrates to sail the pinnace, and Anne
expressing
a perfect willingness to remain on the Peak, in
company with Teresa and Dido, Mark resolved to proceed
to the crater with his two Bridgets, feeling the propriety
of no longer neglecting the property in that quarter of his
dominions. There was nothing to excite apprehension,
and the women had all acquired a certain amount of
resolution
that more properly belonged to their situation than
to their sex or nature. Anne's great object of concern
was the `baby.' As long as that was safe, everything with
her was going on well; and Dido being a renowned baby
doctor, and all the simples for a child's ailings being in the
possession of the young mother, she raised no objection
whatever to her brother's quitting her.
Bridget had great impatience to make this voyage, for
she longed to see the spot where her husband had passed
so many days in solitude. Everything he had mentioned,
in their many conferences on this subject, was already
familiar
to her in imagination; but, she wished to become
more intimately acquainted with each and all. For Kitty
she really entertained a decided fondness, and even the
pigs, as Mark's companions, had a certain romantic value
in her eyes.
The morning was taken for the departure, and just as
the little craft got out from under the lee of the Peak, and
began to feel the true breeze, the sun rose gloriously out
of the eastern waves, lighting the whole of the blue waters
with his brilliant rays. Never did Vulcan's Peak appear
more grand or more soft  for grandeur or sublimity,
blended with softness, make the principal charm of noble
tropical scenerythan it did that morning; and Bridget
looked up at the dark, overhanging cliffs, with a smile, as
she said
We may love the Reef, dear Mark, for what it did for
you in your distress, but I foresee that this Eden will
eventually become our home.
There are many things to render this mountain
preferable
to the Reef; though, now we are seriously thinking
of a colony, it may be well to keep both. Even Rancocus
would be of great value to us, as a pasture for goats, and
a range for cattle. It may be long before the space will
be wanted by human beings, for actual cultivation; but
each of our present possessions is now, and long will
continue
to be, of great use to us as assistants. We shall live
principally on the Peak, I think myself; but we must fish,
get our salt, and obtain most of our vegetables from the
Reef.
Oh! that Reef, that Reefhow long will it be, Mark,
before we see it?
The enamoured young husband laughed, and kissed his
charming wife, and told her to restrain her impatience.
Several hours must elapse before they could even come in
sight of the rocks. These hours did pass, and with the
occurrence of no event worthy of being recorded. The
Trades usually blew fresh in that quarter of the ocean, but
it was seldom that they brought tempests. Occasionally
squalls did occur, it is true; but a prudent and experienced
mariner could ordinarily guard against their consequences,
while the hurricane seldom failed, like most other great
physical phenomena, to have its precursors, that were
easily seen and understood. On the present occasion, the
boat ran across the passage in very good time, making the
crater in about five hours, and the ship's masts in six.
Mark made a good land-fall coming in to leeward of the
cape, or low promontory already mentionedCape South
he called itwhile there still remained several hours of
day. Bridget was greatly struck with the vast difference
she could not help finding between the appearance of these
low, dark, and so often naked rocks, and that of the Eden
she had just left. Tears came into her eyes, as she
pictured
her husband a solitary wanderer over these wastes,
with no water, even, but that which fell from the clouds,
or which came from the casks of the ship. When,
however
,
she gave utterance to this feeling, one so natural to
her situation, Mark told her to have patience until they
reached the crater, when she would see that he had
possessed
a variety of blessings, for which he had every reason
to be grateful to God.
There was no difficulty in getting into the proper
channel
,
when the boat fairly flew along the rocks that lined
the passages. So long as she was in rough water, the sails
of so small a craft were necessarily becalmed a good deal
of the time; but, now that there was nothing to intercept
the breeze, she caught it all, and made the most of it. To
Mark's surprise, as they passed the Prairie, he saw all of
his swine on it, now, including two half-unconsumed litters
of well-grown pigs, some seventeen in number. These
animals had actualy found their way along the rocks, a
distance of at least twenty miles from home, and by the
crooked path they had taken, probable one much greater.
They all appeared full, and contented. So much of the
water had already evaporated as to make it tolerable
walking
on the sea-weed; and Mark, stopping to examine the
progress of things, prognosticated that another year, in
that climate, would convert the whole of that wide plain
into dry land. In many places, the hogs had already found
their way down, through the sea-weed, into the mud; and
there was one particular spot, quite near the channel,
where the water was all gone, and where the pigs had
rooted over so much of the surface, as to convert two or
three acres into a sort of half-tilled field, in which the
sea-weed
was nearly turned under the mud. Nothing but
drenching rains were wanting to render such a place highly
productive, and it was certain those rains would come at
the end of the season.
About the middle of the day, Mark ran the boat
alongside
of the Reef, at the usual landing, and welcomed
Bridget to his and her home, with a kiss. Everything
was in its place, and a glance sufficed to show that no
human foot had been there, during the weeks of his absence.
Kitty was browsing on the Summit, and no spaniel could
have played more antics than she did, at the sight of her
master. At first, Mark had thought of transferring this
gentle and playful young goat to the Peak, and to place
her in the little flock collected there; but he had been
induced to change his mind, by recollecting how much she
contributed to the beauty of the Summit, by keeping down
the grass. He had therefore brought her a companion,
which had no sooner been landed on the Reef, than it
bounded off to make acquaintance with the stranger on
the elevation.
Bridget was almost overcome when she got on board the
ship. There was even a certain sublimity in the solitude
that reigned over everything, that impressed her
imagination
,
and she wondered that any human being could so
long have dwelt there alone, uncheered by the hope of
deliverance
.
In the cabin of that vessel she had plighted her
faith to Mark, and a flood of recollections burst upon her
as she entered it. Mark was obliged to allow her to seek
relief in tears. But, half an hour brought her round again,
and then she set about putting things in order, and making
this very important abode submit to the influence of
woman's
love of comfort and order. By the time Mark came
back from his garden, whither he had gone to ascertain its
condition, Bridget had his supper ready for him, prepared
with a neatness and method to which he had long been a
stranger. That was a very delicious meal to both. The
husband had lighted a fire in the galley, where the wife
had cooked the meal, which consisted principally of some
pan-fish, taken in the narrow channels between the rocks,
and which had been cleaned by Mark himself, as they
sailed along. It was, indeed, a great point of solicitude
with this young husband to prevent his charming wife from
performing duties for which she was unfitted by education,
while the wife herself was only too solicitous to make
herself
useful. In one sense, Bridget was a very knowing
person about a household. She knew how to prepare
many savoury compounds, and had the whole culinary art
at her fingers ends, in the way of giving directions. It
was no wonder, then, that Mark found everything she
touched, or prepared, good, as everything she said sounded
pleasant and reasonable. The last is a highly important
ingredient in matrimonial life, but the first has its merit.
And Bridget Woolston was both pleasant and reasonable.
Though a little romantic, and inclined to hazard all for
feeling, and what she conceived to be duty, at the bottom
of all ran a vein of excellent sense, which had been
reasonably
attended to. Her temper was sweetness itself, and
that is one of the greatest requisites in married happiness.
To this great quality must be added affection, for she was
devoted to Mark, and nothing he wished would she
hesitate
about striving to obtain, even at painful sacrifices to
herself. One as generous-minded and manly as her
husband
,
could not fail to discover and appreciate such a
disposition
,
which entered very largely into the composition
of their future happiness.
Our young couple did not visit the crater and the
Summit
until the sun had lost most of its power. Then Mark
introduced his wife into his garden, and to his lawn.
Exclamations of delight escaped the last, at nearly every
step; for, in addition to the accidental peculiarities of such
a place, the vegetation had advanced, as vegetation only
can advance within the tropics, favoured by frequent rains
and a rich soil. The radishes were half as large as
Bridget's
wrists, and as tender as her heart. The lettuce was
already heading; the beans were fit to pull; the onions large
enough to boil, and the peas even too old. On the
Summit
Mark cut a couple of melons, which were of a flavour
surpassing any he had ever before tasted. With that spot
Bridget was especially delighted. It was, just then, as
green as grass could be, and Kitty had found its plants so
very sweet, that she had scarce descended once to trespass
on the garden. Here and there the imprint of her little
hoof was to be traced on a bed, it is true, but she appeared
to have gone there more to look after the condition of the
garden than to gratify her appetite.
While on the Summit, Mark pointed out to his wife the
fowls, now increased to something like fifty. Two or three
broods of chickens had come within the last month,
making
their living on the reef that was separated from that of
the crater by means of the bridge of planks. As two or
three flew across the narrow pass, however, he was aware
that the state of his garden must be owing to the fact that
they still found a plenty on those rocks for their support.
In returning to the ship, he visited a half-barrel prepared
for that purpose, and, as he expected, found a nest
containing
a dozen eggs. These he took the liberty of
appropriating
to his own use, telling Bridget that they could eat
some of them for their breakfast.
But food never had been an interest to give our solitary
man much uneasiness. From the hour when he found
muck, and sea-weed, and guano, he felt assured of the
means of subsistence; being in truth, though he may not
have known it himself, more in danger of falling
behindhand
,
in consequence of the indisposition to activity that
almost ever accompanies the abundance of a warm climate,
than from the absolute want of the means of advancing.
That night Mark and Bridget knelt, side by side, and
returned
thanks to God for all his mercies. How sweet the
former found it to see the light form of his beautiful
companion
moving about the spacious cabin, giving it an air
of home and happiness, no one can fully appreciate who
has not been cut off from these accustomed joys, and then
been suddenly restored to them.
Vol. I.  19
CHAPTER XV.
I beg, good Heaven, with just desires,
What need, not luxury, requires;
Give me, with sparing hands, but moderate wealth,
A little honour, and enough of health;
Free from the busy city life,
Near shady groves and purling streams confined,
A faithful friend, a pleasing wife;
And give me all in one, give a contented mind.
Anonymous
.
Mark
and Bridget remained at the Reef a week, entirely
alone. To them the time seemed but a single day; and
so completely were they engrossed with each other, and
their present happiness, that they almost dreaded the hour
of return. Everything was visited, however, even to the
abandoned anchor, and Mark made a trip to the eastward,
carrying his wife out into the open water, in that direction.
But the ship and the crater gave Bridget the greatest
happiness
.
Of these she never tired, though the first gave her
the most pleasure. A ship was associated with all her
earliest impressions of Mark; on board that very ship she
had been married; and now it formed her home,
temporarily
,
if not permanently. Bridget had been living so long
beneath a tent, and in savage huts, that the
accommodations
of the Rancocus appeared like those of a palace. They
were not inelegant even, though it was not usual, in that
period of the republic, to fit up vessels with a magnificence
little short of royal yachts, as is done at present. In the
way of convenience, however, our ship could boast of a
great deal. Her cabins were on deck, or under a poop,
and consequently enjoyed every advantage of light and air.
Beneath were store-rooms, still well supplied with many
articles of luxury, though time was beginning to make its
usual inroads on their qualities. The bread was not quite
as sound as it was once, nor did the teas retain all their
strength and flavour. But the sugar was just as sweet as
the day it was shipped, and in the coffee there was no
apparent
change. Of the butter, we do not choose to say
anything. Bridget, in the prettiest manner imaginable,
declared that as soon as she could set Dido at work, the
store-rooms should be closely examined, and thoroughly
cleaned. Then the galley made such a convenient and
airy kitchen! Mark had removed the house, the awning
answering every purpose, and his wife declared that it was
a pleasure to cook a meal for him, in so pleasant a place.
The first dish Bridget ever literally cooked for Mark,
with her own hands, or indeed for any one else, was a
mess of `grass,' as it was the custom of even the most
polished people of America then to call asparagus. They
had gone together to the asparagus bed on Loam Island,
and had found the plant absolutely luxuriating in its
favourite
soil. The want of butter was the greatest defect
in this mess, for, to say the truth, Bridget refused the ship's
butter on this occasion, but luckily, enough oil remained
to furnish a tolerable substitute. Mark declared he had
never tasted anything in his life half so good!
At the end of the week, the governor, as Heaton had
styled Mark, and as Bridget had begun playfully to term
him, gave the opinion that it was necessary for them to
tear themselves away from their paradise. Never before,
most certainly, had the Reef appeared to the young
husband
a spot as delightful as he now found it, and it did
seem to him very possible for one to pass a whole life on
it without murmuring. His wife again and again assured
him she had never before been half as happy, and that,
much as she loved Anne and the baby, she could remain
a month longer, without being in the least wearied. But
it was prudent to return to the Peak, for Mark had never
felt his former security against foreign invasion, since he
was acquainted with the proximity of peopled islands.
The passage was prosperous, and it gave the scene an
air of civilization and life, to fall in with the Neshamony
off the cove. She was coming in from Rancocus, on her
last trip for the stores, having brought everything away
but two of the goats. These had been driven up into the
mountains, and there left. Bigelow had come away, and
the whole party of colonists were now assembled at
Vulcan's
Peak. But Betts had a communication to make that
gave the governor a good deal of concern. He reported
that after they had got the pinnace loaded, and were only
waiting for the proper time of day to quit Rancocus, they
discovered a fleet of canoes and catamarans, approaching
the island from the direction of the Group, as they
familiarly
termed the cluster of islands that was known to be
nearest to them, to the northward and westward. By
means of a glass, Betts had ascertained that a certain
Waally was on board the leading canoe, and he regarded
this as an evil omen. Waally was Ooroony's most
formidable
rival and most bitter foe; and the circumstance that
he was leading such a flotilla, of itself, Bob thought, was
an indication that he had prevailed over honest Betto, in
some recent encounter, and was now abroad, bent on
further
mischief. Indeed, it seemed scarcely possible that
men like the natives should hear of the existence of such
a mountain as that of Rancocus Island, in their vicinity,
and not wish to explore, if not to possess it.
Betts had pushed off, and made sail, as soon as assured
of this fact. He knew the pinnace could outsail anything
the islanders possessed, more especially on a wind, and he
manuvred about the flotilla for an hour, making his
observations
,
before he left it. This was clearly a war party,
and Bob thought there were white men in it. At least,
he saw two individuals who appeared to him to be white
sailors, attired in a semi-savage way, and who were in the
same canoe with the terrible Waally. It was nothing out
of the way for seamen to get adrift on the islands scattered
about in the Pacific, there being scarcely a group in which
more or less of them are not to be found. The presence
of these men, too, Bob regarded as another evil omen, and
he felt the necessity of throwing all the dust he could into
their eyes. When the pinnace left the flotilla, therefore,
instead of passing out to windward of the island, as was
her true course, she steered in an almost contrary
direction
,
keeping off well to leeward of the land, in order not
to get becalmed under the heights, for Bob well knew the
canoes, with paddles, would soon overhaul him, should he
lose the wind.
It was the practice of our colonists to quit Rancocus
just before the sun set, and to stand all night on a
south-east
course. This invariably brought them in sight of the
smoke of the volcano by morning, and shortly after they
made the Peak. All of the day that succeeded, was
commonly
passed in beating up to the volcano, or as near to it
as it was thought prudent to go; and tacking to the
northward
and eastward, about sunset of the second day, it was
found on the following morning, that the Neshamony was
drawing near to the cliffs of Vulcan's Peak, if she were
not already beneath them. As a matter of course, then,
Bob had not far to go, before night shut in, and left him
at liberty to steer in whatever direction he pleased.
Fortunately
,
that night had no moon, though there was not
much danger of so small a craft as the Neshamony being
seen at any great distance on the water, even by moonlight.
Bob consequently determined to beat up off the north end
of the island, or Low Cape, as it was named by the
colonists
,
from the circumstance of its having a mile or two
of low land around it, before the mountains commenced.
Once off the cape again, and reasonably well in, he might
possibly make discoveries that would be of use.
It took two or three hours to regain the lost ground, by
beating to windward. By eleven o'clock, however, the
Neshamony was not only off the cape, but quite close in
with the landing. The climate rendering fires altogether
unnecessary at that season, and indeed at nearly all
seasons
,
except for cooking, Bob could not trace the
encampment
of the savages, by that means. Still, he obtained
all the information he desired. This was not done,
however
,
without great risk, and by a most daring step on his
part. He lowered the sails of the boat and went alongside
of the rock, where the pinnace usually came to, the canoes,
&c., having made another, and a less eligible harbour.
Bob then landed in person, and stole along the shore in the
direction of the sleeping savages. Unknown to himself, he
was watched, and was just crouching under some bushes,
in order to get a little nearer, when he felt a hand on his
shoulder. There was a moment when blood was in danger
of being shed, but Betts's hand was stayed by hearing, in
good English, the words
Where are you bound, shipmate?
19 *
This question was asked in a guarded, under-tone, a
circumstance that reassured Bob, quite as much as the
language. He at once perceived that the two men whom
he had, rightly enough, taken for seamen, were in these
bushes, where it would seem they had long been on the
watch, observing the movements of the pinnace. They
told Bob to have no apprehensions, as all the savages were
asleep, at some little distance, and accompanied him back
to the Neshamony. Here, to the surprise and joy of all
parties, Bigelow recognised both the sailors, who had not
only been his former shipmates, but were actually his
townsmen in America, the whole three having been born
within a mile of each other. The history of these three
wanderers from home was very much alike. They had
come to the Pacific in a whaler, with a drunken captain,
and had, in succession, left the ship. Bigelow found his
way to Panama, where he was caught by the dark eyes of
Theresa, as has been related. Peters had fallen in with
Jones, in the course of his wanderings, and they had been
for the last two years among the pearl islands, undecided
what to do with themselves, when Waally ordered both to
accompany him in the present expedition. They had
gathered
enough in hints given by different chiefs, to
understand
that a party of Christians was to be massacred, or
enslaved, and plundered of course. They had heard of
the `canoe' that had been tabooed for twelve moons, but
were at a loss to comprehend one-half of the story, and
were left to the most anxious conjectures. They were not
permitted to pass on to the islands under the control of
Ooroony, but were jealously detained in Waally's part of
the group, and consequently had not been in a situation
to learn all the particulars of the singular party of
colonists
who had gone to the southward. Thus much did
Peters relate, in substance, when a call among the savages
notified the whole of the whites of the necessity of coming
to some conclusion concerning the future. Jones and
Peters acknowledged it would not be safe to remain any
longer, though the last gave his opinion with an obvious
reluctance. As it afterwards appeared, Peters had married
an Indian wife, to whom he was much attached, and he
did not like the idea of abandoning her. There was but
a moment for reflection, however, and almost without
knowing it himself, when he found the pinnace about to
make sail in order to get off the land, he followed Jones
into her, and was half a mile from the shore before he had
time to reflect much on her he had left behind him. His
companion consoled him by telling him that an opportunity
might occur of sending a message to Petrina, as they had
named the pretty young savage, who would not fail to find
her way to Rancocus, sooner or later.
With these important accessions to his forces, Bob did
not hesitate about putting to sea, leaving Waally to make
what discoveries he might. Should the natives ascend to
the higher parts of the mountain, they could hardly fail to
see both the smoke of the volcano and the Peak, though it
would luckily not be in their power to see the Reef, or any
part of that low group of rocks. It was very possible they
might attempt to cross the passage between the two
mountains
,
though the circumstance that Vulcan's Peak lay so
directly to windward of Rancocus offered a very serious
obstacle to their succeeding. Had the two sailors remained
with them,
they
, indeed, might have taught the Indians to
overcome the winds and waves; but these very men were
of opinion, from what they had seen of the natives and of
their enterprises, that it rather exceeded their skill and
perseverance, to work their canoes a hundred miles dead
to windward, and against the sea that was usually on in
that quarter of the Pacific.
The colonists, generally, gave the two recruits a very
welcome reception. Bridget smiled when Mark suggested
that Jones, who was a well-looking lad enough, would
make a very proper husband for Joan, and that he doubted
not his being called on, in his character of magistrate, to
unite them in the course of the next six months. The
designs of the savages, however, caused the party to think
of anything but weddings, just at that moment, and a
council was held to devise a plan for their future
government
.
As Mark was considered the head of the colony, and
had every way the most experience, his opinion swayed
those of his companions, and all his recommendations were
adopted. There were on board the ship eight carronades,
then quite a new gun, and mounted on trucks. They
were of the bore of twelve-pounders, but light and
manageable
.
There was also abundance of ammunition in the
vessel's magazine, no ship coming to the Fejees to trade
without a proper regard to the armament. Mark proposed
going over to the Reef with the Neshamony, the very next
day, in order to transport two of the guns, with a proper
supply of powder and shot, to the Peak. Now there was
one place on the path, or Stairs, where it would be easy
to defend the last against an army, the rocks, which were
absolutely perpendicular on each side of it, coming so close
together, as to render it practicable to close the passage
by a narrow gate. This gate Mark did not purpose to
erect now, for he thought it unnecessary. All he intended
was to plant the two guns at this pass; one on a piece of
level rock directly over it, and a little on one side, which
would command the entrance of the cove, and the cove
itself, as well as the whole of the path beneath, and the
other on another natural platform, a short distance above,
where it could not only command the pass, but, by using
the last as a sort of embrasure, by firing through it, could
not only sweep the ravine for some distance down, but
could also rake the entrance of the cove, and quite half of
the little basin itself.
Bob greatly approved of this arrangement, though all
the seamen were too much accustomed to obey their
officers
to raise the smallest objections to anything that Mark
proposed. Betts was the only person who had made the
circuit of the Peak; but he, and Mark; and Heaton, who
had been a good deal round the cliffs, on the side of the
water, all agreed in saying they did not believe it possible
for a human being to reach the plain, unless the ascent
was made by the Stairs. This, of course, rendered the
fortifying of the last a matter of so much the greater
importance
,
since it converted the whole island into a second
Gibraltar. It was true, the Reef would remain exposed
to depredations; though Mark was of opinion that, by
leaving a portion of their force in the ship, with two or
three of the guns at command, it would not be difficult to
beat off five hundred natives. As for the creater, it might
very easily be made impregnable.
At this meeting Heaton proposed the establishment of
some sort of government and authority, which they should
all solemnly swear to support. The idea was favourably
received, and Mark was unanimously chosen governor for
life, the law being the rule of right, with such special
enactments
as might, from time to time, issue from a council
of three, who were also elected for life. This council
consisted of the governor, Heaton, and Betts. Human
society has little difficulty in establishing itself on just
principles, when the wants are few and interests simple.
It is the bias given by these last that perverts it from the
true direction. In our island community, most of its
citizens
were accustomed to think that education and practice
gave a man certain claims to control, and, as yet,
demagogueism
had no place with them. A few necessary rules,
that were connected with their particular situation, were
enacted by the council and promulgated, when the meeting
adjourned. Happily they were as yet far, very far from
that favourite sophism of the day, which would teach the
inexperienced to fancy it an advantage to a legislator to
commence his career as low as possible on the scale of
ignorance, in order that he might be what it is the fashion
to term a self-made man.
Mark now took the command, and issued his orders
with a show of authority. His attention was first turned
to rendering the Peak impregnable. There were a plenty
of muskets and fowling-pieces already there, Heaton
having
come well provided with arms and ammunition. As
respects the last, Peters and Jones were set to work to
clear out a sort of cavern in the rock, that was not only
of a convenient size, but which was conveniently placed
for such a purpose, at no great distance from the head of
the Stairs, to receive the powder, &c. The cavity was
perfectly dry, an indispensable requisite, and it was equally
well protected against the admission of water.
The next thing was to collect a large pile of dry wood
on the naked height of the Peak. This was to be lighted,
at night, in the event of the canoes appearing while he
was absent, Mark being of opinion that he could see such
a beacon-fire from the Reef, whither he was about to
proceed
.
Having made these arrangements, the governor set
sail with Betts, Bigelow, and Socrates for his companions,
leaving Heaton, with Peters and Jones, to take care of
most of the females. We say of most, since Dido and
Juno went along, in order to cook, and to wash all the
clothes of the whole colony, a part of which were sent in
the pinnace, but most of which were on board the ship.
This was a portion of his duty, when a solitary man, to
which Mark was exceedingly averse, and having shirts
almost
ad libitum
, Bridget had found nearly a hundred ready
for the `buck-basket.' There was no danger, therefore,
that the `wash' would be too small.
Betts was deeply impressed with the change that he
found in the rocks. There, where he had left water over
which he had often floated his raft, appeared dry land.
Nor was he much less struck with the appearance of the
crater. It was now a hill of a bright, lively verdure, Kitty
and her new friend keeping it quite as closely cropped as
was desirable. The interior, too, struck him forcibly; for
there, in addition to the garden, now flourishing, though a
little in want of the hoe, was a meadow of acres in extent,
in which the grass was fit to cut. Mark had observed this
circumstance when last at the crater, and Socrates had
brought his scythe and forks, to cut and cure the hay.
The morning after the arrival, everybody went to work.
The women set up their tubs, under an awning spread for
that purpose, near the spring, and were soon up to their
elbows in suds. The scythe was set in motion, and the
pinnace was taken round to the ship. Three active
seamen
soon hoisted out the carronades, and stowed them in
the little sloop. The ammunition followed, and
half-a-dozen
barrels of the beef and pork were put in the
Neshamony
also. Mark scarcely ever touched this food now,
the fish, eggs, chickens, and pigs, keeping his larder
sufficiently
well supplied. But some of the men pined for
ship's
provisions, beef and pork that had now been packed
more than two years, and the governor thought it might
be well enough to indulge them. The empty barrels would
be convenient on the Peak, and the salt would be
acceptable
,
after being dried and pulverized.
The day was passed in loading the Neshamony, and in
looking after various interests on the Reef. The hogs had
all come in, and were fed. Mark shot one, and had it
dressed, putting most of its meat into the pinnace. He
also sent Bob out to his old place of resort, near Loam
Island, whence he brought back near a hundred hog-fish.
These were divided, also, some being given to Dido's mess,
and the rest put in the pinnace, after taking out enough
for a good supper. About ten at night the Neshamony
sailed, Mark carrying her out into the open water, when
he placed Bob at the helm. Bigelow had remained in the
ship, to overhaul the lumber, of which there were still large
piles both betwixt decks and in the lower hold, as did the
whole of the Socrates family, who were yet occupied with
the hay harvest and the `wash.' Before he lay down to
catch his nap, Mark took a good look to the southward,
in quest of the beacon, but it was not burning, a sign the
savages had not appeared in the course of the day. With
this assurance he fell asleep, and slept until informed by
Bob that the pinnace was running in beneath the cliffs.
Betts called him, because the honest fellow was absolutely
at a loss to know where to find the entrance of the cove.
So closely did the rocks lap, that this mouth of the
harbour
was most effectually concealed from all but those
who happened to get quite close in with the cliffs, and in
a particular position. Mark, himself, had caught a glimpse
of this narrow entrance accidentally, on his first voyage,
else might he have been obliged to abandon the hope of
getting on the heights; for subsequent examination showed
that there was but that one spot, on the whole circuit of
Vulcan's Peak, where man could ascend to the plain,
without
having recourse to engineering and the labour of
months, if not of years.
Bob had brought along one of the two swivels of the
ship, as an armament for the Neshamony, and he fired it
under the cliffs, as a signal of her return. This brought
down all the men, who, with their united strength, dragged
the carronades up the Stairs, and placed them in position.
With a view to scale the guns, the governor now had each
loaded, with a round shot and a case of canister. The
gun just above the pass, he pointed himself, at the entrance
of the cove, and touched it off. The whole of the missiles
went into the passage, making the water fairly foam again.
The other gun was depressed so as to sweep the Stairs,
and, on examination, it was found that its shot had raked
the path most effectually for a distance exceeding a
hundred
yards. Small magazines were made in the rocks,
near each gun, when the most important part of the
arrangements
for defence were considered to be satisfactorily
made for the present. The remainder of the cargo was
discharged, and got up the mountain, though it took three
days to effect the last. The provisions were opened
below
and overhauled, quite one-half of the pork being
consigned
to the soap-fat, though the beef proved to be still
sound and sweet. Such as was thought fit to be consumed
was carried up in baskets, and re-packed on the mountain,
the labour of rolling up the barrels satisfying everybody,
after one experiment. This difficulty set Mark to work
with his wits, and he found a shelf that overhung the
landing
,
at a height of fully a hundred yards above it, where
there was a natural platform of rock, that would suffice for
the parade of a regiment of men. Here he determined to
rig a derrick, for there was an easy ascent and descent to
this `platform,' as the place was called, and down which a
cart might go without any difficulty, if a cart was to be
had. The `platform' might also be used for musketeers,
in an action, and on examining it, Mark determined to
bring over one of the two long sixes, and mount it there,
with a view to command the offing. From that height a
shot could be thrown in any direction, for more than a
mile, outside of the harbour.
Heaton had seen no signs of the canoes, nor could Mark,
at any time during the next four days after his return,
though he was each day on the Peak itself, to examine the
ocean. On the fifth day, therefore, he and Bob crossed
over to the Reef again, taking Bridget along this time.
The latter delighted in the ship, the cabins of which were
so much more agreeable and comfortable than the tents,
and which had so long been her husband's solitary abode.
On reaching the Reef, the governor was greatly
surprised
to find that Bigelow had the frame of a boat even
larger than the pinnace set up, one that measured fourteen
tons, though modelled to carry, rather than to sail. In
overhauling the `stuff' in the ship, he had found not only
all the materials for this craft, but those necessary for a
boat a little larger than the Bridget, which, it seems, had
been sent for the ordinary service of the ship, should
anything
occur to occasion the loss of the two she commonly
used, in addition to the dingui. These were treasures,
indeed, vessels of this size being of the utmost use to the
colonists. For the next month, several hands were kept
at work on these two boats, when both were got into the
water, rigged, and turned over for duty. The largest boat
of the little fleet, which had no deck at all, not even
forward
,
and which was not only lighter-built but
lighter-rigged
,
having one large sprit-sail that brailed, was called the
Mary, in honour of Heaton's mother; while the jolly-boat
carried joy to the hearts of the house of Socrates, by being
named the Dido. As she was painted black as a crow,
this appellation was not altogether inappropriate, Soc
declaring
,
dat 'e boat did a good deal favour his ole woman.
While these things were in progress, the Neshamony
was not idle. She made six voyages between the Reef
and the Peak in that month, carrying to the last, fish, fresh
pork, various necessaries from the ship, as well as eggs and
salt. Some of the fowls were caught and transferred to
the Peak, as well as half-a-dozen of the porkers. The
return cargo consisted of reed-birds, in large quantities,
several other varieties of birds, bread-fruits, bananas, yams,
cocoa-nuts, and a fruit that Heaton discovered, which was of
a most delicious flavour, resembling strawberries and cream,
and which was afterwards ascertained to be the
charramoya
,
the fluit that, of all others, when good, is thought
to surpass everything else of that nature. Bridget also
picked a basket of famously large wild strawberries on the
Summit, and sent them to Anne. In return, Anne sent
her sister, not only cream and milk, by each passage, but
a little fresh butter. I'he calves had been weaned, and
the two cows were now giving their largest quantity of
milk, furnishing almost as much butter as was wanted.
At the crater, Socrates put everything in order. He
mowed the grass, and made a neat stack of it, in the centre
of the meadow. He cleamed the garden thoroughly, and
made some arrangements for enlarging it, though the yield,
now, was quite as great as all the colonists could consume;
for, no sooner was one vegetable dug, or cut, than another
was put in its place. On the Peak, Peters, who was half
a farmer, dug over an acre or two of rich loam, and made
Vol. I.  20
a fence of brush, with a view of having a garden in Eden.
Really, it almost seemed superfluous; though those who
had been accustomed to salads, and beans, and beets, and
onions, and cucumbers, and all the other common
vegetables
of a civilized kitchen, soon began to weary of the
more luscious fruits of the tropics. With the wild figs,
however, Heaton, who was a capital horticulturist, fancied
he could do something. He picked out three or four
thriving young trees of that class, which bore fruit a little
better flavoured than most around them, and cut away all
their neighbours, letting in the sun and air freely. He
also trimmed their branches, and dug around the roots,
which he refreshed with guano; the use of which had been
imparted by Mark to his fellow-colonists, though Bigelow
knew all about it from having lived in Peru, and Bob had
early let the governor himself into the secret.
The governor and his lady, as the community now began
to term Mr. and Mrs. Mark Woolston, were on the point
of embarking in the Neshamony, to visit Vulcan's Peak,
after a residence on the Reef of more than a month, when
the orders for sailing were countermanded, in consequence
of certain signs in the atmosphere, which indicated
something
like another hurricane. The tempest came, and in
good earnest, but without any of the disastrous
consequences
which had attended that of the previous year. It
blew fearfully, and the water was driven into all the sounds,
creeks, channels and bays of the group, bringing many of
the islands, isthmuses, peninsulas, and plains of rock, what
the seamen call `awash,' though no material portion was
actually overflowed. At the Reef itself, the water rose
a fathom, but it did not reach the surface of the island by
several feet, and all passed off without any other
consequences
than giving the new colonists a taste of the
climate
.
Mark, on this occasion, for the first time, noted a change
that was gradually taking place on the surface of the Reef,
without the crater. Most of its cavities were collecting
deposits, that were derived from various sources.
Sea-weed
,
offals, refuse stuff of all kinds, the remains of the
deluge of fish that occurred the past year, and all the
indescribable
atoms that ever contribute to form soil in the
neighbourhood of man. There were many spots on the
Reef, of acres in extent, that formed shallow basins, in
which the surface might be two or three inches lower than
the surrounding rocks, and, in these spots in particular,
the accumulations of an incipient earthy matter were
plainly visible. As these cavities collected and retained
the moisture, usually from rain to rain, Mark had some of
Friend Abraham White's grass-seed sown over them, in
order to aid nature in working out her own benevolent
designs
.
In less than a month, patches of green began to
appear on the dusky rocks, and there was good reason to
hope that a few years would convert the whole Reef into
a smiling, verdant plain. It was true, the soil could not
soon obtain any useful depth, except in limited spots; but,
in that climate, where warmth and moisture united to push
vegetation to the utmost, it was an easy thing to obtain a
bottom for grasses of almost all kinds.
Nor did Mark's provident care limit itself to this one
instance
of forethought. Socrates was sent in the dingui to
the prairie, over which the hogs had now been rooting for
fully two months, mixing together mud and sea-weed,
somewhat loosely it is true, but very extensively; and there
he scattered Timothy-seed in tolerable profusion. Socrates
was a long-headed, as well as a long-footed fellow, and he
brought back from this expedition a report that was of
material importance to the future husbandry of the
colonists
.
According to his statement, this large deposit of
mud and sea-weed lay on a peninsula, that might be
barricaded
against the inroads of hogs, cattle, &c., by a fence
of some two or three rods in length. This was a very
favourable
circumstance, where wood was to be imported
for many years to come, if not for ever; though the black
had brought the seeds of certain timbers, from the Peak,
and put them into the ground in a hundred places on the
Reef, where the depth of deposit, and other circumstances,
seemed favourable to their growth. As for the Prairie,
could it be made to grow grasses, it would be a treasure
to the colony, inasmuch as its extent reached fully to a
thousand acres. The examination of Socrates was
flattering
in other respects. The mud was already dry, and the
deposit of salt did not seem to be very great, little water
having been left there after the eruption, or lifting of the
earth's crust. The rains had done much, and certain
coarse, natural grasses, were beginning to show themselves
in various parts of the field. As the hogs would not be
likely to root over the same spot twice, it was not proposed
to exclude them, but they were permitted to range over
the field at pleasure, in the hope that they would add to its
fertility by mixing the materials for soil. In such a
climate
,
every change of a vegetable character was extremely
rapid, and now that no one thought of abandoning the
settlement
,
it was very desirable to obtain the different
benefits
of civilization as soon as possible.
All the blacks remained at the Reef, where Mark
himself
passed a good deal of his time. In their next visit to
the Peak, they found things flourishing, and the garden
looking particularly well. The Vulcanists had their melons
in any quantity, as well as most vegetables without limits.
It was determined to divide the cows, leaving one on the
Peak, and sending the other to the crater, where there was
now sufficient grass to keep two or three such animals.
With a view to this arrangement, Bob had been directed
to fence in the garden and stack, by means of ropes and
stanchions let into the ground. When the Anne returned
to the Reef, therefore, from her first voyage to the Peak,
a cow was sent over in her. This change was made solely
for the convenience of the milk, all the rest of the large
stock being retained on the plain, where there was
sufficient
grass to sustain thousands of hoofs.
But the return cargo of the Anne, on this her first
voyage
,
was composed mainly of ship-timber. Heaton had
found a variety of the teak in the forests that skirted the
plain, and Bigelow had got out of the trees the frame of a
schooner that was intended to measure about eighty tons.
A craft of that size would be of the greatest service to
them, as it would enable the colonists to visit any part of
the Pacific they pleased, and obtain such supplies as they
might find necessary. Nor was this all; by mounting on
her two of the carronades, she would effectually give them
the command of their own seas, so far as the natives were
concerned at least. Mark had some books on the
draughting
of vessels, and Bigelow had once before laid down a
brig of more than a hundred tons in dimensions. Then
the stores, rigging, copper, &c., of the ship, could never
be turned to better account than in the construction of
another vessel, and it was believed she could furnish
materials
enough for two or three such craft. Out of
compliment
to his old owner, Mark named this schooner in
embryo
,
the `Friend Abraham White,' though she was
commonly
known afterwards as the `Abraham.'
The cutting of the frame of the intended schooner was
a thing easy enough, with expert American axemen, and
with that glorious implement of civilization, the American
axe. But it was not quite so easy to get the timber down
to the cove. The keel, in particular, gave a good deal of
trouble. Heaton had brought along with him both cart
and wagon wheels, and without that it is questionable if
the stick could have been moved by any force then at the
command of the colony. By suspending it in chains
beneath
the axles, however, it was found possible to draw it,
though several of the women had to lend their aid in
moving
the mass. When at the head of the Stairs, the timber
was lowered on the rock, and was slid downwards, with
occasional lifts by the crowbar and handspike. When it
reached the water it was found to be much too heavy to
float, and it was by no means an easy matter to buoy it
up in such a way that it might be towed. The Anne was
three times as long making her passage with this keel in
tow, as she was without it. It was done, however, and
the laying of the keel was effected with some little
ceremony
,
in the presence of nearly every soul belonging to
the colony.
The getting out and raising of the frame of the `Friend
Abraham White' took six weeks. Great importance was
attached to success in this matter, and everybody assisted
in the work with right good will. At one time it was
doubted if stuff enough could be found in the ship to plank
her up with, and it was thought it might become necessary
to break up the Rancocus, in order to complete the job.
To Bridget's great joy, however, the good
old
Rancocus
so they called her, though she was even then only eight
years oldthe good old Rancocus' time had not yet come,
and she was able to live in her cabin for some months
longer. Enough planks were found by using those of the
'twixt decks, a part of which were not bolted down at all,
to accomplish all that was wanted.
20 *
Heaton was a man of singular tastes, which led him to
as remarkable acquirements. Among other
accomplishments
,
he was a very good general mechanician, having an
idea of the manner in which most of the ordinary
machinery
ought to be, not only used, but fabricated. At
the point where the rivulet descended the cliff into the
sea, he discovered as noble a mill-seat as the heart of man
could desire to possess. To have such a mill-seat at
command
,
and not to use it, would, of itself, have made him
unhappy, and he could not be easy until he and Peters,
who had also a great taste and some skill in that sort of
thing, were hard at work building a saw-mill. The saw
had been brought from America, as a thing very likely to
be wanted, and three months after these two ingenious
men had commenced their work, the saw was going,
cutting
teak, as well as a species of excellent yellow pine that
was found in considerable quantities, and of very
respectable
size, along the cliffs in the immediate vicinity of the
mill. The great difficulty to be overcome in that
undertaking
,
was the transportation of the timber. By cutting
the trees most favourably situated first, logs were got into
the pond without much labour; but after they were in
planks, or boards, or joists, they were quite seven miles
from the head of the Stairs, in the vicinity of which it
was, on several accounts, the most desirable to dwell.
Had the Abraham been kept on the stocks, until the
necessary
timber was brought from the mill, across the plain
of Eden, she would have been well seasoned before
launching
;
but, fortunately, that was not necessarymaterials
sufficient for her were got on board the ship, as mentioned,
with some small additions of inch boards that were cut to
finish her joiners' work.
Months passed, as a matter of course, while the schooner
and the mill were in the course of construction. The
work on the first was frequently intermitted, by little
voyages
in the other craft, and by labour necessary to be done
in preparing dwellings on the Peak, to meet the rainy
season
,
which was now again near at hand. Past experience
had told Mark that the winter months in his islands, if
winter a season could be termed, during which most of the
trees, all the grasses, and many of the fruits continued to
grow and ripen as in summer, were not very formidable.
It is true it then rained nearly every day, but it was very
far from raining all day. Most of the rain, in fact, fell at
night, commencing a little after the turn in the day, and
terminating about midnight. Still it must be very
unpleasant
to pass such a season beneath canvass, and, about six
weeks ere the wet time commenced, everybody turned to,
with a will, to erect proper framed houses. Now that the
mill was sawing, this was no great task, the pine working
beautifully and easily into almost every article required.
Heaton laid out his house with some attention to taste,
and more to comfort. It was of one story, but fully a
hundred feet in length, and of half that in depth. Being
a common American dwelling that was clap-boarded, it
was soon put up and enclosed, the climate requiring very
little attention to warmth. There were windows, and
even glass, a small quantity of that article having been
brought along by the colonists. The floors were beautiful,
and extremely well laid down; nor were the doors,
window-shutters
,
&c., neglected. The whole, moreover, was
painted, the stores of the ship still furnishing the
necessary
materials. But there was neither chimney nor
plastering
,
for Heaton had neither bricks nor lime. Bricks
he insisted he could and would make, and did, though in
no great number; but lime, for some time, baffled his
ingenuity
.
At last, Socrates suggested the burning of
oyster-shells
,
and by dint of fishing a good deal, among the
channels
of the reef, a noble oyster-bed was found, and the
boats brought in enough of the shells to furnish as much
lime as would put up a chimney for the kitchen; one
apartment for that sort of work being made, as yet, to
suffice for the wants of all who dwelt in Eden.
These various occupations and interests consumed
many months, and carried the new-comers through the
first wet season which they encountered as a colony. As
everybody was busy, plenty reigned, and the climate being
so very delicious as to produce a sense of enjoyment in
the very fact of existence, everybody but Peters was happy.
He, poor fellow, mourned much for his Peggy, as he called
the pretty young heathen wife he had left behind him in
Waally's country.
END OF VOL. I.